


It seemed, this pseudo butler was dealing with multiple targets on the ground a hundred meter away using tableware.



But even while that was going on, soldiers who heard the gunshot showed up from the terrace and the garden ahead――but,



「Shi-」



Tableware was flying. Polished silver knifes that were usually stored in the kitchen of mother ship Avenst!



*suta-* Roze and co got down safely on the terrace. And then, with an unknown principle, *shakon-* Sabas stowed away the tableware knifes into the cuff while making such small sound. Roze asked him as the representative of the imperial guards who were making an expression that was loss for words.



「Why, tableware?」



「Because I'm a butler.」



The history of Sabas who was the former captain of the imperial guard, who then became Roze's butler after picking out Crow siblings and turned his position to them was known by everyone there. They also knew his true strength. But, not one of them knew that he owned the inhuman skill that allowed him to snipe enemy on the ground from a hundred meter above using tableware.



They more or less knew that in his active duty period he specialized in quick draw using revolver that should be reduced to a relic of the old era, but they never imagined that after he retired he would acquire a new ability――an outrageous ability of quick snipe using knife for eating of all thing.



「What are you all doing getting absent-minded like that. Now, quickly mov――shi-」



Even while he was talking, the meal knife that manifested like a sleight of hand pierced the eyeball of a soldier that rushed out from the neighboring terrace.



Furthermore, Sabas unhesitatingly threw a meal knife at a completely wrong direction toward another soldier who drew back his face in panic. The meal knife rebounded from the ornament nearby the terrace's ceiling before it flew into the entrance while rotating fast――



「Gueh」



A single groan could be heard. Next *thud* the sound of something heavy collapsing also resounded.



「「「「「……」」」」」



「What's wrong Roze-sama? Quickly go inside.」



「A, yes.」



Roze-chan who decided to become the queen of soldier. Seeing the superhuman skill of a true (?) soldier (butler), her heart very quickly cracked.



Roze and others stepped inside the room while taking grip of their mind.



「Gramps, you are the vanguard. We should be able to go straight to the underground from the hidden passage of the royalty right?」



「Yes. That's if the passage isn't blocked though. It's unthinkable that Gregor would seal his own escape route. I dare say there won't be any problem.」



Sabas slightly opened the room's door and he quickly took stock of the corridor. And then, he nodded once and moved at the front as the person who thoroughly knew the inside of the royal palace.



After him was six imperial guards following with ordered movement without the slightest bit of disorder, behind them was Roze with the Crow siblings at both her sides, their back were secured by four imperial guards.



「Muh」



Suddenly Sabas let out an aler voice. Right at the next moment, he suddenly accelerated!



The soldier that leaped out from the corridor's corner ahead was hit with a body blow that gave out *zudon-* impact voice as though he was hit with a large cannon. Without any voice or free time to writhe, the soldier collapsed with his eyeballs rolling and the white of his eyes got exposed――



Yet he wasn't allowed to fall, his collar was grasped and he was made to stand.



And then, several gunshots rang at that time. The soldier who got hoisted up by Sabas danced like a badly made marionette. At the same time, Sabas's palm heel struck at the abdomen of the soldier he turned as shield as though he was beating up the dead.



Even though he and the corpse was in posture where they were mostly glued to each other, the pitiful soldier A was sent flying like a cannon ball.



「Uoh」



「Wha, what-」



The soldiers behind who were firing lost their cool seeing their comrade's corpse suddenly flying horizontally at them and they dodged. Their firing stopped.



「Fuhn」



「Gahah」



The pseudo-cannon body blow once more burst at the soldier B. He was holding down his stomach while his body was leaning forward and he fell on his knees. His mouth vomited out froth mixed with blood and he convulsed in twitches.



「You bastard――」



「Hah」



「Goeh」



Soldier C aimed his rifle, but what was reflected in his sight was only the flapping end of the butler uniform. The elbow strike of Sabas who slipped into his bosom struck the center of his sternum, *bogyu* a wretched sound that had never been heard before rang.



Without even paying attention to soldier C who was limply collapsing behind, Sabas pulled out a handgun from the holster on the waist of soldier C who was falling.



……Surely, soldier D and E who were behind soldier C were witnessing an unrealistic scene of an old man in butler uniform appearing from the shadow of their slowly falling comrade, pointing a gun at their way.



*tan-, tan-.*



Two gunshots. The headshot was also two.



*thud-* Soldier D and E collapsed.



「Ah, over there-」



「Shit-, Fritz and others got done in! That butler uniformed man there-」



More soldiers who heard the gunshots appeared from the corridor's corner bustlingly. The corridor was a straight line. There was around ten meter until the corner where the soldiers were appearing.



「Gramps-, come ba――」



Roze was about to yell「come back」. But, before she could, Sabas had moved.



Forward.



With a low stance as though crawling on the ground, he sprinted like a fired bullet.



The flapping fringe of the butler uniform was beautiful.



Gun muzzles flashed grandly. Bullet storm was fired.



However, that didn't even graze the old butler.



「How the hell!?」



One soldier reflexively acted the straight-man. The old butler who was moving with small sways to left and right without even slowing down for a bit and couldn't be touched even by rifle bullet was already in horror territory.



The truth was he only calculated the firing line from the direction of the muzzle and before he was shot he evaded to a place where bullets wouldn't hit, but seen from the side it was a really incomprehensible situation.



「Dammit all-」



Soldier F was unable to put up with it any longer and he jumped out from the corridor's corner, he held his rifle to shoot from the hip and unleashed it in full-auto.



So that it couldn't be dodged, he must be intending to scatter bullets from left to right uniformly.



「Laughable!」



Butler-san said something.



Right after that, the rifle bullets that were mowing down in fan shape were passing down right below Sabas in vain. Yes, Sabas kicked on the corridor's wall and with a triangle jump he took refuge midair.



At the same time, he was firing bullets at the soldiers hiding at the corner to stop them from moving while his fingers caught the ornamental part of the ceiling's light, and like a pendulum he increased his leaping range while accelerating further.



While showing a midair twist that would make even the famous move Shi○i of a certain gymnastic athlete who twisted too much to go pale, Sabas's posture became upside down just right above soldier F. Like that, he threw the handgun that ran out of bullet to another soldier, grasped the chin of soldier F, and using the momentum of the twist the neck snapped. (TN: I don't know which athlete and move it referred to here)



Sabas performed a beautiful landing at the shadow of soldier F that was spinning and spinning as though in a dance while his body was collapsing down, when a bullet approached him.



*kan-*



Such light sound rang out.



「How is that possible!?」



「How can that be possible!?」



The straight-man act of soldier G and queen-sama overlapped. If it was said that it couldn't be helped then it couldn't be helped. After all, Sabas-san had just deflected a rifle bullet.



――Using a polished shiny silver tray that he took out from somewhere.



「A butler has to be able to deflect something like a bullet using a tray at the very least-」



「No, that's stran――gueh」



To be specific, the silver tray that Sabas took out was specially made to be tough enough to deflect bullet, furthermore rather than calling it deflecting he was putting angle on the tray when the bullet impacted so it was more correct to call it "averting" though……



In any case, normally nine out of ten the tray would get sent flying and the target would still get hit, so it didn't change how uncommon what happened was.



Anyway, soldier G who acted the straight-man had his throat crushed by the silver tray that flew at him like a Frisbee and he fell while raising a groaning voice that sounded like a frog's croak.



The other soldiers returned to their senses and they re-aimed their rifle. Soldier H's rifle muzzle locked-on at the forehead of Sabas who had approached until right in front of him.



But, when he was on the verge of pulling the trigger,



「He, he vani――」



「Too slow.」



Unable to follow the figure of Sabas that sank down deeply, it looked like he vanished and the soldier was shaken. And then, without even any time to shudder from hearing the voice from below, the butler kick that sprang up pulverized the jaw & snapped the neck and soldier H ascended.



「You-, monster-」



「Die, old maann-」



「You bastarddd, I'll kill――」



Soldier I, J, K surrounded Sabas. Three rifle muzzles were aimed from three directions at him in a really close range. Instantly the three of them each raised a short scream. It happened at the same time when Sabas made a rotation from riding the centrifugal force of the kick that drew an artistic circular orbit.



Looking closer, there was a sewing needle in soldier I's eye, a knife stabbed on J's arm, and blood spurting out from soldier K's wrist.



The three who were flinching back from the pain exposed a fatal opening. Naturally, there was no way the old butler who was letting out sharp eye glint that could even be mistaken as dragon eyes would overlook that opening.



「Shi-」



Butler-sama performed a beautiful break dance in a world with up and down reversed.



Let's say it, one more time. The flapping butler uniform was beautiful.



Sabas's long legs were swung circularly. A sharp knife sprang out from the tip of the glossy butler shoes. It caressed the throat of the soldiers as though they were sucked into its orbit.



*pisha-* Matching Sabas's legs orbit, a line of blood was drawn on the wall.



Sabas was on one knee when he recovered from the extremely dangerous break dance. He stood up and dusted off his hem before taking out a folding umbrella from out of nowhere as expected.



At the same time when he opened it with a smooth motion, *pusha――* rain of blood showered down. Of course, it didn't touch Sabas who was under an umbrella.



*Thud* The soldiers whose carotid artery was tore open crumbled down.



「Fumu. I tried to create it to kill time, but unexpectedly it was a bit useful.」



Sabas-san muttered such thing while he twisted the folding umbrella. Its frame came off and only its center pole remained, at the same time *shakin-* a sharp double-edged blade sprang out from its tip.



And then, he readied it, and like an athlete of javelin throw, he threw it deeper inside the corridor.



「U, UOOOOOOH」



In a superb timing, the last soldier who seemed to be in hiding leaped out. And then, in the right timing his throat received the umbrella attack and he blankly collapsed backward.



「Now, Roze-sama. For the time being I have removed the danger ahead. It will be unfavorable if they approach in force. Let's hurry on ahead.」



「Ah, yes.」



Heaps of corpses all around. The faces of Roze, the Crow siblings, and the imperial guards were twitching at such disastrous scene of the corridor while rushing toward Sabas's position.



「He, hey, gramps. Just now, when you were surrounded by the soldiers, what did you do?」



Roze must be referring to the time when soldier I, J, K suddenly received damage. She knew that Sabas had done something, but it was too fast that she didn't know what he actually did.



It seemed that it wasn't just Roze who had that question, the Crow siblings and the imperial guards were also the same, rather it was them who looked more curious, so Roze unconsciously questioned while understanding that this wasn't the time.



Sabas who was rushing htrough the corridor with sure footsteps even while putting his guard up sent a sharp gaze at the Crow siblings and the imperial guards「Even all of you couldn't see it?」. Seeing them twitched, Sabas shook his head as though lamenting their inadequacy very much while answering.



「It's nothing significant. I was shooting the sewing needle inside my mouth while hurling knife from the launcher inside my sleeve, at the same time I swung a bit sturdy thread that can also be used for sewing to cut the wrist. That's all.」



「Is, is that so? But, gramps. Why sewing tool?」



「Because I'm a butler.」



Hearing the words of their teacher Sabas, his personal pupils the Crow siblings thought,「This person, he become stronger since retiring and becoming a butler」. Sabas sent an even sharper gaze at such Crow siblings.



「Of course, even Olga and Jean can also do just this much. ……Isn't that right, you two?」



「Ye, Yes-Sir――」



「I, it will be easy victoryy-」



Of course, they couldn't. The two could also crush enemy of the same number in the same situation like just now if they used gun. But, something like facing multiple fully armed soldiers in only close-quarter combat almost without using gun and taking care of all of them in less than a minute was……



The imperial guards were sending sympathizing gaze at their captain and vice captain.



By any chance, the vocation butler was endowed with strongest as the default might be the same in any world.



「Perhaps, it will be fine with just gramps alone……」



Roze unconsciously muttered in small volume. The imperial guards got faraway look hearing that.



Roze and others who were traveling for some time while the engagement against the enemy was dealt with Sabas who was fighting like a fierce god, they finally reached a private room of the royalty that was in the center of the palace.



「Roze-sama. This room, is the private room of Roze-sama's mother――Averia-sama. Averia-sama was cuddling Roze-sama who was just born in this room.」



「This room, is Okaa-sama's……」



Inside the room was simple. There was almost no furniture or implements, in exchange there was a lot miscellaneous luggage put in there. It seemed it was used not as someone's private room, but as a storage room.



Even so, Roze could somehow imagine it. Her mother that she had only even seen in photo was here, yes, surely she was near that window there, comforting her baby self inside her embrace.



「Roze-sama. Soldiers are coming.」



One imperial guard who stood watch at the corridor called with a small voice.



Roze put a lid on her overflowing feeling and she looked at Sabas. Sabas nodded and he stepped strongly on a spot at the floor. And then, he moved to left and right as though to confirm his step while stepping with the same strength at another five places.



The result, a part of the wall made a small mechanical sound *kiin*, and a lid the size of a palm slid. There, they saw a letter board of this world.



「――Roze-sama, it's "the one who walk together proudly(Roze Phi Erute)".」



「……Yes.」



That was the password to open the hidden passage. The nuance of those words resembled her first and second name. Holding the feeling that was inserted into her name inside her heart, Roze typed in the letters.



Mechanical operation sound was coming from inside the wall.



Instantly,



「Roze-sama-」



「-」



What resounded was Sabas's voice, and consecutive gunshots.



「Kuh-. A trap-」



Olga bit her lips while firing bullets at the automatic interception mechanical gun that looked like a sentry gun which sprang out from behind an implement.



「Gramps-!?」



「-, I let my guard down. So they put a trap that operated together with the authentication device……」



Perhaps Gregor had assumed that the driven out royalty would come back here. The people who knew about the procedure to open the hidden passage in this room even before the kingdom got usurped were only the royalty and Sabas who was the imperial guard captain.



And then, the royalty, Roze's family would never leak out that information to the enemy, therefore, Sabas thought that the enemy couldn't open the hidden passage here but……



If there were a few decades since that day of tragedy, then certainly it was possible to at least installed a trick at the authentication device. Perhaps this was revenge for being able to reach until the authentication device, yet they weren't able to advance further ahead than that.



Sabas spat out「I'm growing dull」at himself who didn't notice that this place was noticed already and he stood up. The instant he did that, bloods were dripping down. The flank of the butler uniform could be seen changing color despite the black color that made it not standing out.



「Gramps-, your wound!? Me, medical treatment quickly-」



Roze reached out her hand at Sabas's flank, but that hand was stopped by Sabas himself. At the same time, gunshots rang out from the corridor. Their position became known from the gunshot just now and the soldiers were rushing here.



The imperial guards guarding the entrance raised an angry voice「Their number is more than twenty! We won't hold out for long! Hurry-」while returning fire.



Sabas nodded and he turned a sharp gaze at Crow siblings.



「Olga, Jean. Fulfill the duty of the imperial guard. Roze-sama and Kuwaibel-sama, take them to the Spring of True Dragon's Tear even at the cost of your life.」



「……Yes-. Without fail.」



「Yes, teacher-」



Seeing Sabas gave such order while emitting a dominating aura that was really unthinkable to come from an injured person, his personal pupils the Crow siblings held their breath. They felt Sabas's resolve.



「Gramps, what are you saying――」



「Please go, Roze-sama. Gramps, will hold back the enemy here.」



「Why!? We only need to all enter the passage and then close the door!」



Sabas shook his head. And then, he fired toward the painting that decorated the room.



「I was careless. That's a hidden camera. Most likely they know the password already. Through there is a small passage that continue until underground. We will be helpless if we are attacked from above. This is my failure. It's my wish to be given the chance to redeem myself.」



「Such thing-. It's fine already, everyone quickly enter the passage!」



Roze grasped Sabas's arm and she walked toward the passage. Right after that,「-, grenade! Get down-」A warning resounded. Sabas covered for Roze, at the same time a flame blast enveloped the area near the door, the four imperial guards who were returning fire were blown away.



It seemed he avoided fainting with his trained body, but seeing the blood flowing from everywhere and also the bloody cough, there was no doubt that the internal organs were harmed. It was obviously a heavy injury.



Countless footsteps resounded. The rushing soldiers showed up their face from the door.



*suton-*



Like that, knife pierced their eyeball or throat. Furthermore, the thrown black object――a hand grenade rolled into the corridor and exploded.



After the explosive sound that resounded once more, groaning voices leaked out from the corridor.



「Olga, Jean-. Take Roze-sama away from here!」



Sabas's voice resounded.



Sabas rushed toward the corridor and he stole the rifles of two soldiers who were killed by knife. He spread both his hands and fired to the left and right of the corridor. Anguished voices「Gyah」「Gaah」rose once more.



「Gramps, come back! This is an ord――」



「Haven't you resolved yourself-」



Roze who was about to order him to come back was pierced by Sabas's angry voice that she had never heard until now. Roze turned speechless against Sabas who was hiding with the door's cover while continuously pulling his rifles' trigger at the corridor. For Roze, Sabas was a good natured old man. He had never raised his voice like this at her.



「Gra, gramps……」



「You decided to fight aren't you! You swore to weigh your important things aren't you! For the sake of the future, you will seize the day, you determined to do that aren't you!」



Then,



「Show that you are going to choose! Or else, are you going to abandon the future for the sake of this old bone!?」



That's right. The path that she determined was this kind of path. A king, had to make a choice.



She had made her resolve. Even so, for Roze who didn't know her parents, Sabas was, her real……



「……-. Olga-, Jean-. Choose the members who will stop the enemy along with Sabas! The rest is with me!」



「Ye, yes-」



「By your will-」



Roze who roughly rubbed her eyes that were almost spilling over adroitly turned her body toward the hidden passage.



The four imperial guards who were blown away were injured all over their body, yet they took up rifle by themselves and stood up to return fire along with Sabas. And then, Roze looked back across her soldier toward Sabas.



Sabas also turned her gaze at Roze while reloading.



「Sabas, defend this place, to the last.」



「Fuh. By your will. Roze-sama.」



She thought of him as her real grandfather. Or perhaps, even as a father. The unexpressed feeling was put into the order that was said brokenly.



That feeling, it certainly reached Sabas who had been at her side all this time since she was born.



Roze vanished deep inside the hidden passage. Olga and Jean, and other imperial guards, they nodded deeply at Sabas and their comrades before following behind. The door closed.



Sabas shot out the letter board after they passed through. With the technology of the divine country, even with the letter board destroyed there was still a high possibility of opening the path with the password known, but it could buy more time.



「Advance forward, my beloved child. I also thought of you like my real grandson.」



The remaining imperial guards showed a wry smile hearing Sabas's monologue, thinking that he should just say it directly. Sabas who noticed them cleared his throat looking a bit embarrassed.



「What's with those eyes, you guys. From here onward will be hell. Put your back into it.」



「Kukuh, you're right. We will accompany you until the end you know, Sabas-sama.」



「The demonic imperial guard captain is revived huh.」



「It has been an honor.」



「Let's show them the reserve strength of us, Avenst's imperial guard.」



While fully wounded all over the body, the imperial guards replied fearlessly. Sabas smiled「fuh」and nodded.



Something like a rocket warhead like before peeked out from ahead at the corridor. Sabas's rifle muzzle pierced the warhead with pinpoint accuracy and it exploded. The imperial guards sent in storm of bullets toward the corridor that was enveloped in flame.



「You guys, hold down the left corridor. I'll return in three minutes.」



Saying that, Sabas leaped out to the corridor. Bullets were flying from the right corridor, but they were avoided by kicking on the wall and ceiling using unrestricted movement and he pounced at the corner where the enemies were hiding.



The soldiers didn't think that someone would break through amidst those rifle bullets even in their wildest imagination and they were taken aback,



「Now then, I received the command from her majesty the queen to defend to the last――to "defend by slaughtering all the enemy". Can I have every single one of you depart to the next world?」



*shakin-* Three meal knives each sprang out from both sleeves. Each knife was held between fingers, as though they were shining silver claws.



「Fi, Fireee-」



An angry yell resounded from a person who seemed to be the captain.



The next moment, there were also agonizing cries that resounded.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday, tentatively, regards.





Chapter 242




AN: The story doesn't advance……



Recently I say this every time but, sorry it's late okay.



Their steps were relying only on the emergency light shining faintly to descend the spiraling staircase that looked like it would continue until the bottom of earth.



Other than the short exhalation and footsteps, there were only the faint vibrating sound and explosion sound that could be heard. The place was quiet. The atmosphere was heavy with no one speaking any word, further fostering that silence.



「Pii」



「I'm fine, Ku-chan.」



Kuwaibel who was flying beside Roze turned a slightly worried gaze toward her. When Roze answered inside the broken silence, Olga and Jean, followed by the imperial guards were also sending her expression of consideration.



「Right now, let's concentrate in accomplishing our pbjective.」



Surely no matter what Roze said, the expression of the Crow siblings and the imperial guards wouldn't clear. That was just how terrible the expression of Roze who was giving the order to defend to the death at her parent replacement. Because Roze was aware of how her face looked, her words toward them naturally became like that.



「It will be fine Roze-sama. This is Sabas-sama――teacher who we are talking about. After all even among the imperial guards there is argument whether it's really fine to classify that person as human.」



「Roze-sama, it's just as Nee-san said. It might be even the case that he is only able to perceive the command of defending to the death to mean『defend by slaughtering all the enemy』. Even just worrying about teacher is only a waste of time.」



Olga and Jean's consoling words were followed by the imperial guards too. Their mouth were saying「That isn't human, but something else」, or「Actually he is a weapon of massacre that was created by the ancient civilization」, or「Rather, he won't get hit even when in the middle of crossing fire using machine gun」「I mean, if it's slow bullet like rocket or missile, he can normally catch it and then throw it back, seriously」, or「Every time he gave us hellish training while yelling 'what are you doing unable to do something this easy!', but we are just normal human here」, or「I want to hit the me ten years ago who thought that I absolutely will get payback when he turned senile」and so on……



Midway the complaints of the imperial guards were overflowing. The complaints were already coming out like flood. The eyes of all of them were gradually losing vitality even though they were in the middle of mission. The imperial guards were getting killed by their memory with gramps!



「Kufuh, fufufuh. The, then, surely, he will be fine.」



A small giggle resounded. The imperial guards were taken aback and returned to reality. There they saw the figure of Roze with trembling shoulders. It seemed that her heart was cleared slightly from the lovely reminiscence of the imperial guards.



While they were doing that, Roze and others came to the bottom of the spiral stair. There was a slightly spacious landing there with double-leaf door that opened by sliding. There was a console emitting bluish white light. Seeing the display, it seemed it would perform confirmation by putting a hand palm on it. Most likely it would analyze the royalty's bloodline.



Olga held back Roze who was standing in front of the console while she manipulated something like a tablet in her hand.



「Roze-sama. In the interior map that I received from Sabas-sama, the other side of this door is the floor that was a level above the lowest floor. If we go straight through the right and corridor, there will be a stair to the lowest floor.」



Roze nodded briskly and then she continued while turning her gaze to Kuwaibel.



「If I remember correctly, the lowest floor is partly like a labyrinth isn't it?」



At the lowest floor, so that even in the case of intruder the deepest part couldn't be reached easily, there were several traps installed through the way from the surface. Even the level where Roze and others were currently at were originally set up with traps that might make anyone without qualification to lose their life and also several locks that had to be unlocked.



If they had reached this far, then what was left was only to break through the labyrinth of the underground's lowest floor that was created for the sake of buying time against intruder, at this point, there wouldn't be any problem if there was a monarch dragon. Perhaps it was related with the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】, because it was only a monarch dragon that could advance without getting lost.



Kuwaibel was confidently crying「Piih」, perhaps because he had already grasped some kind of intuition.



「Yes. Just a bit more. ……But even though I said that, it has been a few decades since the palace was snatched away. There is enough possibility that the underground's state isn't the same with the past. No matter what, don't get separated from us.」



「We will leave it to the two of you. However, we have to hurry as much as possible. Because right now, even while we are doing this, everyone in the sky is in the brink of death.」



When Roze said that, Crow siblings and also the imperial guards nodded strongly. And then, they faced the door with their rifle at ready. Olga and Jean took position at both sides of the door. And then, when Olga nodded quietly, Roze determinedly put her hand on the console.



*pi-* A small confirmation sound rang for a beat. After that came a small activation sound and the door slowly opened along with it.



Outside the door they found a passage that continued straight and a passage that that stretched to the left and right. There wasn't any sign of people.



「Let's go.」



The Crow siblings and the imperial guards nodded at Roze's words. They stepped out to the right passage with a smooth column movement.



After a while, they came to see a stair in front of them. Roze and others carefully and yet speedily rushed to the lowest floor.



They went down the long stair and jumped down on the last stair step――at that time,



*kiin*



Flash and sound exploded along with such small sound.



「-!?」



「Roze-sama!」



「Kuwaibel-sama!」



Olga immediately leaped at Roze and like that they retreated to the stair's wall as though falling on it, Jean called at Kuwaibel while returning back to the stair. The surrounding was overran by terrific light and high-pitched sound that paralyzed the eardrum.



(Kuh, sight and hearing got done in! Is it a trap, or else-)



Olga cursed inside her heart and uneasy expression emerged on her face from being unable to grasp the situation around her at all. Really sadly, Olga's fear was proved to be right.



A beat later, Olga's senses that got two of the five senses crushed by the light and sound that surpassed the permissible range recovered rapidly. What entered her sight that was painted white was a silver light enveloping her body and Roze who she was covering. It seemed, that her senses that were temporarily paralyzed by something like a flashbang got recovered by Kuwaibel.



But, naturally they didn't have any leeway to feel relieved. It was clear that the situation was urgent from the pained familiar voice of her family that reached her ear.



「Jean-」



「-, Nee-san, an ambush-. This place is bad-」



Jean was kneeling in front of Roze and Olga while showing his back. Blood was flowing from his shoulder that was desperately supporting the collapsible small shield which looked like it was going to be blown away by impact.



Originally this small shield was something to be carried into a close-quarter combat in order to endure a few bullets. If it was unfolded to the maximum then it would have the size that could cover the whole upper body, but its impact mitigation's efficiency and endurance wouldn't be that high.



Even so, the shield could defend against the fired bullets this long was because Kuwaibel responded to Jean's call and he enveloped that small shield with silver light. And then it was also because of Jean's vigor that wouldn't let the existence behind him to get even a single scratch no matter the cost.



「Pike-, what about Serio!?」



「-, it's no good.」



「Shit-」



The imperial guard called Pike answered at Jean's call while enduring bullets using similar small shield. There was a blood soaked figure of an imperial guard beside him lying on the floor. From Pike's expression, it was obvious that the body wasn't breathing anymore. Jean reflexively cursed.



Olga and the imperial guards covered behind Pike read the lines of shots and they returned fire. Right after that, multiple short voices of death agony rose from deeper into the passage.



The shooting stopped for a moment. Using that opening, the imperial guards gathered around Roze and then constructed a barrier using their small shield.



Olga fired even more bullets. However, this time she didn't fix her aim, she adjusted her bullets so they ricocheted into the visible passage and the passage at the blind spot. At the same time, she closed her eyes while focusing her ear.



「……Five people at the front passage. And then three people each at the left and right passage. Kuwaibel-sama, which is the right path?」



「Pii. Pipih」



She calculated the enemy number relying on the echoing sound of the bullet and the enemy presence that reacted to the bullet. The number of the ambush soldiers was confirmed by Olga's signature skill. The questioned Kuwaibel cried looking a bit stumped before his tail pointed at the front passage.



「Olga?」



Olga answered Roze's call along with a strong gaze.



「Roze-sama, there is no time. We are forcing our way through.」



「-」



Shaking off the gaze of Roze who was holding her breath, Olga ordered her important little brother as the captain of the imperial guard.



「Jean. Cut open the path.」



「Roger Nee-san, no, captain. Pike, Weber, suppress the enemy at the left and right. Raymond and Olson, you two charge forward with me. We are routing them!」



There was no hesitation. Jean and the imperial guards responded immediately. And then, when they were about to step forward,



「Fortunes of war with you-」



The corner of everyone's lips rose at that encouragement from the queen that they respected.



Jean and others rushed out all at once. Pike and Weber fired in full-auto into the left and right corridor without even fearing getting shot or running out of bullet. Although they were only raining bullets in order to hold back the enemy, but their skill was certainly in the level that was worthy to be called the most elite of Avenst.



They splendidly shut out the shooting from the left and right temporarily.



Not letting go of that moment, Raymond and Olson held their small shield to the front while sprinting. Behind him was Jean, and further behind him was Olga and Roze following.



Bullets were flying from the front like a rainy storm. The small shields that were clad in silver were already cracked and in the verge of getting pulverized.



「Guh」



Raymond raised a pained voice. A bullet grazed his leg. Although he had lowered his body as much as possible to enlarge the coverable range, it was impossible to defend everything using the small shield's range.



But, Raymond didn't stop. He put strength into the leg that although it wasn't hit directly yet it was still spurting out blood, and took a step forward.



Right after that, his small shield broke.



「Gah, guh, oaAAAAAAAH」



A shout surged. While his body was getting hit with bullets, Raymond――didn't stop even then. He covered his head with his arms while further stepping forward in the lead using his own body as shield replacement. It could be seen that for a moment, the enemies flinched at that intense drive and demonic visage.



The distance shrank even further.



The restarted shooting finally robbed the last strength from Raymond's body.



「Go-」



「Ou-」



Olson who replaced Raymond to stand in the lead exchanged gaze with his war buddy for an instant. And then, he took over the baton along with loud yell of fighting spirit and broke further through the bullets barrage!



At the front passage, the figure of the enemies peeking out their face from the turn midway could be seen. Astonished expression from seeing something that was hard to understand was pasted on their face.



「Don't look down-, on Avenst's-, imperial guard's-, on my resolve-」



Olson's shield broke. His body shook from impact, but the momentum of Olson that was advancing as though he was burning his life to ash wasn't stopping. While getting drilled by bullets, he threw away the remain of his small shield and rapid fired his handgun. One shot splendidly bored into an enemy's forehead.



And then, he reached it.



「I'll-, leave the rest-. Vice captain!」



「Yeah. You did well-」



Rushing passed the falling Olson, the favorite pupil of the inhuman butler leaped out.



The bullets of the enemies lying in wait broke the lower half of Jean's small shield and pierced his stomach. But, as though such thing was just a fly's bite, Jean shot without even a moment of pause. His aim was terrifyingly accurate, the fired bullet destroyed the enemy's head and threw out his brain matter.



The other enemies were going to pull their trigger even now. Normally this would be the time to launch evade & counter attack. But, there was no way he could do that now. He couldn't let even a single bullet of the enemies lurking in this corner to pass behind him.



He bet his pride as the vice captain of the imperial guard. He bet the resolve of her majesty the queen. He bet the trust of his important sister-.



「OoOOOOOOOOH」



「Wha, what the hell, with these guys-」



He tackled toward the three enemies huddling together while his body was receiving bullets. It was a shield bash using the half-broken small shield that was carried on by betting the everything of the imperial guard's vice captain of dragon kingdom Avenst.



It possessed enough might to altogether cut a swath through the three enemies who turned timid from that bloody drive.



In the middle of collapsing on the floor as though tripping over, Jean yelled.



「Take care of Roze-sama! Nee-san-」



「Yes-. Leave it to me!」



Olga and Roze, and then Kuwaibel were rushing through from behind. For a moment, Jean and Roze's gaze tangled.



The thing dwelling inside Roze's eyes. There wasn't any feeling of pity or apology for having others became sacrifice. What was there was merely the color of praise and gratitude.



Beyond doubt, that was a reward for those who accomplished the duty given to them by betting their life.



(That's truly what is worthy, for a warring queen. ……You have become strong.)



Jean's lips unconsciously loosened at that color of heart showed by the queen that he respected.



That was a sight that was like a nightmare for the enemy side that was rallying over their posture. After all there was a man there who kept smiling even while getting blood soaked from receiving many bullets. It was only natural for them to feel so.



Toward them who couldn't help but trickling cold sweats despite being the side in advantage, Jean stood up while saying.



「You guys, feel free to learn the dreadfulness of the person who you turned into enemy. ――Avenst's imperial guard, is a bit stubborn you know?」



A beat later, yells and gunshots echoed from the passage Roze and Olga left behind.



Roze and Olga listened to the gunshots behind them while rushing through the passage following Kuwaibel's guidance.



There wasn't any word, the two of them were merely staring straight ahead.



A few minutes later after rushing through several turns.



「Roze-sama.」



「Yes, it seems we arrived.」



There was a large hall ahead of their gaze. Deeper inside the room there was a large double-leaf door around three meter tall, splendid stone statues of dragon were standing at the left and right. When they tried approaching the door, on the wall there was a largish depression modeled like a hand. Roze wondered if it was a kind of authentication device, but there wasn't anything like machine anywhere. It really looked like nothing more but a depression that was dug out on the wall.



「It cannot be passed by only a monarch dragon. It's meaningless with just a royalty. With a pair as partner together, for the first time the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】will have meaning――I wonder, will the ancient selection recognize me as a king?」



She was a survivor of an usurped country. Sure enough, would she be recognized at a queen of the dragon kingdom……this wasn't any machine, but a door and spring of unknown principle that was said to be created by a true dragon and dragon knight from far in the past.



While feeling a slight anxiety, Roze put her hand on the wall's depression.



Right after that, a silver light ran through the door. It was as though water was flowing into a ditch, silver light traced the door surface and made a large dragon kingdom's crest to surface.



And then, the door――didn't open.



No, more accurately there was a path opened. The double-leaf door didn't open, in exchange something like a shining mirror, or perhaps a membrane was created.



「This is, the door toward the spring?」



Roze muttered to herself. Kuwaibel too, this was his first time seeing it, but he nodded「Pii」as though he understood that inside there was the place that was their objective..



Olga tried to touch the shining membrane. Her finger sunk smoothly. There wasn't any particular sensation. As expected, it seemed they could go inside.



「Roze-sama, let's hurry. Quickly, to save everyo――」



*tan-*



A sound of light plosive sound rang.「Eh?」It was unclear whether that voice leaked out from Olga, or perhaps Roze.



At the very least, the one who vomited out blood was Olga.



「Olga-」



Roze yelled at the same time with Olga jumping at Roze and carried her to retreat in the cover of a dragon statue. Instantly, bullet storm rained down on Roze and co. The dragon statue was solid so although its surface got shaved but it was satisfactorily accomplished a role as defensive wall.



「Olga-, please get a hold of yourself!」



「Gohoh, kafuh」



She must be trying to reply back, but perhaps her trachea was filled with blood, because she only coughed out blood without words. In exchange, she leaned on the dragon statue while pulling out her gun and returned fire toward the soldiers who were firing from the passage before the hall.



There were quite a lot of soldiers. A lot more than the number that Jean and the others were holding back. It was obvious that enemy reinforcement was following behind them using some kind of method.



Olga conveyed using her gaze to Roze so she would advance along with Kuwaibel. The shadow of death was looming on that face. Even from the bleeding amount it was undoubtedly a lethal wound. She must be planning to buy time in this nearly certain death.



Roze looked at that gaze, at the soldiers who looked like they would rush to here anytime now, and then at Kuwaibel who was crying out worriedly.



「Ku-chan-. No, Kuwaibel! Go ahead! I and Olga will hold them back here!」



「Pi!?」



Taking a rifle in hand, Roze leaned out half her body from the dragon statue's cover and returned fire. The moment her face peeked out, in a stroke of bad luck a bullet grazed her cheek. Fresh blood dyed red that smooth face. However, Roze didn't showed any sign of faltering, she continued to pull the trigger in order to buy time for Olga to reload.



「Even if we aren't beside each other, but our hearts are connected. Just like how human and dragon were once like that by the heaven and earth. Now, Kuwaibel. From here on, go by yourself!」



「……Piih」



Kuwaibel softly crawled his tail on Roze's cheek. And then, the moment Roze yelled「Now-」, he flew out from the dragon statue and flew into the light membrane by himself.



The light membrane didn't vanish. Roze whispered「As I thought」with a glance at that. Thinking of the possibility that the spring would stay opened until the monarch dragon was given power, there was no way they could enter together. The light membrane let Olga's finger passed when it was opened.



In other words, the enemy soldiers could also enter into the spring.



If the soldiers rushed into the hall, they would become target for Olga and Roze. This place was optimum for holding back the enemy.



That was why,



「Please show me your figure that become splendid okay, partner.」



Seeing Roze saying that while making a faint smile, Olga who was still continuing to fire with fortitude will even while leaking out wheezing breath also made a small smile.



Their ammo wasn't that many. Thinking of the amount of shooting necessary to maintain the equilibrium, perhaps they could only continue for five minutes. But even before that Olga wouldn't last. If Olga's precise shooting was gone, it would be even quicker for the equilibrium to crumble.



But, even so, Roze and Olga's smile didn't vanish.



「Uguh」



Roze's shoulder was drilled by a bullet. Blood spurted out, painting the girl even more ghastly.



However, her smile didn't vanish.



A lot of sacrifices were created, but they flawlessly let them reached this point.



The last monarch dragon magnificently laid hands on the trump card.



「This is, our victory!」



Roze's words assaulted the soldiers like a bullet.



During the time Roze and others were in a deathly battle deep under the palace, at the surface a similar, no, even fiercer battle was in progress.



『Sanchez squad was done in-. Somone-, can anyone reinforce!?』



『This is Cranks 1(Bovid). Los squad-. We will manage somehow here! Head there for reinforcement!』



『This is Odet 2-. There is only me left! Sink or swim, I'll launch kamikaze attack at the bridge!』



『Cranks 1-, this is Shunt 1! Simon squad is annihilated-. We cannot protect Averia with just us!』



『Siegel 1 here! This is bad-. Rozeria is receiving concentrated fire-. Stan squad and Ester squad follow――』



『Shit-, Siegel 1 fell! Siegel 2 will take over the command! Protect Rozeria!』



Communications of mixed angry yell and scream flitted about in the airspace. The number of the dragon kingdom's sky battlecrafts had been reduced until two third since Roze and others infiltrated the place until now.



To be able to sink seven ships of the defense fleet right after the start of battle could be said as amazing military gains even though it came from an impossible surprise attack. Even after that, further four more ships were felled from the main cannon of airship Rozeria and Averia, the enemy's battle strength was cut in half.



Perhaps, they would be able to even annihilate the enemy at this rate……



There were also people who were thinking such thing, but as expected from the last fortress of the divine country, they weren't that generous. When the defense fleet finally formed their barrier, the attack from Avenst side couldn't pass through to a despairing degree.



Even when airship Rozeria and Averia fired their main cannon from the maximum short distance, it only pierced the barrier slightly and damaged a part of the ship's frame, far from sinking the enemy. The story would be different if they could hit the bridge, but there was no way the defense fleet that was fully operating would give them such opening.



Even the sky battlecrafts that penetrated inside the barrier had their hands full against the enemy sky battlecrafts that could freely enter inside the barrier, they didn't have any leeway to attack the bridge at all, if they recklessly aimed there then that would be a good chance for the ship's weapon or the sky battlecrafts to shoot them down.



And then, the more time passed, the more the enemy put in order their counter attack readiness and they cornered the airship Rozeria and Averia instead.



Furthermore,



『This is, Cline! Damage at Avenst's power mechanism! We won't be able to endure more attack than this!』



Mother ship Avenst that was attacking with manual armaments operated by civilians of all age and gender from above had smokes erupting from its rear hull while starting to tilt in a big way.



The one who was calling for reinforcement with uneasy voice was the captain of mother ship Avenst, Cline Sanders. He who was also the supreme commander was already at the limit and gave an order.



『All sky battlecraft squads focus on protecting Avenst! Rozeria cover for the sky battlecraft squads! Averia, hold position at Avenst's left wing!』



In the first place their role was to buy time. If their attacks couldn't go through properly, then what was left was to focus on defense resolutely and bought time. Mother ship Avenst falling was something that had to be avoided no matter what.



Rozeria and Averia rushed through the airspace in reckless orbit with the resolve to get shot. Both airships were already damaged all over too, but it seemed they still barely possess fighting capability.



Bovid and others distanced themselves from the defense fleet. Barrages were sent like a tsunami from the defense fleet to not let them got away.



The veterans like Bovid and others evaded that with maneuver as though they were possessed while returning to the mother ship Avenst, but the pilots who still hadn't left the immature stage were shot down one after another.



『All squads, report! How many of you are left!?』



The supreme commander of sky battlecraft squads Bovid was shooting down a pursuing enemy sky battlecraft with abnormal maneuver of midair spin while he raised his angry voice.



The returned report was a callous information that further three platoons were annihilated.



Bovid reflexively wanted to curse, but a death god approached from right beside him. A missile was fired from an enemy sky battlecraft that had circled around unnoticed.



The timing was impossible to evade, even so Bovid was going to make a vain struggle and he put strength into his hand that was holding the stick――



「GURYAAAA-」



Right after that, a black flash blew up the missile.



「Ha, hahah. That's a narrow escape from death. Thanks, black dragon-chan.」



「Guruu」



The black dragon that made a small purr as though to say「Don't mind it」while flying in parallel then swiveled in order to support the other sky battlecrafts. Bovid cracked jokes「That frail kid has grown big huh」, but his expression was grim.



Several black dragons were playing very active roles in many fields. Avenst that was unable to maneuver satisfactorily was still not falling was solely because of their efforts.



But, even that was near the limit.



「Your majesty……」



He unconsciously whispered the queen that he respected. 'How much time they have to buy? Is she safe? Will Kuwaibel-sama really able to awaken in the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】? And will that be enough to overturn this war situation?'



He believed. He believed in it, but Bovid who was a veteran soldier couldn't avoid the black mist of unease to be created in his heart.



「You guys-, just a bit more! Go all out! If Avenst is gone when her majesty come back, then it will be our shame for eternity!」



Even so as a captain, he addressed all the squads that everything was absolutely fine. He maintained his subordinates' morale with jokes and encouragement.



But, reality was heartless, and on top of that it was always moving to unwanted direction every time.



『-. Impossible-. Those guys, they are planning to fire their main cannon!? Averia-, Rozeria! Stop them no matter how-』



Cline's scream surged. When Bovid who was taken aback looked below, there was the figure of a ship aiming its main cannon at Avenst above.



It was only natural that Cline was flustered. Right now if Avenst was shot down in this kind of place, it would fall around the palace. The people living around the palace were unmistakably those with considerable post or pedigree even in the divine country.



Therefore, they estimated that the enemy wouldn't use their main cannon in fear of sinking the ship with one shot but……



『Damn it-. So those guys are also absolutely at their limit huh!』



It seemed, there was some fellow there who was unable to suppress their fear, or perhaps their rage from seeing a lot of the defense fleet ships getting shot down.



Airship Rozeria and Averia were charging their main cannon and they were going to fire, but they wouldn't make it in time at all. It went without saying that the sky battlecrafts wouldn't be able to do anything.



Bovid, and then everyone of Avenst imagined the scene of their other home town the nation on ship getting annihilated.



――Charging complete.



It vaguely looked like the other defense fleet ships were also panicking. In the middle of that, the main cannon was finally going to fire at the mother ship Avenst――right before that



――*GOU-*



A silver flash pierced the sky.



「Hah, you're late, your majesty, monarch dragon-sama.」



Saying that Bovid turned his gaze. Surely, it was undoubtedly a sight that was gazed in astonishment by everyone in this battlefield. In fact, even the defense fleet ship that was in the verge of firing also stopped moving.



What pierced the palace vertically, rising from far underground toward the sky was without mistake a pillar of light.



The pillar of light that was thinning down as though melting into air and then vanished stopped still the time of the battlefield.



Before long, a silver flew out into the sky of the world that was filled with silence.



It flew up to the sky like a cannonball, rolled midair and spread its wings wide. The sunlight caused the dragon scales to sparkle, just how beautiful that figure was.



Dragon scales shining silver. Majestic huge body. Dragon eyes that made anyone filled with awe. That figure with its back toward the sun even made anyone felt its divine majesty.



――GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!



That was unmistakably a dragon's howl. No, it was the howl of the dragon king filled with a dominating aura that was worthy for a king.



Silver aura spread out like a ripple. It remained in all the people of the dragon kingdom.



Right after that, the words of the person who everyone surely longed for reverberated.



『Everyone-. Well done in enduring this long! Your queen, your monarch dragon-, are right here!』



A silver monarch dragon. The one standing on that back was their queen whose beauty wasn't lost even soaked in blood――Roze.



This was the moment, the strongest of dragon kingdom Avenst was revived.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 243




AN: Merry~ Christmas~



I'll end Tio's arc next week. This is not a lie. It's true. It's true you know?



Surely the cause was the silver light that enveloped all the people of Avenst. The words of the queen that shouldn't reach resounded toward all the people in this airspace.



『-, Kuwaibel! That warship!』



「Gua!」



Seeing the smoking and tilting mother ship Avenst, and the warship that was in the verge of firing its main cannon toward that Avenst, Roze yelled while showing unease in her face.



The silver monarch dragon――Kuwaibel who was temporarily awakened as a grown up dragon replied shorty to that yell and he threw back his head.



And then,



――GAAAAAAH!!



He released a breath attack along with a howl. The terrific torrent of light shook the air. The silver breath should be called as a pillar of light already. Naturally, the heat amount it possessed was out of common sense.



The pillar of light cut through the sky in a straight line, and then it impacted the ship. The barrier that repulsed all the attacks of Avenst side was flickering fiercely while warping greatly. While the pillar of light was illuminating the world, the pivot of the divine country's protection――after a slight resistance, it vanished as though getting blown away.



The defense battleship that lost its shield was helplessly hit by the light pillar and a big tunnel was opened in its frame. And then the stocked energy of the main cannon exploded, illuminating the world with even more light of destruction.



The defense battleship that exploded everywhere along with explosive blast rained down to a part of the city. Naturally, there was no way the king of dragon would allow that, he raised a loud cry that was different from before. Thereupon, a membrane of extreme light that looked like an aura that covered a part of the city was manifested.



The light perfectly halted all the wreckages and explosion blast, it didn't stop there, it annihilated what it touched from the edge. It seemed it was an offensive barrier that possessed the power of the light pillar.



Silver aurora shined in the sky. Seeing the sight of the raining down presence of death getting stopped, just what did the people of the city who were moving about in confusion at the sudden war situation would feel?



The monarch dragon's howl resounded in the battlefield once more.



「……They return back.」



One man whispered that. It was a man with shabby appearance wearing work clothes that looked like old rag. In the eyes of he who was the people of the former dragon kingdom who was working in a harsh place like a slave since before the dawn, tears were faintly surfacing.



「Okaa-san……what's that?」



「……Don't call them that. They are our king. Our, queen and monarch dragon-sama……they came back for us.」



A skinny girl was looking up at the existence that she was told as a fairy-tale before she slept while pointing with her eyes opened wide. The mother who was embracing her daughter from the side was wiping the warm tears flowing down her dirty face many times while leaking out a sobbing voice.



The people of the former dragon kingdom were mostly lower class people whose human right wasn't guaranteed. They were kept alive only for supporting the extravagant livelihood of the divine country's high class people or the privileged class people, they were that kind of existence.



Just how much they were dreaming for the day their king returned inside their long pained life?



The people who were hiding inside building so that they wouldn't get dragged into the war pushed out their face outside one after another as though led by the calling howl of the monarch dragon.



Like that they witnessed it.



The figure of the monarch dragon flying majestically in the sky. And then, the spectacle of countless light sphere floating brilliantly at the monarch dragon's surrounding. Those were stars of aurora.



The enemy was also similarly just staring at the fantastical sight. While the defense fleet and the sky battlecrafts stopped moving, the monarch dragon Kuwaibel's howl surged up. Falling stars phenomenon occurred.



Great number of extreme light bullets rained down toward the other side of the palace like a meteor shower――at the huge breeding farm located at the opposite side of the city. Yes, it was the breeding farm of the dragons that had supported the matchless sky fleet until now.



Countless explosive sounds resounded, the air was teemed with flash that made it as though the palace was tinged with a halo.



――GAAAAAAAAAAH



The howl of monarch dragon Kuwaibel. That was a call. It informed of the return of the king, it called to wake up, rouse up, it was such calling voice.



――Kuwaaaaa-



――Kyuiiiiiiii-



――oooooOON-



Even feebly, the howls of dragons that responded was definitely emitting delight.



Countless shadow flew up to the sky from behind the palace. The figures of the dragons were small, and fleeting, yet their wings were flapped powerfully to return to the sky. The people who knew of the former dragon kingdom, and even those who didn't, they tightly grasped at their chest similarly, because of the overflowing emotion that couldn't be described.



『……-. Don't get absent-minded! Change target-, shot down that dragon-』



One ship of defense fleet returned to their senses. The ship began to charge its main cannon in hurry while its normal cannon and large caliber anti-air weapon spouted fire.



The warship weapons rapidly approached with a force that looked as though it could blew up the atmosphere to buy time, however, in front of Kuwaibel all those were stopped by barrier of light and they couldn't reach his main body. The barrier rippled, and a beat later the cannonballs and bullets were annihilated. The expression of the attacking battleship's captain paled seeing the figure of Kuwaibel that was staying unmoving calmly.



And then, following his self-defense instinct, he was about to give out instruction for further fuel supply to reinforce the barrier to maximum strength in the same time with the main cannon's charging……



――KUWAAAAAAN-



『-, captain! Dragon core energy's output is declining-. The barrier's strength is lowering!』



『Main cannon's charging rate is reduced-. It will take two minutes until full charge-』



『This is fuel bunker! The dragons are enveloped with strange light! Blade or bullet doesn't work-. Just what in the world is happening!?』



The loud howl of the monarch dragon and reports that made one wanted to run from reality struck the ears.



Monarch dragon Kuwaibel didn't have transforming power like Tio. Therefore, he couldn't make the feeble dragons to rebirth into gallant dragons.



But, he too was a king of dragon beyond doubt. That power similarly existed to protect. The silver light was the proof of divine protection bestowed by the monarch dragon. Under Kuwaibel's sky, laying hand toward the people he decided to protect became a herculean task.



Also, a monarch dragon was able to grant power to other dragons was because they were able to interfere with dragon core. That was to say, a monarch dragon was also able to interfere to a certain degree at things that were using the energy of dragon core.



Because all the battleship of the divine country was using dragon core energy, they were unable to escape from the power of monarch dragon. Of course, a monarch dragon couldn't completely nullify processed energy, even so, it was possible to damp the output in considerable ratio. At the very least, now the conventional weapon of Avenst side could go through.



『Everyone of the dragon kingdom. My name is Roze Phiris Avenst. The queen of dragon kingdom Avenst. He is monarch dragon Kuwaibel. ……You have done well enduring the harsh time for long. Right now, we will take back everything!』



The proclamation resounded loudly in the battlefield.



The liberated dragons flew around in the sky, the light enveloping the defense fleet who boasted of being an impregnable fortress was obviously weakened in a glance.



And then, the howl of monarch dragon thundered.



A beat.



――WAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-



Tremendous joyful cheers rose from everywhere in the city.



Roze made a little smile hearing the great cheer enveloping the city. She patted Kuwaibel's back with a gentle hand, and then she changed completely. She made a war proclamation with expression that possessed both dignity and dominating aura. (TN: A bit of trivia, this dominating aura I sometimes used, in the raw it was written as 'haki', yeah like that one in One Piece)



『Informing the people of Qwailent. Your king's life already scattered in the sky. The fleets, including flagship Durgrant won't return back.』



Roze was convinced. That there was no way for the king of usurpation to survive that battlefield where their friend, a legendary existence was fighting.



Therefore, the words that were announced clearly without mumble possessed the weight of truth, giving a severe blow to the defense fleet and the divine people on the surface whether they wanted it or not. 'What kind of joke is that, saying that their unrivaled king and his strongest battle strength fell in the sky?' Everyone turned into denial for the moment in their mind.



But, if their king was safe……then why, these Avenst's pirate bunches were here? Why, even though they had slipped until this deep, there wasn't even a single ship from the main fleets that returned……



The reality before their eyes coldly struck their disbelieving heart.



『Surrender under the law of dragon kingdom Avenst. If you put down your weapon now then I'll be merciful and spare your life. What we really ought to fight is in the future. The strength of even just one person more is needed for the greatest battle of fixing this broken world. If there is even just a little bit of heart that is thinking of the future inside your heart then surrender.』



Roze's proclamation was surely something that would be called naïve from here on. But, if they stole back because they were stolen from, clashing against hatred with hatred, and they wouldn't stop until the enemy was ruined, then it would be no different with the king of pillage.



She had decided to become the king of soldier. She was determined to build a future.



That was why……



『……Don't believe her-. His majesty is dead is just nonsense! It's impossible for the supreme ruler of the sky to fall! Activate Synthesizer maximum power! All ships, take the head of that pirate!』



A terrible sound wave assaulted Kuwaibel. The evil sound that disturbed dragon core energy and remarkably inhibited the strength of this world's dragon species――that was the reply of the defense fleet toward Roze's words.



「Kuwaaa-」



「-, Kuwaibel!」



For a moment, Kuwaibel looked like he lost his floating power and his altitude jerked down. Although he was a monarch dragon, it didn't change that he was a dragon of this world, he was unable to avoid the fang of Synthesizer. This was the biggest reason why once the monarch dragons and dragons couldn't win against human fleet.



The faces of the dragon kingdom people turned pale seeing that. The captains of the defense fleet made a mocking smile.



「……It's fine, it's fine Ku-chan. You are strong. More than anyone in this world. Far more than even the monarch dragons in the past. I, everyone, believe so. ――」



Roze who was riding on the back of Kuwaibel who was desperately creating floating power even while writhing in pain brought her body close as though to embrace him, she then took a deep breath.



And then, she played an old song that anyone of the dragon kingdom would know. It was the song of Kuwaibel's bond with his partner that had been sung at his all the time since he was born as a lullaby.



Kuwaibel's silver light that was weakening due to Synthesizer recovered its radiance a bit. Floating power was produced properly and he hovered without wavering.



『……Thanks, partner.』



Kuwaibel's words. Normally it was a power of mutual understanding that he seldom used.



There wasn't any unique power in Roze's song. The song was a normal song. Surely even the girl herself had no such intention. She was only thinking if she could support her partner's heart even just for a little with the familiar song. But, something came into effect. That gentle song was certainly protecting Kuwaibel from the attack of atrocious sound wave.



Roze smiled. She couldn't return any words because she was singing, but words were already unnecessary between the two of them.



Kuwaibel's dragon eyes seized the defense battleship aiming its gun turrets at him and they glinted sharply.



『Everyone. Let's fight, together.』



Kuwaibel's words spread like a ripple once more. Those words were certainly conveyed to all the soldiers of Avenst.



Kuwaibel flew out. He evaded the coming missiles to left and right or intercepted using countless light bullets. As long as Synthesizer was in effect, he couldn't launch a breath that could sink down enemy ship in one shot. But, it was a different story if it was from point-blank range.



Other defense battleships circled to both sides and aimed at Kuwaibel.



『I won't let you-』



『This is the stage of Roze-sama and Kuwaibel-sama-. Begone nuisance!』



The captain of airship Rozeria, Cutter, and the captain of airship Averia, Oaks yelled altogether. They attached themselves at Kuwaibel's both flanks and exchanged shots in respond to the defense battleships.



The enemy's sky battlecraft squad attacked from above. Even if they couldn't shot down Kuwaibel himself, the queen riding on his back was another story. If she was killed then it could be imagined how Avenst side would crumble.



『I though you guys will do that yeah. From Cranks 1 to all squads. Cranks squad will provide backup for Kuwaibel-sama! Shunt, Los, the two squads protect Avenst-. All the others hold back the remaining defense fleet!』



Bovid shot down two planes when he passed through them from above with only a few seconds of machine gun strafing, and then he further somersaulted with a maneuver that could only be called as abnormal and pointed his plane's nose downward and really easily shot down two more planes.



As might be expected from the wingmen of the supreme commander, Cranks squad's skill was at inhuman level. Every single one of them was reliably bringing down enemy sky battlecraft with reckless maneuver that was nothing short but abnormal. In addition the black dragons were intercepting missiles and so on that were approaching Kuwaibel.



『Isn't the Synthesizer working!? Shit-, main cannon status!?』



『Charging rate 70%!』



『Chih, so it won't make it in time-. Then……change target-. To mother ship Avenst above!』



The captain of a defense battleship shuddered at the approaching Kuwaibel even through all the barrages. And then, the moment he knew that the main cannon's charging wouldn't make it, he changed the target at Avenst and fired the main cannon.



「Kuwa-」



'I won't let you-', As though to say that, Kuwaibel leaped at the line of fire.



At the same time, he fired a breath of light pillar.



The breath and the main cannon struggled against each other equally. The shockwave of the impact stirred the atmosphere and radiated intense heat wave. In that timing the Synthesizer was cut off for a moment, and immediately after, it was fired in maximum strength. The sound wave attack with rapid change of tempo caused Kuwaibel's light pillar to spontaneously weaken.



「-!?」



The light pillar was overcame. The main cannon approached Kuwaibel. Normally he would doge, but behind him there was the mother ship Avenst. Therefore, Kuwaibel used his body as shield. Fierce impact caused Kuwaibel to rise a soundless anguished voice from his mouth.



But, enduring that, he fired a breath once more.



The light pillar that ran on the sky was like a counter, it pierced the foundation of the main cannon and caused a great explosion.



『-, retreat in full speed while launch concentrated fire with all weapon!』



The angry voice of the defense fleet ship captain resounded, but faster than the order could be executed,



『Dam-――』



「GURYAAAAAAA-」



Kuwaibel's blaze pierced the barrier and blew away the whole bridge.



――Defense fleet seven ships remained



Broken dragon scales were falling off from Kuwaibel's chest. Blood was dripping down and while only slightly his flesh was carbonized.



But, without even paying attention to that, and also because time was too precious even for recovering, Kuwaibel decided his next target. He flapped his wings and accelerated drastically while confirming with a glance that the main cannon of airship Rozeria flying in parallel beside him was going to fire, he then fired a light bullet at Rozeria.



The light bullet accurately hit Rozeria, but different of what would happen to enemy, the bullet didn't inflict damage, rather the radiance of the main cannon was strengthened by a level.



『That's a present from Kuwaibel-sama-. If it miss then there will be no forgiveness-』



Rozeria's main cannon that was fired at the same time with Cutter's scolding splendidly hit one defense battleship. Naturally, the defense barrier rippled and blocked the attack, but in the first place the main cannon with amplified might directly hit the place with weakening output.



Without any way to completely defend, the barrier was smashed apart and a large hole was opened in its flank while the ship tilted. There, light bullets attacked like gatling gun strafing to bring about destruction for sure this time. There was no way the defense battleship that was losing control had any way to endure, its bridge was pierced plenty and the ship sank.



――Defense fleet six ships remained



The enemy was also desperate. Main cannon light from the defense fleet that turned into buckshot shape rushed Kuwaibel. The power dropped considerably, but it was suitable for wide range attack and holding back the target.



「KUWAaa-」



In order to protect the surrounding and the city behind, Kuwaibel created a huge barrier of aurora. It was in the middle of Synthesizer's effect activation, so deploying a barrier of super large scale mercilessly shaved off Kuwaibel's mental strength. Even the immense dragon core energy he stocked from the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】was decreasing with phenomenal rate, like water gushing out from a leaky bucket.



There, a defense battleship that circled to the flank ignored the bombardment from Azeria and directed its main cannon at Kuwaibel. It looked like it was planning to shoot him down even if it had to go down together with him.



A slight unease emerged in Kuwaibel's dragon eyes.



――♪



At that time, he heard a song.



It wasn't the voice of Roze who was continuously singing in order to reduce the power of Synthesizer. It was a voice of a child who he had never heard before.



――♪



――♪



――♪



Singing voices were overlapping. There was the voice of an old age man, and there was also the voice of a young woman. Through the silver light, the singing voice of one person, and then one more person was rising――



『……Thank you.』



The words of thanks that Kuwaibel gave reached clearly. To the people of the dragon kingdom singing on the ground.



The song of the people that was dedicated to the king. Assemble, assemble, be added into the song of protection. Not only being protected. When it was necessary their will to fight could be offered up, that was the pride that the people of dragon kingdom Avenst held.



The main cannon of the defense battleship fired.



The light of death pushed on toward Kuwaibel who couldn't move from maintaining the barrier.



But, Kuwaibel's dragon eyes weren't colored by unease anymore.



『It's all right, partner.』



『I know, partner.』



Roze's words, and Kuwaibel's reply.



The flash of main cannon directly hit Kuwaibel――right before that happened, it was swallowed inside the breath Kuwaible released. Like a river with the tide reversed, the light pillar swallowed the silver flash and went straight ahead, without stopping it pulverized the defense battleship.



――Defense fleet five ships remained



The buckshot main cannon ceased. When the barrier of light vanished as though melting into the air, there was the figure of Kuwaibel clad in meteor of extreme light.



『-, barrier full pow――』



The meteor drowned out the command of some captain. In the middle of the overflowing singing voice that resounded through the whole city, the extreme light of Kuwaibel who was displaying thorough strength smashed the barrier of defense fleet with just bullet strafing.



『We are joining! Averia, target at two o'clock! Rozeria, target at nine o'clock! All sky battlecrafts, ram all the missiles you have at five o'clock target!』



A directive came from Avenst's captain Cline.



At the same time when Kuwaibel's breath of pillar light shot at the defense battleship in front, airship Averia and Rozeria fired their main cannon at their respective target. In addition, the air battle squads of Bovid and co also fired all their last missiles from all planes.



『……Impossible. We are, the chosen people――』



Some captain of the defense fleet whispered. That was his last whisper in this world.



The light of the sun displayed a complete dawn. In the world that was filled with light, a gigantic flower bloomed. Decorated by flame blasts and thunderous roars, the flower of the blue sky displayed the curtain closing of a history.



On the ground, the people of dragon kingdom were staring dumbfounded at the flame blasts of five ships of defense fleet blossoming in full glory, a beat later a terrific cheer that sounded like it would shake the earth and split the sky was raised. And then, it was the people of the divine country who were watching dumbfounded at those people cheering and the defense fleet falling.



With one soldier dropping his weapon *clang* as the beginning, weapons were thrown down one after another. Even the people who weren't soldier realized the crumbling of their glory had strength leaving their waist and the flopped down on the ground.



That was what displayed it clearly.



Yes, the sky divine country Qwailent that was created by the king of usurpation, right now, in this time, its history was put to an end.



At the sky above the city that was erupting with cheers, the airships and sky battlecrafts with mother ship Avenst in the lead were approaching Kuwaibel who was hovering calmly with Roze riding on his back.



「Your majesty, Kuwaibel-sama. That was a splendid fight. I can say that it was truly a victory that will remain in history.」



Bovid in a tattered sky battlecraft was using the plane's vertical takeoff function to somehow hover beside the two was giving them his honest praise.



Kuwaibel and Roze instantly opened their eyes and they looked at each other's face……



「Puh. Bovid using honorific language……」



『It, it doesn't suit you……』



「Youu braats」



The two burst into laughter at the speech and gesture that didn't suit the sky battlecraft squads supreme commander who was normally accustomed with pirate manner. Sharp words like『You reap what you sow』, or『Indeed that really doesn't suit you』, or『Was the battle too extreme it finally got into your head?』came from the radio. Bovid had no ally.



Bovid's expression turned completely sulky, but there was a smile that couldn't be hidden on his lips. It seemed that sentiment was also shared by other people who were talking to Roze and Kuwaibel through the radio, even while talking frivolously there was joy that was impossible to hide seeping into their voices.



「Everyone, really, you all really had fought well. Our dearest wish has come true. The path to the future is cut open. Thank you, really thank you. You all followed someone like me along until here. Really……」



Roze who was sitting still in a girl posture on Kuwaibel's back with a distorted face looked like she was going to burst crying anytime. There were even people who were already crying in sympathy.



That was just how long they had continued to fight the long painful fight until now. Therefore, this moment today was more than enough to make an emotion that was beyond description to well up inside them.



Inside the world that shook from the joyful cheers, the people of Avenst closed their eyes as though to immerse in the overflowing emotion. That was to digest their happiness, and at the same time it was also to remember their war buddies who had gone ahead of them.



「……Now, everyone. There is a mountain of things to do. You can slowly immerse in your sentiment later, let's do what we ought to do right now. Also someone, please take out Olga from the hold in the palace that Kuwaibel opened. There is no danger to her life with Kuwaibel's power, but she is wounded really seriously.」



「……Roger. Your majesty, what about the others outside Olga?」



「……. Jean and others……their life or death is unknown. Please make the squad send to suppress the palace to carry out search and rescue at the same time.」



「Acknowledged.」



Everyone in that place guessed it from Roze's instruction and expression. There weren't many words exchanged, with Cline's instruction the ground suppression squad headed toward the palace using small boat from mother ship Avenst.



After seeing that off, Roze and others looked down to the ground. There were the figure of the people waving their hand there while shedding tears.



「Your majesty. Your proclamation.」



Roze nodded strongly at Bovid's words.



She urged Kuwaibel, and they calmly exposed their appearance while flying above the city. It was for the purpose of notifying the return of the king and declared the revival of dragon kingdom Avenst above the palace.



Behind them, the mother ship Avenst, airship Rozeria, Averia, and then the sky battlecraft squads followed in a march.



The people's cheers were increasingly heightening at the miraculous sight and the liberated dragons danced above the sky as though in blessing.



People were gathering in front of the palace without end. It seemed that the soldiers also didn't have any will to fight already, so they were under the watch of the ground suppression squad with both their hands raised up.



Above there, Kuwaibel who was shining silver reflecting the light of the sun even with wounds all over his body was hovering still, on his back Roze was standing.



Even while soaked in blood and wound that displayed the fierce battle, her figure that held her head high was beautiful. For the people who knew about the old fairy-tale, her figure was truly that of the「legendary dragon knight」itself.



Comfortably, while pouring gaze of affection at the people who were directing bright eyes at her, Roze took a deep breath. So that her voice would reach clearly, the silver light from her partner the monarch dragon showered down.



『Everyone. The beloved people of dragon kingdom Avenst. Once more, I'll introdu――』



Roze was going to introduce her name once again to make clear who she was――



At that time,



『The bloodline of king……so it still survive……』



A voice encroached the world.



Right after that, the beautiful world that was illuminated brilliantly by the light of sun was being covered by muddy black cloud that was suddenly generated. Like a drop of ink splattered on a white paper, the dark clouds overwrote the world. Sandwiched between the sea of clouds that rained down black rain below and the dark clouds generated further above, Roze and others fell into a hallucination as though they were imprisoned at the interstice of world.



「Wha, what?」



『Just now……』



Bovid and others yelled「Your majesty-」in vigilance while rushing toward her. During that time Roze looked up at the sky dumbfounded, and Kuwaibel looked at the surrounding with shaken eyes in disbelief.



Flash of lightning began to ran in the sky. The thundering sounds gave the people fright whether they wanted it or not. In the gloomy world, horrifying words that sounded like boiled down essence of negative emotion resounded.



『Suffer――』



『Gasp, writhe――』



『Scream』



『Lament――』



『Lose everything――』



『Run screaming――』



『Fear』



Those were words of curse. Those words cursed the world, human, the brethrens, all living things in this world. It echoed, overlapping in many layers, as though several hundred or thousand existences were reciting in resounding voice.



『Die』



It was black and encroached slimily. The people's hearts that were filled with hope were being dyed with terror and despair.



That fallen person only wished for one thing.



『――In the end of suffering』



The world shook.



『Be destroyed』



Squall mixed with thundering lightning and black mist blew violently. A huge tornado was generated from the dark clouds that locked the sky, from inside it, "that" showed its figure.



「……Evil dragon……Helmut」



『……』



Roze murmured with a trembling voice.



While everyone was ruled by despair and terror, there was only one dragon who was staring straight at that person. (TN: While I use person here, but it still refer to Helmut)



Those eyes conceived inside them sadness, the happiness of finally being able to meet, and then an unshakeable resolve.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Today, or from a few days ago the published version of Arifureta volume 5 is in the middle of sale.



At the same time, the comic version volume 1 is also on sale.



I uploaded the detail in my activity report, so if it please you please try to take a look.



For everyone the villager of a certain loner village, and also for everyone of a certain Casanova village, it will make me happy if this can be a good thing for killing time for the end-of-year.



Today, if possible I'll upload the Christmas special after story at 6 P.M if possible.



Perhaps, surely……



Also about the update next week……



Please rest assured. I won't suffer the brats! I'll ipload a hour before the starting time!



After all I need to prepare things like the meal or the drink or the snack, I got to prepare them all flawlessly.



Well then all of you Narou people, have a good year!





Chapter 244




AN: This is not what you think.



I only planned for around 5000 characters.



But when I noticed it already passed 9 o'clock, when I noticed it already went 10000 characters.



This is holy night after all, it's not strange that a mysterious thing will happen.



……



Also warning.



I updated Tio arc today before this chapter.



For those who haven't read it, please read it too without fail.



At the time of year that was already beyond the middle of December where snow was sparsely falling from the cloudy sky. In order to resist the severe cold, while the kotatsu and heater were raising humming sound, the people of Nagumo family were eating with relish a warm specially made stew (the ingredient was an UMA lurking at an unexplored region of earth).



「It will be Christmas soon huh……. Myuu, what kind of Chrstimas present you want this year?」



「Myu?」



The lovely beloved daughter asked Hajime with her cheeks stuffed with the meat that came from UMA but was terribly delicious, looking like a squirrel.



Myuu hurriedly swallowed the meat of something *mokyu mokyu* and then she showed a thinking gesture for a bit before answering with a wide smile.



「Pile bunker!」



「……」



Papa stiffened spontaneously still with a smiling face. Indeed, he gave her present of numerous artifact weapons at the amusement park last year, but as expected Hajime was troubled of how to answer when he was getting coaxed for a demolition weapon with this kind of pure smiling face without any cloudiness.



Myuu who seemed to treat Hajime's speechlessness as refusal got dejected. And then, with an upturned gaze and reserved tone, she coaxed for another thing as though to observe at Hajime's reaction.



「It's fine, even if it's just Hyperion.」



The destructive power was raised. Just what in the world was reserved from this kid…….



Sumire and Shuu were desperately enduring their laugh with trembling shoulders at the dialogue between Hajime and Myuu. Yue and Shia looked exasperated, and Tio looked admiring. Amidst that, Remia who was unable to just watch spoke justification in the place of her daughter.



「I'm sorry dear. Good grief this child, she is pleading for something outrageous again……. Regrettably, it looks like that she is influenced by the game she is recently playing.」



「Game? A game that make you want pile bunker or sunlight convergence laser, just what kind of game that is?」



「It looks like a war game with the stage at the near future.」



Hajime turned his gaze at Myuu with a question「Is that so?」in his eyes. Myuu made a gun shape with her fingers and then spoke words that seemed to be a signature phrase with a posed look.



「I'm gonna dye everything crimson yeah! Nano」



「I'm confiscating it right now. Tou-san, we are putting restricting in Myuu's PC! A strong one! Help me later!」



Surely the geography of somewhere would change the next day after a Hyperion was gifted. Hajime who was shuddering asked for cooperation in a hurry at Shuu.



But, Shuu in question was instigating「Hyuu-, Myuu-chan is so cool!」together with Sumire. And then, Myuu was also saying terrifying thing like「That's cruel papa! Myuu had finally obtained a nuclear nano! Even though I'm looking forward to use it in the next war!」.



Hajime in his own way was responding「It's no good picking up something like that! Toss it away, far away!」for some reason. Myuu puffed up her cheeks like balloon. It seemed she was dissatisfied.



Hajime felt that it appeared he was at disadvantage talking about Christmas present and for the time being he beat a tactical retreat. ……The demon king-sama who came to kill even a god right from the front was running away from an argument about present with his daughter.



'Cough' Hajime papa cleared his throat and diverted the topic.



「Aa~, come to think of it Myuu. What about the condition of Belfegoor and others? Are their transformation mechanism working normally?」



「Yep! It's amazing nano! They went gashon-gashon, it's totally cool nano! Also the other artifacts are just like Myuu want it nano! As expected from papa! Thank you nano!」



「I see. That's great. But……there is nothing dangerous in there so I created them normally without particular care, in the end, what are you going to use them for?」



Hajime who breathed out in relieve at the successful topic change asked Myuu casually. It was about around a week ago, Myuu suddenly strongly begged him, she said she wanted the living golems to be installed with transformation mechanism and also several artifacts that felt like they could become necessary tool for a spy somewhere.



Recalling that, Hajime asked curiously after this late, but ahead of his gaze, his beloved daughter who he believed would surely answer him with a smile was……



「……My, Myuu will put them to use for a peaceful activity, nano.」



「……」



For some reason her gaze was swimming around and she returned a vague answer. The mouth of the little girl who was saying the desire to dye the world crimson just now, was speaking peaceful activity suspiciously. Hajime papa's eyes naturally turned staring fixedly.



「……」



「……」



Hajime papa's fixed eyes were staring fi~xedly. The gaze of the suspicious Myuu was swimming around even more.



Stare~. Fidget fidget. Stare~~. Twitch-, fidget fidget.



「……Well, I'm not going to forcefully ask though.」



「Nmyu」



After everything, Hajime had faith that Myuu wouldn't use it for something stupid and he made a small wry smile before removing his pressing gaze. Myuu let out a relieved sigh while her cheeks loosened up limply at Hajime papa who gave her his trust. Hajime also smiled gently.



「……Really, what a similar parent and child.」



「Isn't that right. Like their way to dodge the topic or the way they escape. Every year they are turning more similar.」



「Rather, doesn't Goshujin-sama noticed? Before thinking about game, Myuu's dangerous speech and action art mostly coming second hand from Goshujin-sama.」



「Ufufu. For Myuu, Hajime-san is also her idol after all.」



「Even so an elementary school student asking for pile bunker or laser cannon is still not normal though. As expected from my granddaughter!」



「That! My granddaughter is in different level compared to those other elementary school students.」



The whispering conversation of the wives and Nagumo spouses caused Hajime and Myuu to feel like running away and they concentrated at the stew pretending to not hear anything. That harmonious behavior of the parent and daughter made the dining table to be enveloped in laughter.



「……Putting aside the present, where is Myuu want to go at the Christmas day?」



Myuu began to be troubled「Uu~n」at Yue's question. Was it fine if they went to the same amusement park like last year? Or else, should they called her friends and papa's underlings(classmates) to party?



Myuu hummed 'un un' while wracking her head about what kind of Christmas should they have. Seeing her like that, Hajime suggested with a smile.



「Then, how about staying over somewhere at the Christmas Eve day? Like overseas, or another world.」



If Myuu wished it, then he would take her anywhere for sure. Hajime papa declared that full of vigor, but it seemed that today was a day where he would eat the counter of his daughter to the utmost.



「Ah, that's impossible nano.」



「? Impossible? It's not that you don't want it?」



「Nano. Myuu have a plan for the whole day in Christmas Eve.」



「You are going to go play with your friends ?」



Hajime asked while putting UMA meat into his mouth,



「It's not playing nano.」



He stiffened. In the day of Christmas Eve, she wasn't going to play with her friends, or spent time with family. However, she had a plan that wasn't playing. What's more it would take the whole day. *drip* A cold sweat trickled from Hajime papa's forehead.



「Myuu. What's your plan?」



Without even any leeway to feel doubt at Yue who was holding her laughter beside him for some reason, papa asked with a feeling of「Don't tell me」, but



「……It, it's a secret from papa nano.」



「What……the……」



*clang* Hajime dropped his spoon. His expression was in shock. Hajime papa couldn't hide his shaken feeling at "the secret of his beloved daughter" that he had never met even once until now.



「Spe, speak honestly, Myuu. Surely in that plan of yours you are going to meet someone, and that someone is a girl right?」



「……Myuu will meet various people, so of course there is also man nano.」



It was a critical hit at Hajime's mind. His beloved daughter said that she would meet a man at the Christmas Eve! What's more, it wasn't "boy" but "man". Okay, finally it's your turn after so long pile bunker. For the pervert lolicon bastard who dare to aim at the family's daughter, a present of lovely scrap time!



Perhaps feeling the turbulent sign from Hajime who stood up wordlessly, Myuu gulped down her remaining stew and said「Thanks for the food!」before she left the living room with fast pace *sutetete-*. The overly fast movement caused Hajime papa who was in the middle of feeling shaken unable to even call out at her.



But, just when he thought so, Myuu's face popped out from the living room's entrance. And then, she stared fi~~~xedly at Hajime and,



「Papa. If papa try to follow or investigate Myuu's matter at the Christmas Eve……Myuu, won't speak to papa anymore nano.」



「Gofuh!?」



Hajime's knees collapsed. Without being able to even stop Myuu who rushed *sutetete-* once more to her room, he was crawling on all fours without even the slightest twitch. The damage was grave!



「A godslayer crushed with a sentence……fumu. Perhaps it's only Myuu who art able to do something like this whether before or after.」



「Ahaha~. Hajime-san is weak against Myuu-chan even more than against Yue-san in a sense after all.」



Tio and Shia were giggling leisurely. Yue and others also nodded at them in agreement.



But, the next moment, Hajime stood up in a flash. And then, with an expression that gave uneasy and emaciated impression,



「Nagumo family meeting! The, the……the whatever many times of Nagumo family emergency family meeting will be hold! The topic is about the trashy scum bastard following about our daughter!」



Naturally, everyone was continuing their meal normally.



The day of Christmas Eve.



In the palace of another world Tortus, work was being done routinely without anything particular happening. The busy officials were running about or else they were dealing with paperwork bit by bit on their desk.



In a room of such palace――in the office of Hairihi kingdom's king, a boyish king who still hadn't really fit the atmosphere or the desk size yet was moving his pen with a fed up expression.



「Your majesty, will you take a rest soon?」



「Mu. No, I'll do it a bit more. Elder sister is not here. If work is piling up during such time then it will be too shameful. Or rather, just how did elder sister finished this amount of work always in that kind of short time huh?」



「She was doing them normally you know? Only, it was done with astonishingly fast motion though.」



「……Since I was enthroned and also did my duty, now that I've recently get used with the work, I often think this but……elder sister is human right?」



「……Your majesty. You will be scolded by Liliana-sama you know?」



The warning voice from the troubled private secretary made Liliana's little brother, his majesty the current generation king of Hairihi kingdom――Randell to sigh deeply「Haa」, while thinking「Elder sister, won't he come back quickly I wonder」.



「If I remember correctly, she was invited for earth event called "Kurushimasu" right? She looked really merry when she was picked up directly by that guy.」(TN: Christmas in Japan is read Kurisumasu. Kurushimasu meant suffering.)



「Your majesty, it's "Christmas". Your pronunciation makes the supposedly joyful event to sound like a hell torture.」



Recalling his sister who was in high spirits since the morning thinking of that hateful son of a bitch, Randell let out a deep sigh. His first love was taken away by that person, but he didn't stop there, that man even bared his poisonous fang toward the sister that he respected. Randell swore「I'll punch you flying someday」. Inside his heart. He wouldn't say it out loud no matter what.



Randell's feeling became as though he had bitten something bitter, but suddenly, he recalled a certain character and he muttered to himself.



「……Is it no good, if I also go there?」



「It's no good.」



He was cut down easily by the private secretary. Randell went「But you see」「However, still」acting fidgety and restless for some reason with an indecisive attitude. The private secretary who knew what was inside the heart of such boyish king held back from sighing while opening his mouth to say something in persuasion――



At that time,



「MERRY-!! CHRISTMAA――――SS!! NANO!!!」



「Hiih!? What's going on!?」



Suddenly the office's window was threw open loudly, from there a red shadow flew in like a bullet. Randell hugged himself with both hands like a girl while jumping to his feet. The private secretary also twitched from the sudden happening, yet he rushed forward to protect his majesty from the intruder.



「Wait, Myuu-sama!?」



「Whaaat!? Myuu you say!?」



Shocked voices were raised when they saw the true identity of the intruder. Randell who was shaking in his boots behind the desk also threw his gaze at Myuu who was quickly smoothing over her appearance.



「No, I'm not Myuu. I'm Santa Claus!」



Myuu who was wearing red and white clothes was indeed wearing the appearance of Santa. Her lower body was clad in mini skirt and short boots, it was a cute clothes that were arranged with frills and fluffy pompon all over. Her head was wearing a droopy Santa hat and she was carrying a large bag on her shoulder. All those factors certainly made her a Santa-san.



Myuu twirled with a beautiful rotation as though to show off her exclusive Santa cosplay created by her family for her. She stood sideways and winked with peace sign over her eye. It was the signature pose like a certain idol somewhere! *Sparkle-☆* Such sound effect could be hallucinated from that!



「Cu, cute……」



The male Randell. It seemed he got one hit KO-ed from the *Sparkle-☆*. He was staring at Myuu in intoxication.



The private secretary who sensed somehow that the king seemed to be of no use was wondering 'Just what is the security of the palace doing……. No, this is the daughter of his majesty the demon king, anything is possible isn't it, haha.' He whispered so inside his heart while asking with a voice that was oozing out tiredness.



「Myuu-sama, just what are you doing? What about the plan of enjoying "Christmas" with Liliana-sama?」



「I'm not Myuu nano. I'm santa nano. Santa will distribute present in Christmas nano.」



「Present, is it?」



The secretary tilted his head. With a glance at Randell who was still in a daze, Myuu fished around inside her white bag. Like that what she took out was two beautifully wrapped bundles.



「Merry~ Christmas! These are presents from Santa to the two good children nano!」



「My, Myuu is giving me present? Uu, Myuu, someone like you is really……」



「Oh, for me too? Fufu, this is truly a happy surprise.」



The eyes of the secretary who received the present turned round while also accepting it happily. He guessed that it seemed Myuu was going around distributing present in accordance with this event called Christmas. It felt like his everyday tiredness was blown away, and he was making a really warm expression.



On the other hand, Randell was whispering things like「Myuu is giving me present. To purposefully go as far as crossing world for my sake……. Hah, don't tell me, Myuu is actually having feeling for me!?」.



「Well then you two, work hard nano! Santa will give present to other people too nano!」



「Yes, Myuu-sama. Thank you very much for the present.」



While the private secretary and Myuu were exchanging harmonious words of parting, Randell whose expression was feverishly delirious returned to his senses suddenly.



「Wa, wait a second, Myuu!」



「?」



「Tha, that's. It's. ……If you like, won't you spend today with me? I'll personally prepare a return gift for you!」



The secretary gave a straight-man retort through his gaze「You, read the atmosphere. Rather, she just said that she is giving present to other people too」. The young king didn't even pay attention to his private secretary's expression and was desperate to stop Myuu from leaving.



Randell kept prattling on and on while glancing repeatedly at Santa Myuu with blushing cheeks.



Just from this, it could be guessed that Randell whose first love was scattered that much was now falling into a difficult love once more. During the few times of his contact with Myuu when she came to play in the palace when brought along by that guy, Myuu who interacted with him friendlily different from other people of the same age around him, and also seeing how their age was relatively close caused him to fall for her so easily.



Myuu who was tilting her head at such Randell didn't know about what was inside his heart, but she could guess that Randell was trying to make her stay and with a cheerful smile she――



She declared to Randell whose expression turned bright seeing her smile.



「Randell's eyes are always indecent so no way.」



「!?」



Randell turned into stone. Myuu dealt additional blow at him still with a smile!



「Papa told me nano. Myuu must not get near that kind of man. That's why Randell, don't get too close to me nano!」



「Kahah」



The male Randell. Even after becoming a king he fell on his knees. Seeing his majesty who was on all fours while holding his chest, the private secretary sent him a look of sympathy. Myuu said「Bye bye nano~」while jumping out from the window.



Later on at the palace, the voices of the servants and soldiers who were happy with the surprise present from the cute Santa could be heard mixed with the crying voice of the young king who screamed「That bastard(demon king), I'll murder him somedayyyyyy-」in an outburst of anger.



*whoosh-* The sound of a sharp slash resounded, and a fiendish monster was crumbling in two.



「Fuu. Is this the last of them?」



The one who whispered was a young man wiping the sweat on his forehead with his hand――Amanogawa Kouki. After many twists and turns, he who had saved several other worlds was even now working hard like this to remove the threat to people as an adventurer.



「Kouki-san, great work.」



「We are finished too over here, Kouki.」



From inside the deep forest, the two who appeared pushing through the grasses were Kouki's party members, the former goddess-sama and former queen-sama of another world. These two were also female hunter who were currently competing for Kouki also after many twists and turns.



「Aa, thanks for your hard work you two. You two aren't injured right?」



「Everything's fine. The strength of a goddess is not so small that monsters of this level can possibly do anything.」



「Former goddess you mean? Also, certainly what is small isn't your strength but your breast there.」



「Aa? I'll turn you into cinders you know? Queen (lol).」



「Oh? Just try it if you actually can, no good goddess.」



Just like usual, Kouki was starting to take distance bit by bit while staring with eyes that looked like dead fish toward the former goddess and former queen at both his sides who were glaring from really close as though seeing each other's parent's killer.



But, at that time Kouki's presence detection detected an unknown existence approaching them with terrific speed.



(-, fast!?)



Kouki opened his mouth to warn the two at the same time when that fell from the sky.



What landed with an impact that shook the ground was,



「Re, reindeer?」



Kouki was spontaneously dumbfounded.



Yes, it was a reindeer. With bright red nose. However, it was super big with length that was almost three meter long.



The red nosed reindeer-san stared slightly at the dumbfounded three people, and then its mouth suddenly fell open. Inside it there was a fiendish object that looked really familiar for Kouki……



「Why is it hereee!?」



Kouki yelled such thing while he wasted no time to hold the other two and evaded from the line of fire. It was at that moment, *dopan-* a bursting sound and flash that were also familiar surged out, blasting away an enemy approaching from behind Kouki and others that Kouki had also detected.



Kouki put down beside him the former queen-sama and former goddess-sama who were still dumbfounded and he stared at the mechanical death god reindeer-san while his cheeks were twitching. Thereupon,



「MERRY~~, CHRISTMASSS!」



「Myuu-chan……. So it's you.」



Kouki hung his head down crestfallenly. Santa Myuu's face peeked out all of sudden from the reindeer's back, and with a hop she flew and twisted midair with a triple turn before landing beautifully.



「Why are you in this kind of place? That outfit……aah, today is Christmas huh.」



「Correct nano. For hero-san who has been a good child through this one year, there is a present from Santa nano!」



「Hahah, I see. ……A Santa who make an entrance by riding a grim reaper……as expected from Nagumo's daughter.」



Toward Kouki who was muttering with a subdued air, Myuu returned a package while saying「Yes! Merry Christmas!」. Myuu also handed over present to the former goddess and former queen-sama who were still dumbfounded.



「Thank you Myuu-chan. Can I look inside?」



「It's fine, but Myuu is really busy getting around the world nano. That's why, I'm leaving already nano.」



Myuu jumped on the slaughter reindeer-san――actually the inside was Belfegoor――and then she said「Bye hero-san! I wish you a good another world summoning next year too!」while flying away.



「Don't give me that kind of ominous prayer!」



Kouki's shout ended in vain, the figure of the demonic reindeer-san that reached the speed of sound instantly was already gone.



Kouki let out a long sigh while he tried opening the wrapping of the small present carefully. Even after everything he said, he opened the wrapping while his cheeks were loosening that he was also given a Christmas present.



「Hm? This is……ring?」



What came out from the box were pair rings. On the small paper that was included inside,「They are engagement rings! Please give it to someone that you love!」was written with round characters.



Kouki got drenched with sweats from a bad feeling.



「Kouki-san, thank you very much. For you to prepare this ring of eternal oath, I'm really happy.」



「Kouki? Naturally, you will give it to me right? Right?」



Over both his shoulders, the former queen-sama and former goddess-sama were peering in smilingly wrapped in muddy black aura. Kouki was about to activate Ground Shrinker reflexively to take distance, but the two tightly grasped his shoulders simultaneously.



「Kouki-san-」



「Kouki!」



*creak* Unpleasant sound rang from Kouki's both shoulders.



Kouki's eyes turned into dead fish eyes once more while at the bottom of his heart he yelled at the small Santa who presented him with pair rings despite preparing presents for three people.



「YOU-, DEMON KING"S DAUGHTEERRRRRRRRRRRRRRRR-」



After that, it went without saying that the thunderous sounds of the struggle for the pair rings resounded deep inside the forest. And then, it also went without saying how later Kouki went around bowing his head at every related place for the reckless destruction of nature.



At Britain in the bureau chief office of the national security bureau,



「Haa~~~」



Such dee~~p sigh was let out. The one whose eyebrows twitched in reaction to that was the person who was wholly famed as a walking and clothed cool-headedness, Chief Sharon Magdanese.



「Haa~~~~~~~」



「……」



A sigh even deeper than before caused an irritating air inside the chief office. Vein was starting to emerge on Chief Magdanese's forehead. There, even more sigh assaulted.



「Depressing.」



「Hih!?」



Chief Magdanese who snapped threw a paper knife. The owner of sigh who immediately shook his head while raising a pathetic scream unconsciously――Allen saw the paper knife passed through right beside his forehead, without stopping the knife stabbed *pasun* on the wall behind him.



「Wai-, what are you doing, chief!」



「I said it already, it's depressing. Just what's with you since some time ago?」



Chief Magdanese sent a gaze that was even colder than the open air of winter at Allen who was the cause of the irritating atmosphere in the chief office with his deep sigh.



Allen twitched from such gaze, even so he spoke his reason.



「No, because, this situation makes me want to sigh. Chief, today is Christmas you know! Through the world now lovers are having a date, they are preparing and flirting in preparation for tomorrow, they are having their fill for that kind of embarrassingly happy event, yet when it come to me, I'm doing work work work in this kind of place from morning until night. Tomorrow will be work too! Just what is the meaning of this!」



「Even if you say that, there are a lot of other staffs other than you who are also doing work.」



「That's true! But, Paradis-san, she is normally having holiday giggling and making merry! Aby-san and others too, they are having embarrassingly happy event! You know, yesterday she already wore Santa hat while working! Just seeing that atmosphere of her that said『I'm really looking forward for tomorrow!』, my heart is already at the limit……」



「Be relieved. I put Paradis's Santa hat into cutting machine right in front of her eyes yesterday.」



「Cruel-. No, not that, even if there is something like that but the emptiness inside me isn't mitigated at all.」



「You don't have a lover anyway so it's pointless whatever you say. Just keep with your wild dream.」



「Cruel-. Uu, isn't there a woman somewhere who will be kind to me……」



Allen grieved. There a voice resounded.



「Thinking that is the case, I came! Merry Christmas!」



「OoOOU!?」



「-」



Allen reflexively pulled out a gun and rushed toward Magdanese, and Magdanese who held her breath. When both of them turned toward the ceiling from where the voice came――



「Merry Christmas! Granny Sharon! Also Allen!」



「Myuu……」



「Myuu-chan!?」



The pane of the ceiling was taken off and there was the upside-down face of Myuu suddenly peeking out from there. Let's say this in advance, the ceiling of the chief office wasn't constructed with detachable pane. It was protected with steel plate twenty millimeter thick.



Actually, Magdanese and others accomplished having a meeting with demon king family with Lord Abyssgate's introduction. Naturally, they also became acquaintance with Myuu. However, for some reason Myuu seemed to be pleased with Magdanese and since then she called her "Granny Sharon" intimately.



Although it was a wide world, the one who called the national security bureau chief who even terrorist would beg at for their life while crying as "granny" was surely only Myuu. It went without saying that not just Allen, all the bureau staffs accompanying them including Vanessa opened their eyes wide hearing that. The shock was so great that Myuu was talked as a legendary super little girl within the bureau even now.



*thud* Myuu landed after somersaulting midair like a cat which caused Magdanese and Allen to make a really speechless expression.



After【Berserk Case】which was the first case they solved with Lord Abyssgate, they went through many more cases where there was quite a lot of chance for them to meet Myuu. Therefore, they only knew too well that Myuu wasn't just a mere little girl.



But, for the specially strictly guarded chief office of the security bureau that should be impossible to even be infiltrated by the average agent to be so easily penetrated……



「Granny Sharon! Merry Christmas! For granny who is working really hard this year too, there is a present from Santa nano!」



「This naughty angel.」



「Chief!?」



Magdanese turned into a mere Granny Sharon. Chief office's security? Security bureau's honor? In front of the angel's smile those were trivial matters.



Allen's eyes opened wide seeing the warmly smiling Magdanese. Even now he felt like fainting.



When Magdanese tried opening the present, there was a simple necklace inside.



「See, about that, just by wearing it will make blood circulation better, and it will take off fatigue. It's so Granny Sharon can be healthy all the time!」



「The words just now already make me able to fight for a hundred years more. Thank you, Myuu.」



「No, chief. That's already just a monster――」



*sukon-* A fountain pen stabbed Allen's forehead. Allen screamed「Noo-OOOOH」while flopping around with his hands pressing on his bleeding forehead. The pen was pretty much stopped by Allen between his bare hands before it could go through, so only the tip pierced in, but something painful was painful.



Myuu approached such teary eyed Allen with trotting steps and her small hand caressed Allen's head.



「Are you an angel?」



「I'm Santa.」



Toward Allen who became even more teary eyed from being treated kindly, Myuu offered a present「Here, Allen. Merry Chris!」.



By the point of time he was called without any honorific by an elementary school student, it could be seen just in what level Allen's position inside Myuu, but the Christmas present from a girl although a young one caused Allen's tear duct to finally burst.



「Uu, even though I'll absolutely make you happy if only you were born ten years faster」



「Sleep-talking when you are asleep, nano.」



The ears of Allen who was in the middle of feeling moved beautifully ignored the stinging words.



Floods of tears were flowing from Allen while he opened the thin sealed envelope. It felt complicated to call the item a present when it was something that only looked like a letter, but for the current Allen it was something irrelevant.



And then, while he was reading the letter inside the envelope, tears were starting to flow out even more like a waterfall from Allen.



「Thi, this is, real? It's not a prank, or a fake for surprise?」



「Yep. Myuu was only entrusted with the letter. What's left depend on Allen nano.」



「Hi, hi, hi――」



「Hi?」



Magdanese directed a disgusted gaze at Allen who was suddenly starting to repeat「hi」as though he was convulsing, but the moment she quietly evacuated Myuu away, Allen yelled「Hyaho―――――――ii!!」while jumping up.



Without pausing he then got so high spirited it made anyone wonder if he was going to ascend to heaven soon while hopping around inside the office.



「Myuu. What is that letter?」



「It's from an onee-chan that is papa's former classmate. Before when they were together just for a bit at the case before this, she felt interested at Allen she said.」



「……That's, really……what an owner of rare taste that girl must be.」



A present for Allen. That was a letter that had the writing of a contact number of a girl of a certain group that was summoned to another world. The girl who previously got a bit involved with a case that dragged in Lord Abyssgate had the opportunity to act together with Allen for a short while.



The middle aged agent who lamented his inability to get a lover despite actually being a brilliant agent was greatly joyful that the spring finally came for him too.



「Ah, right. There is one more present for Granny Sharon nano.」



「My, what is it I wonder?」



Magdanese tilted her head. Myuu smiled cheerfully at her and handed over a piece of memo paper. Magdanese accepted it and saw that there was only an address written there and his head tilted further.



「Myuu, this is?」



「You see, that's the address of the building where a group of half dead terrorist-san is locked in nano!」



「Eh?」



「Yes?」



Magdanese's eyes spontaneously turned into dot. And then, Allen also stopped his joyful dance.



Myuu shouldered his white bag and crossed over the room until right below the opened hole.



「See, these terrorists-san, looks like they planned to make a concert venue where famous people gathered for Christmas go boom nano. That's why, Myuu destroyed them a bit nano. It will be terrible if granny cannot return home in Christmas day nano!」



「Ah, yes. Right, thank you?」



「……Myuu, chan」



Myuu said「Then, have a nice Christmas!」at Magdanese and Allen whose face was greatly convulsing, and then she leaped up to the ceiling. And then, at the next moment the opened hole in the ceiling became like before as though nothing had happened.



Inside the chief office where death silent had returned, Allen spoke something that was too late already.



「……Chief. I more or less read the mood and pretended to not notice but……」



「What?」



「Myuu-chan's Santa clothes. Weren't there strange spots on them? As though, there was red liquid that got splattered on them.」



「……Send personnel to this address. Quickly. Send ambulance too.」



「Yes ma'am. ……Since when the red of Santa became the color of blood spurt I wonder.」



「……Surely since the daughter of the demon king was born.」



There was slight smell of blood remaining. The Santa of Christmas was hungering for blood…….perhaps.



「Fuu. Somehow I delivered all the presents nano. Santa-san has it hard nano.」



Myuu who returned home using gate whispered so while stretching her body. The sun was already sinking, delicious smell was drifting from Nagumo house.



She had literally went around the world to deliver present for the people related to Nagumo family. Although it was possible to teleport using gate, it was a really hard work for Myuu who was still little.



But, this too was something necessary for her to do to not let the connection that her beloved papa and his underlings(friends) had formed to be severed. Because she didn't have great power like her family, because she was powerless that she had to be helped by someone else, what she could do was only to convey that she treasured, loved everyone.



And then, for the last, Myuu would do the greatest that she could do for her most important people.



Wanting to make it a surprise, she deceived her papa in various things but……. Yue-oneechan and others who knew about the circumstance surely had explained it to papa skillfully. Myuu believed in that and pulled herself together.



She opened the entrance's door. Right away, the sound of a demon king somewhere rushing near with loud footsteps as though in a rush entered her ear. 'Nyufu' A strange laugh leaked out. Myuu sucked in a deep breath following her overflowing emotion,



「I'm home & Merry Christmas! I'm bringing a lovely present yeah! Nano!」



It went without saying, a lovely present for Nagumo family was the large love of the small Santa.



AN: Wait a second, that person now is!? It turn into a feeling like that isn't it.



I'm thinking that before long, I want to give more spotlight at that person.



Anyway, Merry~ Christmas.



It already passed nine o'clock, but I will be happy if I can make you readers enjoy it.



Also, thank you very much for those who reported 'I bought the novel and comic you know'.



I'm really happy.



It became a good present for Christmas.



But, my drying machine was making a strange sound……



*patapatapatapatapata, chuin-* It sounded like that.



Super scary……



The next update will be in New Year's Eve!



I'll rest at 30th so surely it will be fine!





Chapter 245




AN: I have no excuse.



You see, Shirakome prioritized Ame Talk. (TN: A variety show in Japan)



And then see, today I prioritized babying the brats.



Conclusion->I couldn't write.



And so, it will continue for just one more chapter.



Evil dragon Helmut showed his appearance from the cloudy sky.



The length of his body easily surpassed a hundred meter, he had black scales that looked as though they absorbed the light and crimson vertical slit pupils with black corneas that looked like ink drop. He was surrounded by several tornados and despite the violently raging wind, black mist was welling up and coiling around him, making his silhouette unclear.



Just from him being there, anyone hallucinated as though the air had died. It was suffocating, the limbs were trembling and wouldn't listen to what their owner was telling them, and the consciousness was painted over as though a black in was flowing onto the canvas that was themselves.



(Aa, this is, hopeless……)



The clacking sound was ringing from her own teeth. Roze muttered inside her heart while being conscious of that in the corner of her mind.



Fallen――now she understood the meaning of that word.



That was certainly a "fallen existence". Just from being there he harmed the living people, a person that chased away everything into destruction. This was an existence that had no other options except "annihilation", beyond the concept of persuasion or fighting. It didn't matter what kind of circumstance there was in the past.



That was truly "a foe that one couldn't accept to live under the same sky".



It wouldn't be a battle where both sides put their own belief on the line. This foe merely had to be taken down no matter the cost, if one wished to stay alive in the future ahead of here.



But even with that understanding……



(There is no way……to win. Human's karma…….it created such thing…….an existence……this huge……aa)



――They had no future



Roze's heart was breaking. Even when she understood that this enemy had to be defeated, she couldn't see the future. The existence before her eyes, the endlessly deep hatred, despair, and then the powerful might she felt swallowed her……



「GURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!!!!」



「-」



A howl thundered. A gallant war cry overflowing with dominating aura, as though to blow away the dark clouds. It was enough to blow away the terror eroding the people. At the same time, silver light was covering the city like an aurora.



There was hope right here. Nobody would forsake it.



The world that was almost dyed black recovered its light as though there was a torch illuminating it. People were liberated from the wedge of terror and they looked up to the sky. Even without words, the king's roar conveyed that will.



「Kuwai, bel……」



『Partner, stand tall. We are, a king.』



The【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】had no power to quicken mental growth. Even with his body grown up, his heart was still immature. But, Kuwaibel was a king. Even though he was young, but he was indeed a king that protected and guided the people.



Surely he was feeling the immense power of the enemy. Roze could feel his faint trembling. But, his gaze wasn't averted even for an instant from the enemy that threatened the people.



Her partner's words and that gallant figure made Roze recovered her senses in surprise.



「Kuwaibel. Can you defeat him?」



『I will. Without fail. Roze, you gather everyone. I cannot protect them in wide range.』



「……Got it. I'll evacuate even just one person more to the palace. If it's the palace then it will be able to form a powerful barrier too. You don't need to hold back.」



『I got it.』



With a gentle flap, the wind that was caused from the dragon wings caressed Roze's cheek. Roze too also gently caressed Kuwaibel's back. They had no need of more words than that.



Without hesitation Roze jumped down from Kuwaibel's back. Without delay a silver light wrapped Roze and lowered her down in front of the palace's front gate.



Roze and Kuwaibel turned their back at each other on the ground and in the sky. They quietly turned their gaze, the queen toward the people, and the monarch dragon toward the enemy.



「I will protect them-, partner!」



『I'll protect them-, partner!』



A beat of wings. A single roar. Monarch dragon Kuwaibel――moved out!



With his whole body clad in extreme light, he soared in a straight line into the black storm, toward the world's despair!



『Listen, the people of the kingdom! The people of Qwailent! Gather in the palace without any distinction of enemy or ally! Take each other's hand of the people beside you, gather under our protection!』



The people's consciousness was aroused by Roze's words. The aurora of extreme light covering the whole city was shaving much of Kuwaibel's strength. Roze could only protect the people while narrowing the range of the protection as much as possible so Kuwaibel could pour even just a bit more of his strength into fighting.



In the palace, naturally there was a barrier device that was installed. Even without Kuwaibel's power, it could protect the people from the black rain.



The people of the former dragon kingdom scolded their heart that flinched from terror and obeyed their queen's words. But, midway, they unintentionally stopped moving that there were words telling them to save their enemy the people of Qwailent inside Roze's words.



The apprehended people of Qwailent were also the same. They were looking at Roze with expression of disbelief.



Roze raised her voice once more to them who were like that.



『You understand right? For that existence, it doesn't care whether you are Avenst or Qwailent. Just by us being human, no, just by us being alive is enough to make that person bring destruction to us. This isn't the time for us fellow human to fight each other! We have to survive even by a single person more!』



A howl roared. Aurora flashed inside the world that was rampant with dark clouds. Striking light that painted out the sky like lightning.



Amidst the sound of fierce fighting resounding in the world, in the plaza in front of the place that felt like death silence had returned despite the sound, the words of Roze's, dragon kingdom Avenst's queen reverberated resolutely.



『For the future!』



*zaa-* Black rain poured on the aurora of extreme light. Under the light of protection protecting them……



「Your Majesty. The people working in the breeding farm――the people of Avenst, I don't catch sight of them in the plaza. There is a large trailer in the eastern barrack. I'll go pick them up if you permit me!」



The one who raised his voice saying that was a soldier of Qwailent. Because the dragons of the breeding farm received Kuwaibel's protection, they could endure even being under the black rain. The weak and small people had also finished evacuating inside the aurora of extreme light.



Therefore, there was only a minimum barrier laid out at the breeding farm. The path toward the breeding farm was exposed to rain. Although the trailer was solidly made and could endure for a while even inside the black rain, naturally the mortal danger wasn't small.



The expression of the Qwailent soldier was exactly the face of someone who was resolved for death. Agreeing with his words, one after another a part of Qwailent's soldiers and people advised of the danger zone that was allocated to Avenst people and they asked for permission to rescue them.



Roze stared back at them and a beat later she strongly nodded.



「I'll leave the detail to you. Take all life to here!」



「-, Yes-」



Receiving Roze's gaze, the soldiers of Avenst released the binding of Qwailent soldiers even while making a slightly troubled smile. The soldiers who were staring dumbfounded at their hands that were released from binding gritted their teeth at the next moment and rushed away.



『Cline, you are listening right? Please send out all the small ships you can possibly field and evacuate the people at the outer part vicinity without distinction of enemy or ally!』



『Understood. I have already throwing in the confiscated vehicles too for the rescue activity. What's left is if we can activate the palace's barrier……we can only wait for the report of the ground force we sent there……』



『……If only gramps is here』



If Sabas was here, then surely he would be able to activate the palace's barrier. The force entering inside the palace too might be seeking Qwailent soldiers' cooperation right now. But……



People were gathering continuously toward the palace. People with weak limbs, injured and sick people too, they were supported by other people and desperately escaped here. But, as for the people who were in distanced place from the palace, in the end could they reached the place before the barrier Kuwaibel made vanished?



But, at that time, the aurora fiercely shook.



『Kuwaibel-』



There wasn't any reply from Kuwaibel. Surely he didn't even have the leeway for that anymore. The aurora was trembling further and flickered.



Roze was feeling uneasy. And then, as though detecting that,



「-, the barrier is!?」



It wasn't a yell because the barrier crumbled. It was the opposite. A silver barrier was deployed with the palace as the center as though to overlap the aurora. A report from Cline『This isn't the suppression squad's doing!』came to Roze. There was definitely someone in the palace who activated it, but it seemed it wasn't the suppression squad.



Furthermore, several sky battlecrafts were flying up from the fleet's mooring dock. Those planes were lining up from the outer part and they hovered in place. And then they circulated all their energy into barrier and formed an improvised rooftop. As expected they couldn't cover the whole area, but they succeeded in creating a path until the palace.



That controlled action was obviously something that came from someone in Qwailent's side giving out instruction.



「Just who in the world……」



『Fumu, it looks like the evacuation route at least made it in time.』



A voice reached the muttering Roze through the radio. It was a calm voice that possessed depth. The voice of an important person she was thoroughly familiar with. It was,



『Gramps!?』



『Yes, Roze-sama. This is gramps here.』



Yes, the one at the other side of the radio was Sabastian who should be left behind in a scene of nearly certain death!



『You are safe!?』



『Yes, somehow. The imperial guards who remained with me are also safe.』



The unbelievable story caused Roze to think 'As expected, Gramps might be something other than human……' and felt shudder more than happiness. As though guessing the emotional state of such Roze, Sabas replied back with voice that had wry smile mixed in.



『I'll speak the detail later on slowly. Rather than that we have to hurry the evacuation now.』



『Tha, that's right. Is the palace barrier and sky battlecrafts barrier gramps doing?』



『Yes. More accurately I captured a close aide of Qwailent's king, so after talking a bit with him, he become a pawn――cough-, a cooperator that help us.』



『Lies-. This old man is a demon-. Doing such thing at me――za-~~~』



Right now, it felt like there was some kind of screaming voice from the other side……. Before Roze could ask back, the words of Sabas『Silas-kun, don't make me do something that pained me so much』came and at the same time a short scream could be heard……



『Roze-sama. It was a splendid speech just now. It seems that Silas-kun is also inspired by your majesty's words that he give us his full cooperation happily. Other than the barrier control, I also obtained the weapon control just now. I'll support Kuwaibel-sama right after this.』



『Ah, yes.』



Sabastian――he was just too excellent. Roze's talk unconsciously became halting language.



But, at that time,



「GAAH!!!」



Terrible impact sound surged at the same time with a cry that was oozing with pain. Looking there, a tower that was a slight distance away from the palace was tilting greatly and cloud of dust was rising up from its foundation. The tilting of that tower became even more drastic and then it collapsed right away.



『Kuwaibel-』



Roze understood even without looking directly. That scream came from Kuwaibel. And then, it was also Kuwaibel who was blown away by an impact so great it could destroy a tower. There was also no voice that responded to Roze's call.



『Something like hope, doesn't exist.』



The answer that came instead was a voice that had no intonation as usual, yet it was boiling with negative emotion to the limit. When she turned her gaze there, behind the palace――right above the breeding farm was the figure of Helmut clad in black miasma.



Black miasma was spreading each time he beat his wings, coiling around like a vortex. The black dragon scales that looked viscous didn't reflect the slightest bit of light and swallowed all light without leaving any behind.



Helmut's jaw was opened largely. The abnormal energy that was instantly focused in that mouth made Roze and others felt goosebumps on their back.



『There is no way I'll let you!』



Cutting through the rising cloud of dust, a streak of extreme light stretched to the sky and pierced Helmut's flank. The impact tilted Helmut's body, and the next moment the fired Helmut's breath attack grazed above the city's upper part and passed through.



Right after that, it pierced the land at the city's outer part that severely quaked along with a thunderous sound that sounded like scream. The vibration that rivaled a great earthquake caused the people who couldn't keep standing to scream and tumbled down one after another. During that time Helmut's breath wholly collapsed a part of the outer part that was directly hit.



Without even any time to shudder at that, Helmut turned his cloudy dragon eyes to below. Just with that, the miasma he was clad with crystallized as though it had substance――no, he was taking in the surrounding rain and crystallized it. It turned into twisted and warped spears and they became an excessively vicious squall that showered the ground.



In respond, Kuwaibel climbed to the sky and created a meteor shower. The swarm of light bullets met the spear of black rain that could be mistaken as black crystal and they neutralized each other, but the shooting that could even be thought as infinite was gradually making the interception not making it in time.



『Anti-air firearms control all free! Intercept them!』



Sabas's command caused the pillars and outer walls everywhere in the palace, and the garden and rooftop to let out anti-air weapons and they fired. The flare bombs that were included with the ration of one every dozens of shots colored the stormy sky. Those high caliber weapons splendidly destroyed the black rain spear that Kuwaibel didn't manage to deal with.



『All retainers-. Save our friends!』



Kuwaibel called out using the slight leeway that was created. The dragons who received the king's divine protection simultaneously scattered to the city. They were going to save their friends――the people who were late in evacuating.



『The resupply is finally finished. Sky battlecraft force, we are returning to the front line now!』



『Averia also can move!』



『Rozeria is all ok too-. We're reinforcing Kuwaibel-sama!』



Avenst's main force that had used up most of their ammo in the battle against the defense fleet now returned to the battlefield. The most elites among elites that Bovid personally picked up danced to the sky, Averia and Rozeria also had finished the minimum resupply and headed toward Helmut.



『This is Higgs squad. We are composed of planes loaded with Sythesizer. We are joining under the command of Avenst sky battlecraft force. Cooperation will be difficult, but give us instruction as you please!』



『This is battlecraft launching control room. The firearm control of the harbor is under control. Now reinforcing!』



The sky battlecraft force of Qwailent was flying toward the direction of Bovid and others. With the exception of the sky battlecraft squad that was deploying barrier, planes that could attack using sound wave were gathered up to form this improvised force. The person who seemed to be the leader was like a completely different person than a certain someone just a bit of time ago.



At the same time, the anti-air weapons that were installed at the military port area aimed their turret toward Helmut all at once.



――Without any distinction of enemy or ally, all people took each other's hand in order to live for tomorrow.



『……Insects.』



Helmut's voice rang for the first time. It was faint, but the voice was definitely filled with something like "displeasure".



『Perish.』



Helmut's breath was fired once more.



Kuwaibel flew up and cut in on the line of fire. He similarly fired his breath. Jet black and extreme light clashed above the palace, the barrier of the palace was fiercely rippling just from the after shock.



『Guh, uuguh』



Kuwaibel leaked out a pained voice. The extreme light was gradually getting pushed back. His strength was genuinely that of a grown up dragon, but he wasn't a match against Helmut.



『Synthesizer, activate!!』



『Averia, Rozeria, fire the main cannon at the same time!』



Qwailent's sky battlecraft force evaded the black rain spear while emitting weakening sound wave at Helmut. At the same time, Averia and Rozeria fired their main cannon. Two streak of flashes joined Kuwaibel's breath and assaulted Helmut like a trident.



But,



*GOU-*



Black miasma exploded. The whirling miasma bloated up so much it caused such vision, the sound wave and also the airship's main cannon were blown away altogether. In addition, Helmut's breath that drastically swelled up swallowed the extreme light.



『No way-, he is still holding back!?』



What Kuwaibel could do was immediately forming barrier with maximum power. The barrier of light formed in front of his body blocked the breath's direct hit and it raised a scream. Kuwaibel couldn't even hover and he was getting pushed toward the ground.



『Your back is wide open yeah-』



『Concentrated fire!』



Bovid and Sabas carried out attack like surging waves. Numerous missiles rushed Helmut.



But,



『Wha-. Goddamn it!』



『Controlling weather……it's just like the legend.』



Countless tornados fell down from the sky. They spiraled and rolled up the flying missiles which were pulverized inside. Before the missiles could reach their target, all of them exploded inside the tornado and bloomed flowers of flame blast.



『Kuh. Ro, Roze-. Everyone-, get them away……from the palace-』



『Kuwaibel!?』



『The spring's power-, is already-』



The monarch dragon power that he stocked up from the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】ran out. The halting words of Kuwaibel conveyed his strength's limit. The power he poured into the barrier surpassed the limit to defend Helmut's breath. Kuwaibel's strength was decreasing just like water flowing into a bucket that had a hole opened.



The aurora covering the city was already gone. He was genuinely just barely on his limit……



『Kuwaibel-sama! Please take this!』



The barrier would be smashed. Just when everyone thought that, the next moment a missile ran toward Kuwaibel. It was an unexpected attack from ally, however, Kuwaibel didn't move. Rather, his eyes shined in happiness.



Roze was also feeling the same.



The reason was, because that voice,



『Jean-. You are safe!?』



『Yes, your majesty. The others are also safe. As expected, I thought I was dead but, that crimson light――no, let's put that aside for now. Rather than that, it's improvised, but we prepared missile warhead filled with the spring water. I estimated that the water will have effect just by splashing it on Kuwaibel-sama's body, am I mistaken!?』



Just what in the world happened……the wounds of Jean and others were obviously in the level that was beyond help, but they seemed to be alive. And not just that, they seemed to reach the spring that was still opened and created improvised missiles to transport the spring water.



It seemed the explosive of the missiles that were impacting one after another had been reduced, they broke before Kuwaibel's dragon scales and splashed him with the water inside. Kuwaibel gave his thanks『I'm fine, thank you!』.



As though to show that the water was definitely the real thing, the strength of the weakening Kuwaibel was restored. The barrier recovered its radiance and his body that was pushed back returned to a hovering state. And then, he fired a breath of extreme light with his restored strength. The breath blasted away several tornados and without stopping it hit Helmut.



Furthermore, Cranks squad led by Bovid slipped through the route where the tornados vanished using miraculous maneuver and they fired their missiles. All those hit the area around Helmut's face and scattered grand flame blast and shockwave.



『I don't know anything about your despair. For me who was born after everything was over, I cannot even imagine it sufficiently. But, however-, because you are my sibling-. I only understand that I have to end you no matter what!』



Kuwaibel charged with his body clad in light.



The only monarch dragon in the world. He had a lot of people who were like family to him, but a sibling who was related to him by blood was only this fallen existence before his eyes. A howl that was like a scream surged that he was going to kill with his hand the older brother who he met for the first time since he was born.



Helmut's muddy dragon eyes that looked like it wasn't seeing anywhere caught Kuwaibel. There was no reply. Was his intelligence already unable to do that much? Or else had he abandoned it already as unnecessary?



Without caring of those questions, Kuwaibel performed a tackle of all his might toward his elder brother's body using his body that was clad in extreme light.



The sound of impact between fellow dragons was played, the friction was fierce and sparks scattered.



Helmut's body was distanced away from the palace. Without pause Kuwaibel tried to bite at Helmut's neck.



――GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!



A violent shockwave attacked Kuwaibel. It was just a howl. Yet despite so, the extreme light covering Kuwaibel's body was blown away, Kuwaibel himself was also tasting an impact that paralyzed his whole body and he was blown away.



Kuwaibel formed countless light bullets and fired them while this time his claws lunged the moment their body passed each other.



『Gua!?』



The dragon claws didn't even graze. The moment Kuwaibel swam in the air, Helmut's tail scythed down on his face like a counter.



Even while rotating once midair, Kuwaibel fired light bullets randomly, but they were erased by black rain spears that Helmut fired in twice the number, several spears smashed up Kuwaibel's dragon scales. The piercing black rain spears inflicted simple wound, and more than that they began to display the effect of causing necrosis to flesh.



Kuwaibel almost screamed spontaneously feeling the excessive pain, but he swallowed it and fired his breath. The radiance of extreme light was erased just with a shockwave from Helmut's howl.



『Kuwaibel-sama-』



『Fire the main――』



The sky battlecraft force, airship Rozeria and Averia, the people handling the anti-air weapon on the ground, everyone of them tried to help Kuwaibel somehow but,



――GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!



The evil dragon howl surged once more. But, this time it had slightly different disposition. At the same time with the howl, the miasma Helmut was clad in became ripple that spread through the battlefield. The effect was dramatic.



『aa……』



『-』



What could be heard was such soundless screams. The sky battlecrafts were falling as though they were losing control. The movement of the airships was also turning simple and they showed no sign of firing their main cannon. The anti-air weapons on the ground also felt silent.



『Kuwa, ibel. The miasma is……enveloping, everyone-……』



Words from Roze barely reached Kuwaibel to inform him of what was happening.



Monarch dragon was an existence that bestowed divine protection to the people. Then, what would a fallen monarch dragon bestowed?



Despair. Terror. Nihility that robbed the will.



Silver light vanished, in exchange black miasma coiled around the people. Everyone fell on their knees powerlessly. As though they were begging forgiveness at evil dragon Helmut.



『Everyone-』



『Everything perish.』



Kuwaibel tried to grant them divine protection in hurry, but Helmut didn't allow that. Countless black rain spears showered Kuwaibel's body, his dragon scales were smashed and his flesh gouged.



What he could do was only somehow making the falling sky battlecraft force to have emergency landing. Naturally, his divided concentration thinned down the defense of his own body and several spears jut out from his body.



Kuwaibel endured the scream that almost leaked out and he emitted extreme light from his whole body, erasing the spears.



Kuwaibel roared while charging forward. He swung his claws, but they were instantly dodged and he was struck down from overhead.



In that case, he pretended to tackle and just before they clashed he rolled, he then similarly unleashed a tail attack, but as expected it was easily dodged and his chest was tore apart with a diagonal claw slash.



He fired light bullets. The black rain spears doubled in number and attacked him.



He fired breath attack. It was returned back with double the might.



The attack from his claws and fangs, and also his tail, everything was overturned with counterattack.



His tackle with his body that was clad in extreme light wasn't even dodged anymore as though to show the difference of their level.



『-……a……guru-……i』



His body was truly wounded all over.



Even though he had obtained the strength of grown up dragon, even if Helmut had lost his sanity, the full-fledged difference in experience was cornering Kuwaibel. There was no way a young dragon who was born a few years ago could possibly match a veteran monarch dragon that had lived for a few hundred years.



It looked as though an adult was handling a child who was stubbornly charging ahead.



Helmut's gaze was averted from Kuwaibel as though he lost interest. Ahead of his gaze was the palace. The people who were gathered there.



『Don't-』



『Despair for the world. Serenity for the world without light.』



Helmut fired his breath.



Kuwaibel cut in on the line of fire with his torn up body.



『GAH, aAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!』



A shriek that couldn't be heard as scream or howl surged. The barrier was scattered away. Kuwaibel became the people's shield using his body. He desperately resisted and somehow damped down the attack's power, although he was unable to defend to the end and got blown away.



His back struck a corner of the palace and a part of the building collapsed. Buried under rubbles, the figure of Kuwaibel who was letting out repeated small breaths was atrocious even only seen from outside. There wasn't anywhere unharmed on his chest, the spot was hideously burned so much that anyone would spontaneously want to avert their eyes. It was hard to search for a spot on his body that still had unharmed dragon scales.



「Kuwaibel-. Ku-chan!!」



Roze who rushed toward him even while enveloped in black miasma leaped toward Kuwaibel who was half-buried under the debris. She was desperately pulling down the debris.



Presence of death descended from the sky.



「Evil dragon, Helmut-」



Helmut opened his jaw as though something like Roze's yell wasn't even registered in his eyes. Light that would destroy everything was converging in the blink of eye.



*gara-* The sound of debris collapsing rang. At the same time extreme light surged out and formed many layers of barrier.



「Ku-chan!」



『I'm, fine, here. I'll, absolutely……protect』



The horrifying black that looked like compressed from miasma became a streak of light and surged. The barriers of extreme light that Kuwaibel deployed splendidly blocked that personification of death.



Blood spray burst so grandly it felt like *pshew* sound could be heard. Kuwaibel firmly stepped on the ground on all four and he desperately maintained his barrier. But the more he held on, the more the wounds all over his body were spurting out blood.



Roze was at a loss for words. She felt frustrated, she hated herself who was unable to do anything, she merely stayed close beside her partner.



『Pointless.』



Helmut's cold voice could be heard.



『I, don't think so-』



Several layers of barrier were blown away. Kuwaibel emitted extreme light from his whole body while roaring as though he was burning his soul.



『Despair.』



『A king, absolutely won't despair-』



One more layer of barrier was smashed.



『Give up.』



『I won't, break my promise-. I won't, discard my mission-』



He had made a promise with his partner. He swore that he would become a king.



『Perish.』



『I'll live. With my life on the line. We will――』



Finally the last barrier creaked. Cracks entered it with ominous sounds.



But, there was no color of resignation in Kuwaibel's dragon eyes. He understood that at this rate he would die. There was also no other way left. However, his soul that he had already proclaimed out, that was the only thing that he couldn't betray!



That was why, at the very least he would roar. Toward the world, toward the evil dragon that was created by human's karma.



『I'll surpass you, and advance to the future ahead of this-!!!!』



The barrier bro――



『That's a wonderful howl. Blessing for that noble soul.』



He could hear a voice. A gentle voice that was warmth, that gave the impression of motherhood.



『Boy. Thou couldst not oppose an enemy of higher rank using strength. Look, avert it like this.』



『Eh? Aa……』



Kuwaibel was enveloped by jet black light. It wasn't the black like Helmut's muddiness. If it had to be said, it was a magnificent black that reminded one of the night sky. It didn't hinder or paint over Kuwaibel's silver light. In harmony it displayed a blessing with radiance of black silver.



Perhaps what happened next was its effect. Inside Kuwaibel's brain, "the way to use strength" flowed in as image. Kuwaibel controlled his last barrier following the image, as though he was being guided.



Immediately, the barrier of light whirled fiercely, at the same time the barrier was angled. The whirling light scattered Helmut's breath from the tip of the direct hit, and then it was further vigorously averted toward empty sky.



The breath paused. Helmut's gaze ran toward unrelated direction as though he sensed the existence of an intruder.



『Come on, don't be in a daze boy. This place art a battlefield. Breath attack!』



『Fua!? Yes-』



The figure couldn't be seen, however that person's words floated inside his brain. Kuwaibel who didn't understand what was going on immediately obeyed. He released a breath of extreme light toward Helmut who was looking another way.



『Now, fly up. Higher and higher, take Helmut's above! Know that in an air battle, the one below art the one in disadvantage.』



Kuwaibel flew up, Ignoring the pain all over his body. He only maintained his breath attack while flying up to far above.



Helmut dispelled the attack with a howl as though it was only an annoyance. And then, he fired a breath at Kuwaibel.



『Be conscious of gravity. Grasp the wind caressing thy wings. If thou art a race that rule the sky, don't fly with only thy power. The nature there art exactly our greatest ally.』



『Be conscious of gravity. Grasp the wind. The nature is exactly our ally.』



Images were flowing in. He descended in a straight line toward the approaching breath while his wings moved slightly to grasp the wind and changed the flow. Just with that Kuwaibel's body spiraled unbelievably and he dodged the breath as though it was skimming his back.



Kuwaibel descended beside the breath with fierce momentum as though his own body became a counter.



『Read the future. How wouldst he react against thy speed, physique, and eye motion? Go toward that future.』



『Read the future. My attack, where will it head to?』



What emerged on his brain was the replay of the happening from just now. An imagination of smooth evading motion overlapped with Helmut in the real world like an illusion. Kuwaibel matched his movement with the illusion Helmut that was starting to move, and he swung his claws ahead of that.



『-……』



The claws of Kuwaibel that passed through Helmut without decelerating were smeared with Helmut's broken scale and blood. When he changed his wings' angle just like his imagination, his direction changed drastically at the same time with an intense centrifugal force.



There, Helmut launched countless spears of black rain.



『Read the line of fire. It's also important to conduct oneself so there wouldst be no one to cover behind thy back. Accurately move with necessary amount, to the necessary place, at the necessary time. Charging forward, or taking role as shield in self-sacrifice, they art not something to be used recklessly.』



Kuwaibel took a sharp turn because he understood that Helmut would attack when he exposed an opening after dealing an attack. There was nothing behind Kuwaibel's back after he turned. If there wasn't any need to protect anything, he could easily endure things like the black rain spears with just several shots of light bullet.



The "way of fighting" was conveyed to him one after another. Completely different from his shoddy fighting before this when he would defend right from the front when he was attacked, or how he would go in a straight line when attacking, his maneuver right now that was accompanied with "tactic" was increasing Helmut's wound by one, and then one more.



In proportion with the number of wound, glimpses of irritation were starting to be faintly visible from Helmut.



Tornados were falling down as though to block Kuwaibel's route, but he used even those whirling winds and nimbly danced in the sky. His flying skill that was gradually getting polished was finally turning into something that could even evade the black rain spears without him needing to use light bullet.



Helmut's gaze went away from Kuwaibel and turned into the palace once more. That was because he knew that if he attacked there, then Kuwaibel would be forced to defend them.



『Boy, thou understand correct? Teach him what art the cost of taking off his eyes from the enemy in the battlefield.』



『Yes, yes-, Haha-ue!』



『o, Ou……oh no, this art the first time I'm called as mother……』



It seemed the voice was agitated, but Kuwaibel who reflexively called like that from his subconscious was already in concentrating state. He was focusing his light in his mouth, however, it was slightly different from before.



The breath of extreme light was fired *DOU-*. It shook the air. Helmut ignored the attack as though to say that it had been demonstrated that he wouldn't be seriously damaged from that, he was about to release his breath toward the palace――



『――, ii!? Gaa!?』



The extreme light pierced Helmut's chest. The breath was thin, it was compressed until the extreme limit, furthermore the breath was added with spiraling motion in order to increase its penetrating power. Without pause Kuwaibel moved his breath in a mowing motion.



Helmut avoided getting his body bisected because he immediately twisted his body, but the spot from his chest until his shoulder blade was wholly cut apart. One of his arms was dangling down limply, it was in a state where it was connected only by a bit of flesh and skin.



Helmut turned his gaze toward Kuwaibel with naked hatred,



『GURYAH!!』



『-』



He opened his eyes wide toward the jaw of Kuwaibel who had already approached until before his eyes. Kuwaibel was firing his piercing breath while approaching. Helmut whose stance was broken didn't have the leisure to evade that, Kuwaibel's jaw snapped at one of his wings.



Without pause Kuwaibel rolled midair and bit off the wing with a twist.



A shriek rang out from Helmut for sure this time. Kuwaibel used his rotating motion and launched a tail attack that was fully filled with centrifugal force. He struck down the shrieking Helmut to the ground.



『That attack art not bad. Now, boy. Hone thy mind keenly. The might of thy breath doesn't rely only on energy. Possess a strong heart. Unshakeable will, resolve, they art what make a dragon's howl(breath) powerful!』



『Yes, Haha-ue. ……I'm finishing this, brother.』



Extreme light illuminated the world. He could imagine the way to knead power. Because he received the guidance from the warm existence.



The chest of Kuwaibel who was bending his body greatly backward was getting bigger, Helmut looked up to the sky from the ground. The dragon eyes that contained iron will crossed the dragon eyes of despair and hatred.



Right after that, a streak of etreme light pierced toward the ground, like the judgment of heaven. It fiercely shook the floating island and enveloped Helmut.



The world was illuminated by light of aurora.



The extreme light that pierced the floating island also opened a big hole in the sea of clouds and pierced toward the lower world.



And then……



The extreme light vanished into empty air. After that there was nothing remaining.



The body of Kuwaibel who was unsteadily flying powerlessly was gradually getting smaller while he returned toward Roze's position.



「Ku-chan!」



『Rozeee』



By the time he returned at Roze's position, Kuwaibel had completely returned to his former size. Roze hugged such Kuwaibel to her chest.



「You are amazing-. You are cool-. You are without a doubt, the greatest king! You are the pride of dragon kingdom.」



Roze rubbed her cheek on Kuwaibel while trickling tears. Kuwaibel also pressed his cheek fawningly. And then, they stared at each other while listening to the people who were rushing toward them while noisily raising joyful cheers. The grinned widely at each other.



「You did it, partner-」



『I did it, partner!』



Both of them were so wounded to the degree it was unthinkable that they were royalty. But, for the people who were rushing toward them, they were unmistakably king. The people of the dragon kingdom couldn't help but shedding tears toward the one human and one dragon cuddling close at each other.



Roze and Kuwaibel turned toward the people together.



And then,



Flash surged.



It rushed toward the two, like the judgment from heaven.



「aa」



『Roze-』



Roze was dumbfounded. Kuwaibel could do nothing but calling her name. Death illuminated the two, the scythe of the death god was swung down.



「To lose focus even though the dark cloud art not even clearing up……that's a great reduction on thy point, boy.」



With extremely thick black flash overhead, when anyone realized, a beautiful woman wearing an outfit that was a blending of eastern and western――Tio Claus was there with one hand raised up.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



When I gave up making scene of quick peerlessness, for some reason Ku-chan came out to the front.



Shirakome's plot generally isn't breathing……



Now then, it has become the last day of this year.



Various thing happened through this year, but I think that it was mainly a fun year.



I believe that uploading in Narou, and then getting healed by the harmony that everyone of Narou people showed me are surely a big reason of that.



Really, thank you very much for this year.



Regarding the extra compilation of Arifureta, there are still characters that I want to write.



And so I'm thinking that next year too I want to continue and post Arifureta.



I'm thinking that next year too I'll be able to have fun again with everyone of Narou people, so please take care of me.



My objective for next year is decidedly "to keep my words".



Also, I'm thinking if only I can write some kind of new story…



I still don't have any plot, but what I can say with certainty is, it will be a full throttle of Shirakome's hobby similar like Arifureta, and above all it will surely be an opportunism story that Shirakome can enjoy.



If it please you, I'll be happy if we can enjoy ourselves together again.



Well then all of you Narou people, have a good year.



I look forward to working with you again next year!



Tomorrow I will upload the last chapter of Tio arc. The subtitle will be "To the Morning of Falling Star". I'm thinking that perhaps subtitle "The Day the Demon God was Born" will be fine too, but it felt like it will overlap with a certain Geass person so I altered it.



I won't specify the time. Because I get the feeling it will be overlap of objective with early New Year.



But, even saying that, I'll give advance notice of just this.



I'll also upload the special New Year chapter. I haven't think of anything yet though!





Chapter 246




AN: Happy new year.



There was a beautiful barrier of whirling jet black color on the hand that Tio lifted up. That barrier blocked the extremely thick flash falling from the sky.



Although the flash's power was scattered, but the attack that possessed the power that rivaled even Kuwaibel's breath just now was making cracks on the barrier right away, but the barrier shined instantly and it was restored as though nothing had happened to it. The barrier recovered using regeneration magic. In front of the foul play that was an age of god magic, the divine punishment attack couldn't pass.



「Tio-sama!」



『Haha-ue!』



「U, uumu. Boy, thou art calling me Haha-ue extremely naturally like that. A~u~, somehow it's really embarrassing~」



Tio-san fidgeted. For Kuwaibel who didn't know his mother, Tio's great existence and her gentle guidance was truly like the mother inside his imagination. Therefore, he called her that from subconscious level, but Tio's attitude caused him to realize how he was calling her after this late and he also began to fidget around similarly.



So far as it went, the flash of death that could easily scatter away the average existence was still pouring down even now but……it seemed that Serious-san was currently resting.



'Oh Serious, come back!' Even if such thing was said surely nothing would happen, but a change appeared at the same time when the flash vanished.



Miasma was gathering in the air where there was nothing.



The miasma that was gathering from every direction was gradually increasing in thickness and forming shape. Yes, it was forming dragon shape. The shape of Helmut!



『No way……』



「Does this mean……that Helmut is immortal?」



Roze and Kuwaibel were staring dumbfounded at Helmut who finished his revival inside the miasma.



「Uumu, as expected I don't think that he is immortal. Most likely, that too art one of his technique created from his power's true nature.」



Hearing Tio who was calmly analyzing the situation despite the despairing content of her talk caused the two to somehow recovered from their stupor.



And then, Kuwaibel tried to fly toward the【Spring of True Dragon's Tear】impatiently. But, the cost of him forcing himself caused intense pain that attacked his whole body and he almost fell from Roze's arms. His wings convulsed and they were unable to move properly.



Tio smiled slightly seeing such Kuwaibel. Her hand reached out gently and she softly caressed Kuwaibel's head.



「Thou hath do thy best with that young body. Just as Roze-done said, thou were indisputably cool. That's why, rest already.」



『But……』



Kuwaibel's gaze caught Helmut who was further taking in miasma from the surrounding. As a king, it was his duty to eradicate that, his gaze was appealing so.



「It's not that I don't understand thy feeling. But, at the very least this art too heavy of a burden for the current thou. Didst thou forget? In the first place it's my wish to get rid of that.」



Indeed, there was such talk. To say the truth, after annihilating the main fleets, Tio and Hajime were watching the fight against Helmut. From really far away with their figure and presence hidden.



As fellow dragon, as someone who was placed in the same circumstances, Tio wished to perform the last rites for him who had fallen and was now called an evil dragon. But, that wasn't something that Tio had to do by herself no matter what.



Just like how defeating the fleet was something that the black dragons ought to do, defeating Helmut as a king, or perhaps as a brother was originally something that Kuwaibel ought to do.



That was why, even after Hajime and Tio confirmed Helmut's existence, the two of them only watched Kuwaibel who began to fight without interfering. The two of them didn't even have grudge or hard feelings toward Helmut, they didn't even feel hostile toward him. Originally they had no reason to fight.



But, that Kuwaibel had already passed his limit. It was too impossible for him to face Helmut who was already stepping one foot into the domain of concept. Because it was like challenging a natural disaster.



「We will, be given salvation?」



Roze asked.



「No. It's not salvation. It's just, that this world art make to go along with Goshujin-sama's convenience.」



Tio answered like that.



Roze and Kuwaibel tilted their head. Behind the two of them, there were the figures of the people who although before this they were rushing while cheering, yet they witnessed the evil dragon's revival and stiffened in fear.



The words of curses were resounding once more into their ears.



――Perish.



――Suffer, gasp, despair



――There is no worth in living



――To be born is evil



――Everything be destroyed



――Nothingness is the very best choice



――Renew the world



――Die for the sake of creation



『Die』The curse echoed directly inside the brain. It was repeated over and over, reverberating inside as though to imprint into the mind. People who fell on their knees while holding their head appeared one after another. The miasma that was spreading around Helmut who had completely recovered his form was enveloping the people.



Perhaps――could it be that Helmut was the incarnation of the judgment that this world itself handed down? The will of the world responded to the hatred and despair of Helmut to bring punishment to the humans who broke the harmony of the world.



「A lot of your species were killed.」



Roze and others were gasping in agony in front of Helmut that was like the very will of the world itself, amidst such situation, such words suddenly could be heard.



「Even though you believed that the past should be able to be regained, yet your species was reduced into livestock instead.」



It wasn't Helmut's voice. It was a human, a man's voice. Even though the voice's volume was like a whisper, somehow it entered into the ears smoothly without getting drowned out by other sounds.



「Your important siblings were murdered, your trust was trampled underfoot.」



The curse of death was resounding even now inside the head. The people's agony didn't lessen. But, the people's gaze wandered around restlessly searching for that man's voice. Even though those were only words, for some reason they ha a sense of presence that couldn't be ignored.



「Leave behind everything and depart to the end of the world. Even though you decided that, what you witnessed was the sight of your violated species and family……」



'Ah', someone whispered. When they looked to the sky, there was a man standing in the air while spreading crimson ripples.



That figure clad in crimson aura, standing with composure while his hands were staying still inside his pockets, the people's gaze was peeled off from Helmut and focused there. Helmut also turned his blank and muddy dragon eyes toward him――Hajime.



「There ain't any salvation huh. It was just too much huh. If you saw that kind of sight, of course you won't be able to stay sane. If it was me, I'm gonna curse the world for sure then.」



Hajime talked toward Helmut with a voice that conveyed emotion like sympathy and compassion, even gentleness could vaguely be felt from him.



Kuwaibel's gaze was directed toward his fallen brother. Roze directed a pained and guilty expression toward Helmut. The people too, their expression distorted at the karma of mankind that was thrust before them.



The meaning of the words that Roze said, that they would fight the world for the sake of future, there was no doubt that in this time they strongly felt its meaning for real.



Even now Helmut was continuously taking in miasma, it was unclear whether he was listening or not at Hajime's words. It was like a wordless accusation toward the whole world, that he absolutely wouldn't forgive them.



Toward such Helmut, Hajime showed a gentle smile that even gave impression of kindness――



「Anyway, die.」



And fired the shell of Schlagen AA that he had secretly charged up!



The crimson flash blown up Helmut-san's head with one shot!



Helmut-san, he worked hard regenerating his head!



There Agni Orkan dealt additional blow!



Total number of 1200 shots, heat of 3000 degree Celsius, pencil missiles where every single one possessed destructive power that equaled with anti-warship missile were rushing!



Helmut-san was in fully beaten up state with his regeneration only starting!



Flowers of crimson shockwaves and flame blasts were blooming profusely in the sky. All the people including Roze who were staring dumbfounded at that with their eyes half opened wide yelled with splendid synchronization.



「「「「「「Anyway, how did that turn into this-!?」」」」」」



The context of the beginning and end was fatally not meshing up. Or rather, what's with the gentle expression? What did 'anyway, die' mean!?



All people acted the straight-man without distinction of ally or enemy.



Hajime beautifully ignored the retort of those people in the ground as though nothing happened, with narrowed eyes he thoroughly observed Helmut who was repeatedly regenerating and destroyed. He operated Agni Orkan with one hand, and while showering the will of the world with blows, his other hand was supporting his chin while whispering things like「Hmm hmm, I see. As I thought the energy's circulation is like that……」and so on.



――GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!!



A fierce roar was released from Helmut. The roar became shockwave that blew away the missiles and attacked toward Hajime and others like a tsunami. The shockwave was far more powerful than what he showed when fighting Kuwaibel before this.



Anyway, Hajime defended using space isolation barrier of Cross Velts.



Helmut further attacked with his breath. The scale was truly immense. The power surpassed the attack that Kuwaibel did with all his might.



Anyway, it was defended by multiple layer of Cross Velts' space isolation barrier.



『……I, defended against that with my life on the line though』



「Ku, Ku-chan……」



Even though he was a dragon, but Ku-chan's eyes turned into dead fish eyes. Even though he was a dragon……



While everyone was leaking out strange voice「UBOoa」from their mouth seeing the barrier that easily blocked the attack that could easily destroy a country, the mouth of Hajime who was focused in observing Helmut was gradually distorting into a widee~~ grin.



It was as though a fun fun time would start soon. Like a kid that was given a toy right before his eyes.



「I can see it, the mechanism of this world's cycle. I grasp it already now, the true nature of dragon core energy. Now, I'll clear one of mankind's grand problem.」



The interest of Hajime who was whispering with small voice was already veered away from Helmut and moved toward another different something. Although, the one who sensed that was only Tio, so the other people who saw Hajime smiling like a demon in front of Helmut's breath were drawing back from him.



「Tio. Is it really okay that it's not you who do it?」



「Yes. I only wish that this pitiful existence art ended already. It's a bit hard for me because of the transformation into dragon god mode. I wouldst leave it to Goshujin-sama.」



Hajime who confirmed for the last time took out his gatling pile bunker. The electromagnetically accelerated super heavy giant stake couldn't hope to have its trajectory averted with just the like of a mere roar's shockwave.



Furthermore, the amount of stakes was like a barrage. Sure enough, just how much Helmut could dodge……



「As I thought, it's that kind of method huh. Evil dragon Helmut, I got it already you know? You aren't here right?」



In opposite with Hajime's calm whisper, a commotion occurred on the ground. That was something that couldn't be helped. After all, Helmut dispersed before he got hit by the attack.



That was exactly the true nature of Helmut's power. It wasn't a power to manipulate weather or to make black rain rained down.



It was the power to manipulate the negative energy itself with dragon core as the basis. That was exactly the true nature of power Helmut was awakened at the end of his despair and hatred. The negative energy running rampant in the broken world granted Helmut power that was almost nearly infinite. He could even condense negative energy and formed shape with it remotely from distant position.



「Just how that kind of existence can be defeated……」



Roze whispered in despair.



It was truly immortality. No matter what kind of attack it faced, it could easily recover by disintegrating the negative energy. No matter how much damage it received, the body here was just a temporary flesh.



It felt like Helmut was laughing.



Hajime-san laughed mo~~re.



「Yoo, do you have any time for smirking like that huh?」



Hajime raised one of his hands casually. He held out one finger and pointed to the sky.



Lured by that gesture, the people, and also Helmut looked up to the sky. What was there was naturally only the black clouds created from condensed negative energy――



『……』



「Tha, that's?」



Helmut stared intently at the dark clouds. Roze whispered in astonishment. The people were speechless with their eyes turned into dot.



A spot in the sky looked burning red. At first it was only faintly. But it was gradually getting bigger, dazzling……



*GOU-*



The dark cloud was blown away. The reason was one.



「You better remember this. If you are going to put on air giving a divine punishment, then do it like this.」



From the sky behind Hajime, that was falling diagonally with brilliant radiance. The thing that was freefalling from outside the stratosphere had only its trajectory corrected using gravity control……



――Meteor Impact



The evil dragon had the same definition like a natural disaster? Very well. Then, this side too would oppose using cataclysm.



The gigantic stone with a diameter that could reach fifty meter was blazing bright red and descended from the sky. It caused Helmut to stiffen for a moment.



Naturally, that moment was fatal. The meteor blasted away the whole energy body of Helmut and descended to the ground. It was fortunate that its flying trajectory that was pulled by gravity was diagonal. It was totally unthinkable that the floating island would be safe if it got hit by that.



Without pause the meteorite's shockwave blew away the sea of clouds in radial shape, and it dropped on the land at faraway.



The world quaked severely. Although the falling speed was adjusted to a certain degree which damped its strength, this was a fifty meter giant stone that fell from outside the stratosphere. That impact was impossible to measure, a giant cloud mushroom materialized. Because of that, the sea of clouds was getting further blown away in circle shape.



If there was anyone observing, surely they would witness the land turned inside up and undulated with many protrusions.



Helmut gathered miasma and revived.



No matter how out of mind the destructive power the attack possessed, as long as this world was filled with negative energy, he would be able to create energy body as many as he wanted. Yes, Helmut glared fiercely at Hajime as though declaring that but,



「I didn't say that's the end of it you know?」



The cloudy sky was lighting up with lights one after another. The brightly burning red specks were appearing everywhere in the cloudy sky!



Roze and others went pale. They were in a stupor at the phenomenon that was out of common sense, but in front of the calamity that would happen after this, blood left their face right away and they drew back.



――Demon King-style Harassment 108 "Wishing Upon the Star"



Now everyone, let's make a wish! Wish so that you can survive!



What was being done was simple. A random pounding of meteor impact. Meteors of various sizes at outside the stratosphere were thrown out, their trajectory and speed were adjusted using gravity control and they were turned into a suitable meteor shower. If a mistake was made then the planet would be totally broken with this lovely harassment!



The meteor shower that broke through the dark clouds blew away the dark clouds in the sky one after another with the shockwave they scattered in their wake.



The land below was plowed by incessant earthquakes and impacts, gigantic tsunami were generated on the seas.



Surely if this planet was seen from the space, sea of clouds that became riddled with holes and mushroom clouds rising up in succession could be seen at half the surface of the planet.



Helmut's energy body was blown away and resurrected, then it was blown away again and resurrected again. There was no way it had any time to attack back or anything, even when it tried to call tornado from the dark clouds, those dark clouds were blown away and dispersed.



The negative energy was also blown away by the heat wave and shockwave, the miasma's convergence was gradually turning unsteady.



「Is it soon?」



As though in respond to Hajime's whisper, a faint howl was thundering. From very far distance, something that was emitting a presence that would overshadow even Helmut's energy body before this was approaching with absurd speed.



It was the appearance of the main body. The energy body couldn't be formed, the sea of clouds and the dark clouds too were also blown away, and currently the planet itself was in the progress of being destroyed. Those facts caused the main body to finally come out. The pressure that could be felt even with the distance was so much it felt like it could possibly rival Tio's black god dragon mode.



And so, Hajime responded with concentrated fire of meteor impact.



A part of the meteor shower that was diversely scattering toward all over the world tilted their route and flew toward the same direction.



――GURYAAAAAAAAA-!!



A roar thundered



――GAAAAAAAAA-!!



A howl resounded once more.



――GU, GURYAAAA-!!



A howl was radiating……



――aAAAAAAAA-!!



Was that, a howl?



Just how much distance he had advanced through with how much speed? Helmut's real body that finally showed up clad in miasma――somehow it was really beaten up.



『Kill-, Kill-, Kill-』



「Ooh, aren't you really emotional there」



Killing intent and hatred surged accompanied with physical pressure. A breath was fired from Helmut.



It was returned back by the variable chakram's gate. A roar (?) 'GYAAAAAAAAAAH' reverberated.



Perhaps the real body's gathering rate was different with the energy body, because Helmut gathered negative energy directly from super wide range and healed his wounds. And then, attempting close range if his long range attack got returned, he tried to bite at Hajime with super acceleration from his hovering state.



And so, Hajime was,



「Oi oi, you sure? Isn't there something important over there?」



After saying such thing, a part of the meteor shower changed direction again. Helmut didn't care and approached to kill Hajime, but he instantly noticed that the flying giant rocks passed through overhead and they were flying toward the direction faraway behind him. He got taken aback suddenly and he changed his route rapidly.



Like that, when he fired his breath toward the giant rock, that giant rock was splendidly blasted into pieces midair. A killing intent incomparable with before was released.



Helmut who turned around focused on Hajime once more――and his eyes opened wide at the meteor shower that was changing route one after another.



『GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH』



An extra loud howl surged, Helmut concentrated on shooting down the meteor shower using his breath. Even so there was times when he didn't make it in time. At that time he would perform tackle with his body to divert the meteor's trajectory at any rate.



Seeing Helmut who seemed somewhat desperate,



「What's the matter? Why aren't you dodging? It's like you are protecting something there. Right, for example, the place where your sibling's dragon core is enshrined perhaps?」



Those words resounded extremely clearly. They smoothly entered into the people's ears through the scream of the severely quaking world.



Like that, the people guessed. Why didn't Helmut dodge the meteor shower? In the first place, even though the meteor shower was flying from far beyond, why did he get hit during the way until here until he got that beaten up?



There was one reason for that. Because behind Helmut――in the place where he was hiding, the dragon core of his sibling who was sacrificed to become the energy source of the mother ship Avenst before was enshrined there. Helmut wouldn't allow the memento of his sibling to be lost because of the meteor impact.



In other words,



「……He is taking hostage, no, memento hostage?」



Yes, exactly. Hajime-san took hostage the important treasure of Helmut. 'It's fine even if you dodge the meteor impact you know? But, the important thing behind you will return back into dust though?' Like that.



Hearing Roze's words, the people slo~~wly returned their gaze at Hajime.



Over there, fighting against the evil dragon who wished for mankind's destruction, was a devil who was making a truly wicked smile while firing meteor shower one after another.



Evil dragon? No no, compared to him who was shooting down meteor shower while desperately trying to protect his important thing, that guy who was carrying out world scale destruction while viciously beating his opponent in a situation that couldn't be escaped from was far more evil.



For this world, Helmut was an existence that should even be called as the representative of this world's will. That was to say he was an existence that was equal with god. Then, that person who was trampling underfoot that god was……



Devil? Noo, he wasn't in a level that still had lovable nature like that.



Demon king? He was similarly a king like the queen-sama and monarch dragon-sama who was risking their life to protect the people? Seriously stop that comparison.



The heart of the people was magnificently synchronized at that time.



That thing, clad in crimson, destroying the world, that thing which was trampling down evil with even more evil and irrationality was……



「「「「「「……A demon god.」」」」」」



That day, the legend of demon god was born in the world of sky.



『UNFORGIVABLE-. UNFORGIVABLE-!!』



Evil dragon Helmut-san who was already wounded all over struck at Hajime with intense killing intent and hatred but,



「I don't need any forgiveness. Die.」



Something cast a shadow. What appeared from the sky was a super giant rock with diameter around 500 meters.



Helmut immediately became hidden in the shadow of the giant meteor and disappeared from view. What's left then was only a scream of death agony, and a severe earthquake that reverberated through the world, and then……



『Something like this, is just too muchhh』



Only such words filled with grief from Ku~chan.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The first day of the year. Shirakome who is immediately guilty.



Sorry.



Just a bit more, I'm reflecting back on the pace.





Chapter 247




AN: I barely made it, to post the New Year chapter.



It's short, but please enjoy it if you will.



「Flatten! Flatten! Become tas~ty! Flat! Desuu!」



「Flatten! Flatten! Become tas~ty! Flat! Nano!」



It was the early afternoon of the New Year's Day where there was clear air and transparent sunlight showering down the world.



Such enthusiastic shouts were resounding in a corner of Nagumo family's garden. The voices' owners were Shia who was sporting a wide smile with her rabbit ears hopping up and down, and Myuu who was sporting the same wide smile while wearing rabbit ear hair band that was made to hop up and down.



Both of them were currently in the middle of pounding mochi.



By the way, Myuu's rabbit ear hair band was a high level item that wasn't inferior in texture or appearance compared to the real thing.



The raw materials were supplied by Yue. It was an item where Yue's skill shined from her putting all her heart into producing animal ear hair band because once Shia's rabbit ears stolen Hajime's attention. Myuu was looking enviously at Shia's rabbit ears, so Yue created it once more and gave it to Myuu.



That rabbit ears that was endlessly close to the real thing, just from where in the world Yue procured it from……



Yue who borrowed the compass and crystal key from Hajime and then returned after thirty minutes later were holding rabbit ears that weren't even bundled in her hand. Surely she had just gone to a place like a specialist shop for animal ear.



Even if for example right after the gate was opened and the scenery that could be seen at the other side resembled the abyss of【Orcus Great Labyrinth】, even if the grasped rabbit ears were sometimes twitching, even if there was a drop of red of something on Yue's cheek, there was no doubt that the item was purchased from a specialist shop.



Even if for example-, for a while Shia folded her rabbit ears flat on her head as though protecting it while she was directing a terrified gaze at Yue, or even if Inaba who they finally met after a long time was shocked when he saw the rabbit ear hair band equipped on Myuu's head, but if it was said that it was a purchased item then that was a purchased item, the end!



「He, hey, both of thee. It's fine that thou art singing rhythmically, but coulds not thou relax the pace and strength? From a while ago, mine hands art sometimes flattened here.」



Tio were giving a warning toward Shia and Myuu who were pounding mochi harmoniously like a real sisters, while her voice sounded pained, but strangely excitement could also be felt from it.



Tio received the role to turn over the mochi inside the millstone, but it was just as she said, since before this her hands were flattened several times. Even now Shia and Myuu weren't holding back in their mochi pounding. They were swinging down the weight of war hammer as it was.



「What are you doing, Tio-san. Please turn over the mochi quickly!」



「Nano! Mochi pounding is a fight against time nano! Tio-oneechan, do it properly!」



「E, a, yes.」



Tio put in her hands in hurry to turn over the mochi.



「Flatten-desuu!」



「Ah!? Shia! Thou, just now, thou purposefully――」



「Flatten-nano!」



「Higii!? Myuu!? Why didst thou swing down just now!?」



Flatten-flatten! Ah!? Flatten-flatten-! Ahiih!?



The mochi and hands were changing shape properly along with the rhythmically cute words. Tio's interlude that sometimes got in between produced a nice flavor.



「Oh man~, pounding mochi suited Shia-chan really well. As expected from a rabbit. Myuu-chan's appearance of mochi pounding rabbit-chan is also really cute.」



「Totally. If only there isn't a pervert who is putting both hands on ground while making expression of ecstasy between them, I'll want to preserve this scene in recording.」



In respond to the words of Shuu who was sipping tea on veranda, Hajime was also sipping tea while agreeing (?). Both of them couldn't put in boorish retort, whether toward the pervert who finally entered and took out both her hands, or about how what was used to pound mochi was a war hammer that had soaked in the blood of innumerable enemies, all those points were ignored in this New Year mood.



The two who averted their gaze from the rabbit ear duo and the pervert turned their eyes toward another corner of the spacious garden.



Over there was also a scenery that was really like New Year event.



「Aa!? Yue! Just now, you absolutely used gravity magic there! That's foul!」



「……A cruel false accusation. If you are talking about foul play, then it's Kaori's foul play by the time you use two racket style in this battledore.」(TN: Battledore=early form of badminton racket)



The two who faced each other with moderate distance in between were Kaori and Yue. The hand of the two was holding battledore racket. What they were doing since just now while noisily quarreling with each other was Japanese badminton.



「This isn't foul play! There is no rule forbidding using two rackets. But, using magic is obviously a foul play right?」



「……What is called a rule, is something decided by one's own strength!」



「It's useless even if you said it with that posed look!」



Kaori-san serve! *whoosh-* The shuttlecock that made an uncommon sound cut through the sky. An average human would be unable to react against that speed without doubt! Its angle was also the same!



But, the shuttlecock was rapidly decelerating in front of Yue, it was slowly advancing as though in slow motion.



「……This is my zone. Eat this, Heavy Shottt」



「That's why, that's just gravity magic! Uu, in that case I too……here I go, try stopping this! God Speed Shottt!」



When Yue fired a heavy smash using gravity magic, Kaori hit back while at the same time firing a smash of god speed that shortened the arrival time.



Kaori-san grinned complacently seeing the shuttlecock passing through beside Yue. However, Yue-sama wasn't that naïve.



「……There is no such thing as blind spot for me!」



「Ah, using Divine Existence is seriously unfair!」



Using instantaneous space teleportation, Yue appeared in front of the shuttlecock that had passed through. She ignored Kaori's protest forthrightly and hit back the shuttlecock. The shuttlecock ascended high to the sky. Yue lifted the corner of her lips. It was obvious what she was thinking.



(You are planning to drop it from above with super gravity aren't you!? I won't let that!)



Kaori leaped up. Like a wild eagle! A down smash attacked Yue from above!



Yue's racket sparked.



「……Lightning Dragon Shottt」



The shuttlecock howled! The shuttlecock was clad in lightning at the same time with the impact, it then flew while simultaneously turning into lightning dragon with the jaws opened wide!



「Naïve, how naïve, Yue!」



Kaori's racket was tinged with silver light. With superb moderation of power, disintegration ability erased only the lightning dragon just before it could hit Kaori and hit back the shuttlecock!



Magic(shuttlecock) was flying wildly about, the players were moving around with god speed, or instant teleportation, secretly magic was simply fired! Between times, disparagement like「……Idiot Kaoriii」or「Bird-brain Yueee」also gushed out.



「The two of them are really getting along huh.」



「Well, I won't deny that. Perhaps because of the automatic regeneration or miraculous recovery magic, year by year their quarrel is turning more extreme, but the two of them also go shopping together normally though.」



*Chudon-! Dokan-!* While listening to the harmonious Japanese badminton game that gave out such impact sounds, the father and son sipped their tea. Hajime nonchalantly released artifact for countermeasure against the neighborhood.



When Shuu and Hajime closed their eyes partly at the air of New Year and the comfortable shockwave, joyful voices 'kyaa kyaa' resounded from inside the room behind them.



「Ahahah, look look! My mercenary group succeeded in their surprise attack again! My funds get tripled as the success reward!」



「Wh, why is it only Sumire-okaasama who get into good square……as for me, I lost even my home already. Even though I'm a princess, even though, I'm a princess……」



「Li, Lily……how pitiful. To receive this treatment even in the world of board game. Compared to that, Remia-san who is steadily succeeding in starting business is terrifying. My position got overtaken before I realized it.」



「My my, what to do. I get a child again. This time it's a twin. Everyone, please give me two million each for the celebratory gift. Ufufu」



Sumire, Liliana, Shizuku, and then Remia were amusing themselves with Game of Life Tortus version. It was a revised edition where Japanese language was used in every aspect of it, starting from the money's denomination.



The manufactured was a mysterious character called South Cloud. It was a moderate sized board, but it was an artifact class game that made use of status plate function, so the squares' content would be changed along with the players matching with the established vocation. Just like status plate, above the white board there were the squares and pawns floating up. (TN: Nagumo was formed from the kanji of 'south' and 'cloud')



Due to the fact that people could have simulated experience of a life possessing a vocation they dreamed of, this was an extremely popular game that was selling like crazy in Tortus through Yunker Company. (TN: Yunker is the name of an energy product in Japan. Also I tried looking back at the early chapters and found out about Motto Yunker, I totally forget about this character until now. I wonder if any of you still remember him? He is a leader of a merchant group Hajime met in Tortus. Aside from his name Yunker that is like energy drink, the name Motto also meant 'more' in Japanese. So this guy's name means 'more Yunker'. Remember this kids, this will come out in test)



An artifact class game was selling in great amount……



That fact caused the top brasses of every country and every organization to hold their head altogether in great perplexity.



Back to the topic.



Currebtly, Sumire became a leader of a mercenary group and devoted herself to the extreme of wickedness……she was managing her work favorably. Liliana became the princess of a ruined country and she wandered aimlessly to every place, Shizuku was achieving success as an adventurer within limitation, while Remia became a wealthy merchant that contended for the top spot even in Fuhren.



By the way, Remia already had eight children. And then, right now it seemed she made her ninth and tenth children. She was demanding celebratory gift with bright smiling face.



Sumire was saying「Congratulations! I'll wish you well for in reality too okay!」while handing over the celebratory money, Shizuku was handing over her due while smiling wryly from looking beside her, and Liliana was whispering「……I cannot pay, the celebratory money. Large money like two million, how would I……. Ahaha, getting loan isn't it. Even though I'm a princess, even though, I'm a princess……」.



It seemed Liliana finally became a princess in debt.



「How peaceful.」



「Really.」



When Shuu whispered in earnestness, Hajime then agreed in earnestness. They sipped their tea.



But, at that time, Sumire while being a leader of a mercenary group happily yelled「Oh my, dear me, I finally get married!」. Shuu's ears twitched in reaction.



It seemed that spring also came even for the strongest mercenary group leader.



Suddenly, or possibly with the feeling of escapism, the princess in debt asked Sumire.



「Come to think of it, how did Sumire-okaasama met with Shuu-okaasama? As expected, was it developed through hobby?」



「My, how sudden. What's the matter Lily-chan?」



「Err, just a curiosity. Because of my status, I never have a common meeting, my meeting with Hajime-san was also unique, so I'm wondering what kind of meeting Okaa-sama and Otou-sama had.」



「I see. Indeed, the way of meeting of everyone other than Kaori-chan and Shizuku-chan wasn't normal isn't it.」



Sumire opened her mouth with the BGM of shockwaves and explosions, and then the shout of「Flatten!」and the coquettish voice「Ahh!?」. She squinted her eyes in nostalgia and talked while looking at faraway.



「Yes, it was at an intensely cold shrine in New Year. I and Shuu who at that time didn't know each other――infiltrated the shrine while cosplaying as priest and shrine maiden.」



「A not normal meeting suddenly appeared!?」



Liliana's first retort of the year exploded. Even the smiling goddess Remia, or Shizuku whose selling point was her cool and collected attitude were similarly making twitching face.



「That was really a surprise. I who was a high schooler at that time wanted to work as a shrine maiden even for just once at the shrine that was an anime's holy ground. While the shrine was bustling with the New Year event, I nonchalantly cosplayed as a shrine maiden and worked diligently as a guide for the visitor. And then you see, I discovered a priest-san who was obviously a student leaning on a pillar with a posed look. He was then immediately got found out by the real priest-san where next he desperately made excuse.」



「I already don't understand from where I should retort here.」



Lily-chan's polite language was crumbling. She looked at Shizuku and Remia looking for help, but the two of them averted their gaze quickly.



Shuu's ears were twitching.



「The shrine's authorized people who noticed the uproar gathered, and then I who nonchalantly pretended to be shrine maiden also got exposed. Both of us prostrated ourselves right away. We thought of getting through this by making a prostration that would make the other side creeped out.」



「Trying to getting through uproar by prostrating……that's a story that I had heard somewhere. Is that Nagumo family's traditional skill I wonder?」



Hajime's ears were twitching. Was it Hajime's misunderstanding that he was feeling Shizuku's gaze on the back of his head?



「However, there was one problem. It's fine already so just go home――our cosplay's level was too high to draw out those words!」



「What did you say~」



「Remia-chan! Nice interjection there!」



Remia-san had perfectly grasped how the mother-in-law's rhythm was working.



From the story of the chipper Sumire, it seemed their costume was extremely close to the real thing and the people in authority mistaken them as the real thing. They were interrogating the two just from where they obtained the costume.



Like that, Shuu who at that time was gradually getting irritated finally said something like this.



――It ain't priest clothing! It's my plain clothes! It only looks similar accidentally, I'm wearing it as everyday clothes! You got a problem with my fashion sense!?



It seemed he forgot the fact that he was prostrating and he even tried to make the fact that he was infiltrating into nothing.



「The moment I heard that, I was laughing and rolling around with my hands holding my stomach while thinking this. Yosh-, I'll marry this person! Like that!」



「「「Why did it become like that!?」」」



While the straight-man act of Liliana and others was exploding, at the veranda Shuu was covering his face with both hands and rolling around on the floor. It seemed he was overheating with shame that his black history was exposed to his daughters-in-law.



「Like that, we dated with my confession and then we married after that. How is it? Compared to Liliana-chan and others, it was a meeting without anything particular about it right?」



「「「「「「「「There is no such thing.」」」」」」」」



Including Yue and others too who seemed to listen to the story from some point unnoticed, the wive~s of Nagumo family and Myuu acted the straight man.



Hajime was clapping the shoulder of Shuu who was still writhing「Nuoooh, that's embarrassinggg」to console him.



「Now then, Shia-chan and Myuu-chan has also returned, should we eat the freshly made mochi with the ozouni soup?」(TN: Ozouni is a Newa Year's dish that is a soup containing mochi and vegetables)



Sumire clapped her hand *pan-* and ended the story. The wive~s replied「Ye~s」and Myuu brought the mochi happily.



After that, they ate Sumire's specially made ozouni soup with relish and the New Year of Nagumo family passed on peacefully.



The craters created at the garden, also the destroyed millstone, also the awkward Shuu who was receiving lukewarm gaze from his daughters and granddaughter in law, also Kaori's papa who was storming in with a yell「So my angel is hereeee」, also Shizuku's papa and grandpa who appeared in a flash in the living room while greeting「Thank you for always taking care of our Shizuku」, those scenes were a really mundane (limited to Nagumo family) New Year scene.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I wish that this year of everyone in Narou will also be a fun and peaceful year like Nagumo family!





Chapter 248




(TN: It's the line Lupin said when he escaped from Zenigata)



AN: Tio arc last chapter.



The sea of clouds and dark clouds scattered away. The light of sun was shining in everywhere, creating many sun rays.



Although, even those lights would surely vanish soon. That was just how deep the ravages of calamity that was caused by the random pounding of meteor impact. No need to mention the turned up land, the rolled up dusts would cover the whole sky soon.



The people looked up to that man, no, the demon god who accomplished that with feeling of awe. That figure surrounded by spreading crimson spark and standing calmly while releasing sparks was indeed emitting a dignity that was worthy to be titled as "demon god" from the unconscious whisper of the people.



「Whoops, I forget this.」



The people jumped at the first voice of the demon god-sama. They were unusually trembling with fears in comparison with the words that was said really lightly.



But, what happened right after that was an extraordinary strangeness that didn't match such light words.



「Crimson light is……」



Roze opened her eyes wide toward the sky above. Crimson light was showering down far above the sky like how sunlight was interweaving sun rays. It showered down everywhere on the capital of the dragon kingdom.



'Is this the whim of the demon god!? What he said just now, does it mean he was forgetting to destroy the city!?' Shudders were rushing through the people.「Hiih」Screams were raised, and people who held their head and squatted down appeared continuously.



「There art no need to worry. Goshujin-sama in his good mood decide to perform a bit of service.」



「Eh? Tio-sama. Just what does that mean……」



Roze tilted her head and spoke her question at Tio who was smiling wryly. However, a report arrived faster than Tio was able to reply at that question.



『Roze-sama, this is Cline. This crimson light, it doesn't seem to be a threat. ……The wounds of the injured people who received the exposure of the light is healing in the blink of eye.』



『This is Bovid. Reports from the crashing down guys about their survival are coming one after another. Even the guys who fell to the land below are reporting back. Geez, anything is really possible for that person.』



『Roze-sama. This is gramps. We were also saved by this crimson light. Although, in my case, I received the exposure from a metallic spider that clung on me unnoticed.』



『From Jean, to Roze-sama. We too went through the same like Sabas-sama. A small spider had its back opened up, and then the ring that came out from there shot out this light. The moment we got hit, our wounds were gone. It seemed that we were receiving that person's protection.』



It appeared the reason Sabas and Jean, and then the imperial guards were surviving was because of this.



――Regeneration magic exposure satellite Bel Agharta



Using the satellite type artifact that was deployed outside the atmosphere, the range where the crimson light could reach became place that would promise abnormal recovery using regeneration magic. Even in the case where the target was underground or indoor, by using spider type golem――Arachne's in-built gate to send in the light through it, the regeneration light could still reach with pinpoint accuracy.



Hajime secretly scattered Arachne swarm inside mother ship Avenst. At present, it's unknown where they are lurking, from transmutation, suicide bombing, disabling drug injection, until sending light of regeneration, all the little spider-san can do anything. Ia! Ia! Masteeer! (TN: The 'ia ia' part seem to be a reference to Cthulhu, not really clear about what though)



「Demon god-sa……cough-. Hajime-sama……so in the end, he was watching over us.」



「……Pe, perhaps that art so.」



Roze's eyes turned moist from feeling greatly moved. Kuwaibel also raised a small cry「Pii」from deep emotion. The people who could hear the conversation of Tio and Roze relayed it to the people behind them, spreading the circle of the emotionally moved.



For some reason, it was only Tio who was making a strangely twitching expression.



In order to speak the words of thanks as the representation of the people, Roze was about to open her mouth toward Hajime who was continuously emitting crimson spark while hovering still in midair. She wished that he would turn toward them, got down, and then received their words of gratitude.



But, right before Roze spoke the words to call out at him,



「True core activation……complete. Outer wall endurance level……clear. Crystal agglutination rate……stable. Yosh-, come here-!! What's left is only the absorption and circulation! Let's goo!! Connect to Ornis! Gate Open-!!」



She was interrupted by words that were filled with tension that was rising high for some unknown reason. Even though until now he was only showing a relatively cool and wicked side, but the current Hajime was really like a child who was given a new toy. His eyes were sparkling bright, and his mouth was loosened up slovenly.



The sudden high tension caused Roze and others turned speechless with their mouth gaping open, while Hajime's hand was lifting to the sky a crystal about the size of a palm with a color that was a mix of dark blue and faint bluish white.



At the same time, countless black birds――crows were flying out from his Treasure Warehouse II, there were also some that had already been released unnoticed beforehand, flying from below the floating island and they all began to fly around as though forming spiral.



Looking closer, inside the world that was approached by dusts, black dots in a number that wouldn't be an exaggeration to be said as many as the stars in the sky could be seen. The true identity of those black dots were all similarly the same jet black bird type artifact――Ornis.



Originally, Ornis was modeled after crow to be used for reconnaissance, but now they were flying around in the amount that should be expressed using the word innumerable.



「Wha, wha, wha, what is thissss!? Tio-sama!?」



「Aa~, well, that's. Anyway, this wouldst not be something bad for Roze-dono and others, so calm down. Rather, I believe that nothing wouldst make thou happier than this.」



「E, eee? No matter how I look, this scene looks like the demise of the world part II though……」



Swarms of crows were flying around as though giving notification of ominous news while dust was covering the world densely. Indeed, it was a sight that was fitting for the demise of the world. Furthermore, the eyes of those crows emitted sharp crimson light as though in respond with Hajime's call, in addition their whole body was starting to be enveloped with crimson spark and aura. No matter from where one looked, the crows only looked like the subordinates of an evil existence.



There was no factor anywhere that could make them calm down.



「Linkage - converge-, transmute!!」



Something like the commotion of the lower world didn't worth any concern. The demon god-sama who was in his perfect form invoked the ultimate skill of a transmutation master with his tension still rising high.



Instantly, Hajime's surrounding whirled and sparkling particles were getting absorbed into the jewel in his hand.



It wasn't just that.



「Ah, the sea of clouds is……-, even the dust!?」



Someone yelled. Just as the voice said, even though the sea of clouds and dark clouds that were a gathering of negative energy were scattering away, but that didn't mean that they were vanishing, and then even the dusts that were rolled up due to the meteor impact were also converging into Hajime's hand like a joke.



Hajime's converging transmutation was certainly a power of transmutation that gathered the mineral at the surrounding without directly touching them. His original range for the convergence was around a few hundred meter, but it was another story if there were age of god magic, artifact, and Hajime's Limit Break here.



Ornis that was affixed with absorbing effect using gravity magic so to speak was a relay point for the convergence. Meteor impact was fired to scatter the prepared metal particles that had the function for conglutinating negative energy all over the world. At the same time, the polluted land was smashed so that they would be rolled up as much as possible as dust to be collected.



「What a beautiful……」



「Pii……」



The world was filled with jet black rivers of heaven.



The negative energy all over the world was flowing in toward Hajime accompanied by faint glimmers. There was no need to mention the sea of clouds and dark clouds. The dust of the land that was polluted by negative energy that was rolled up to the sky also became rivers that were flowing in the sky and gathered toward Hajime's position.



What was flowing there was negative energy that was fatal for living thing. But, even so the people thought. That this sight was beautiful. Surely if there was an astronaut in this world looking down to the planet, there was no doubt that he would similarly get deeply moved at the sight of the sea of clouds and dust covering the world flowing into a point.



At the same time it was noticed.



The meaning of the jewel that was emitting crimson spark while swallowing the black sea of clouds and dusts without leaving any behind. The intention of Hajime that was lifting it up.



Yes, he was trying to purify the world!



Great number of people went down on their knees. They put their hands together in front of their chest while tears were flowing on their face.



It was as though they were worshipping a god!



One person, then one more person. The people who were dedicating prayer and gratitude toward the demon god who was purifying the world were increasing!



The pain in Tio-san's chest was increasing in proportion of the number of the people! Somehow, she looked like she was really unable to endure being there even for a second longer!



「Tsk, the limit value huh. Well, I guess this is the initial value of the dragon core and sky core that can be picked up. What's left will need time.」



The radiance of the jewel that was swallowing the negative energy along with the sea of clouds and dusts was settling down. The sky of the world was cleared up, everywhere the sea of clouds and dusts were dissipating.



Hajime who was taking a breather finally turned his gaze at the people below at that time. And then, 「oOO!?」he raised a shocked voice. After all, while he was getting a bit absorbed at another matter, for some reason the number of people staring at him with tears on their face while offering prayer was rapidly increasing. It made demon god-sama to be a bit shocked.



Hajime somehow guessed the circumstance and for a moment he showed a gesture as though he was thinking of something. The next moment shock and perplexity vanished from his face and a smile settled on his expression. His face changed into an expression that was already vibrantly smooth.



While crimson ripples were spreading in the air, like a god that was descending to the lower world, Hajime came down by calmly stepping step by step on the air. In order to return into Treasure Warehouse II, all Ornis gathered toward Hajime with a spiral trajectory which further gave him positive correction with his sublimity.



Beside Tio who for some reason was showing an exasperated face, the queen-sama was giving her welcome with moist eyes.



「……Hajime-sama. I, don't know, just what I should say……. I don't have any word to express this feeling of gratitude welling up inside me.」



Hajime shrugged toward Roze who was talking with a bit of feeling vexed.



「I don't need any thanks. I'm only doing what I want to do by my own convenience.」



「You are really……」



Roze smiled looking troubled at those extremely light words regarding the salvation of the world. Behind her, Sabas and Crow siblings, Bovid and Cline and the other top brasses, and so many other people were gathering.



Words of gratitude were expressed from them one by one. Their voices were gradually turning into a chorus that began to shake the cleared up sky.



While the number of people in surrounding was increasing moment by moment, Roze said that she wished for the two of them to rest inside the palace by any means. The post war processing after this would be really difficult, but it seemed that she wanted to thank them no matter what as much as she could.



Hajime slowly shook his head toward such Roze.



「From here on it will be difficult for you all. If you have time to look after someone like me, you should prepare instead for the next battle to rebuild the world.」



「However, our feeling won't be eased like that. Please――」



「Well, put aside that talk for now. Queen-san, can you come with me for a bit?」



「He?」



For a moment Roze's cheeks reddened thinking if「Is it for that kind of meaning!?」. Within an instant inside her brain the image of the approaching Hajime and herself saying denial……such wild delusion was rushing around. As expected from the hidden pervert queen.



However, the aforementioned Hajime turned away his gaze from her toward the mother ship Avenst that was landed behind the palace. Seeing that, her cheeks reddened because it was her misunderstanding this time. Beside her Sabas's forehead was forming a Mariana trench.



「I have something important to talk. It's fine for the top brasses to come along, so clear away all passenger from Avenst.」



「U, understood.」



Roze-chan's cheeks reddened once more at the part of something important to talk, but she tilted her head by the time Sabas and others also okayed the request.



Sabas and others were also tilting their head in wonder what this was about, even so this was a request from the hero that saved their country. They didn't even have the intention to refuse, and so the made people exited the mother ship Avenst and invited Hajime in.



*kon kon* Hajime and others were walking through a passage of mother ship Avenst that was silent from using up almost all the power of sky core it had. Hajime had finished grasping the ship's internal construction after staying there for two days, so Hajime was walking forward rapidly in the lead.



「Err, Hajime-sama? Where are you going toward?」



The capital was in excitement from the victory, but the people should immediately feel insecure with the absence of the leading actors. Just in case the people who remained should be giving some kind of explanation to the people, but from the standpoint of Roze and others they wanted to quickly talk to the people.



Roze was nervous with Kuwaibel held on her chest. Accompanying them were Sabas, Crow siblings, and Bovid. And then the ship captains starting from Cline were also somewhat restless.



Hajime quietly opened his mouth toward them.



「I removed a considerable amount of the negative energy running rampant in this world. But, as expected it doesn't mean that the balance of the world is completely restored. The balance of this world is still collapsed.」



「……That's」



Indeed, the jewel in Hajime's hand absorbed negative energy. The sea of clouds became scattered all over and the rolled up dust also thinned so it didn't cut off the sunlight completely.



However, the amount of the positive energy was still few, the balance of the world couldn't be recovered right away with just the sky core of the natural world and the declined dragon species.



「Even so, now we are able to see the path to the future far clearer than before. Something like rebuilding the world from the start is something that cannot be done without being resolved for a long time of piling up effort for who know how many generations. Hajime-sama, you don't know how much help it is already just from us being able to step on the land with our own feet.」



It seemed the destination ahead of the passage they were going through steadily was the power room. Hajime nodded「I see」at Roze's words and he continued his speech.



「But, the prospect for the future become better and having leeway……those facts are also enough for anyone to think about needless things. Even in a circumstance where there is no leeway and people has to be desperate to stay alive, people still cannot band together and they fought each other like that. The appearance of Helmut as a common enemy could be said as fortunate in a sense.」



「……」



「Surely the people living in this world aren't just queen-san and others and the Qwailent bunches. There must be other people surviving, holding their breath in the scattered floating islands, Perhaps there are even people who discovered a way to survive somewhere in the surface. Like deep underground for example.」



「……What is it, that you wish to say Hajime-sama?」



Roze looked dubious. No, she actually understood. There was no more enemy of the world that could become the cause for banding together. Sure enough, in the situation where resource was limited, how would people who now had leeway in their survival would move…….



Hajime opened the door to the power room. In the center of the large room, an out of norm power reactor was sitting there. There was a spot in the center of the reactor where a fuel tank could be inserted.



The jewel that Hajime took out once more was settled silently in his hand. It looked like a yin yang sphere with its color mix of deep blue and faint bluish white. Hajime fiddled it around as though it was a marble ball while his gaze turned toward Roze.



「Do you want power? An even greater power that can overwhelm the world?」



「-」



It was a surprisingly deep and silent gaze. It was as though she was looking at a whirlpool that was created inside an ocean. She felt like if she lost focus, then her consciousness would be swallowed.



With a glance at Roze who unconsciously held her breath, Hajime carelessly threw the jewel into the reactor. The spot for inserting the fuel tank didn't have a shape for precise insertion, there was a small box to put in the thing that would become the fuel, and after inserting the item into there the box only needed to be fixed in place using the fixing clasps.



Because of that, even without processing the jewel into the shape of a fuel tank, there was no problem if the jewel was inserted as it was. Yes, that was if that jewel had a function as fuel.



*kiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii-*



A sound like vapor whistle resounded, and then *goon goon* a sound that felt like it resounded until the bottom of stomach hit the earlobe. It gave an impression as though a heart to pour vitality into blood vessel and internal organ was now resuming to beat.



「Lies……Avenst is, completely……starting up?」



「-, ……Roze-sama. The energy replenishment rate, is 60 percent. It's in the middle of rising even now. The weapon control system, is in the state of possible activation.」



The mother ship Avenst that should be unable to be activated completely except by the energy output of monarch dragon core was resuming breathing. When Sabas who ran to the console in respond to Roze's whisper informed her about the ship's state, the top brasses unanimously turned speechless.



Just floating was the best it could do with the power of sky core. Even if it used dragon core, using only average number of average dragon core would only make this ship able to use combat maneuver but using weapon would still be out of reach.



But now, this ship was activating.



「You see, this jewel, well, if I have to say it's a pseudo monarch dragon core. The raw materials are sky cores, stockpiled dragon cores processed by the Qwailent bunches that I withdrawn from the fuel tank, and a bit of rare crystal from another world. It's an imitation, but its output cannot be matched even by a monarch dragon core. After all, right now it had just absorbed energy that can purify the world to a certain degree.」



「Su, such thing is……」



It was possible. After all, this person here was a matchless transmutation master. Furthermore, although it was necessary for him to use artifact as intermediary, he was an existence who had even taken possession of technique that interfered with the truth of the world.



「If you have this, the strongest battleship that once shook the world will be revived. Perhaps you will be able to stave off the chaos that might happen from here on using this one ship.」



「Ha, Hajime-sama」



Roze was bewildered and took a step back, perhaps from feeling confusion at the unforeseen situation.



Toward such girl, Hajime mercilessly asked one more time as though thrusting the reality before her.



「Do you want power? If it's you……If it's the "rebirth" dragon kingdom Avenst's queen Roze Phiris Avenst who rise to shoulder this world, then I will also be fine with lending this jewel.」



――What to do?



The question was calmly asked once more. If they had a deterrence ability this great, then indeed perhaps they would be able to prevent a needless spilling of blood from repressing the disturbance that would happen in the future.



It might possibly become the symbol of the queen of the rebirth dragon kingdom Avenst who decided to fight.



Roze was unable to sort out her confused mind, however, the moment her eyes met the eyes of Hajime who was staring straight at her, the conclusion came out with an easiness that surprised even herself. She found the conclusion the moment she saw that gaze that was vaguely holding expectation, as though testing her.



「No, I don't need it.」



She was able to answer that clearly and strongly.



「……Hee. There really is no hesitation in that answer. Without this jewel, Avenst is a ship that is only big. Now that you have taken back your country's territory, this kind of stupidly big ship will be reduced into a mere baggage you know?」



「Yes, perhaps that is so. But, didn't Hajime-sama say it yourself? What is starting from here on is the "rebirth" dragon kingdom Avenst. Even if that isn't a monarch dragon core, even if it's a dragon core energy that is already processed, we will never make use of dragon core as weapon until the end of the world.」



Roze calmly replied to Hajime with a strong piercing glare. Looking carefully, the top brasses standing behind Roze were all staring with wordless declaration「Don't make light of us!」inside their eyes.



「……You really, won't use it until the end the world?」



「Yes. We won't.」



「……This is a power that can rule the world. The strongest battleship. You really don't need it?」



「Yes, we don't need it.」



Seeing Hajime's insistent questioning, Roze felt strangely mystified「Is he worried about us that much?」and a chuckle leaked out from her mouth. Her heart was tickled from the gap of this Hajime with the demon god's mercilessness of before.



Roze spoke of her determination once more toward Hajime who was silently gazing at her searching her true feeling.



「Rebuilding the world is a battle against people's heart. A weapon is just boorish for something like that. We have friends. We can walk toward the future just from the fact that we have taken back our friends. We have to walk forward. That's why……」



「That's why, you don't need this thing anymore, is it?」



Hajime turned his gaze behind him with a wry smile. Ahead of his gaze there was the sparkling jewel and the heart of Avenst that was fully activated from receiving its power.



Hajime who returned his gaze at Roze was scratching his cheek looking a bit troubled.



「Aa~. Looks like, I'm only creating the spark of war for all of you.」



「I won't speak that far……」



「But, just with this thing remaining here, it will only wither queen-san's determination and also your persuasiveness to the external side. ……Can't be helped. I'll take responsibility as the creator and take this thing away to deal with it.」



「Fufu, thank you very much. At the very end……Hajime-sama is a really kind demon god-sama.」



「……Demon god? Since when I ranked up like that huh?」



Seeing Hajime who was scratching his cheek looking even more troubled, this time for sure Roze couldn't hold it anymore and she let out a laugh. It was a lively smiling face that was full with the liberation from the heavy pressure of many years and charm that looked radiant with the hope and determination for the future.



Enticed by that laugh, the top brasses starting from Crow siblings also started to laugh.



For some reason, it was only Tio and Sabas whose expression looked horribly complicated though……



Hajime who faced away with an expression that really looked like「It's really embarrassing to get laughed at」then said「Aaah, how long you guys are going to laugh!」while he made the "Treasure Warehouse II" in his hand to shine.



Right away, the whole Avenst was enveloped in crimson radiance, and the next moment it vanished completely. Although the reactor was located near the bottom of the ship, there was quiet some distance until the ground, so Roze and others who were suddenly thrown on the air reflexively screamed「Hyaaah!?」in that situation.



Although, they were wrapped in weightless feeling and the next moment Tio's wind gently enveloped Roze and others and they were lowered slowly to the ground.



Roze looked around while feeling a bit of indignation of what suddenly happened, however, she noticed that the figure of Hajime and Tio was already gone and she felt slightly flustered.



「Now then, we are going now. This short time was really fun.」



『Ri, right. Well then Roze-dono. Kuwaibel. And then everyone of the kingdom. Stay in good health all of thee.』



When they looked up to the sky from where the words came, there was the figure of Tio who had transformed to dragon before anyone knew it and Hajime riding on her back.



The figure of the gallant and magnificent black dragon that could be seen to be different from Helmut in a glance caused the people to make commotion and raised joyful cheer of astonishment. In the middle of that uproar, Roze who guessed what was happening raised her voice in panic.



「Do, don't tell me, you two are planning to leave right now!? We still haven't expressed our thanks at all! Please, stay for a bit more here!」



「If it's thanks we have received enough. Your words queen-san are the greatest gift more than anything.」



「Ha, Hajime-sama. Such thing-, that isn't a token of appreciation at all-」



『That's right, both of you! Besides, I want to be together with Haha-ue more!』



Roze who desperately tried to make the two stay with moist eyes, and Kuwaibel who pleaded at Tio like a spoilt child. The people who noticed from that appearance that their heroes would leave also yelled words asking the two to stay one after another.



「It's the same like a weapon. It's not fitting for an existence like me to stay beside the people who will work hard walking forward with their own legs from here on. Later!」



『……Boy. A king who guide the world wouldst not cry seeking his mother. Always gallantly let out the dragon's roar. Remember that okay?』



Saying that, the two turned around. They didn't even loko back at the words asking them to stay and their figure turned small faraway just like fickle wind that drifted away.



「Geez……to not even let us express our thanks sufficiently……they are really selfish, whimsy, hics-……and kind demon god-sama and true dragon-sama.」



『Haha-ue……I will, do my best. I'll become a true dragon Haha-ue can be proud of.』



Inside the world where the cheers of gratitude of the people were echoing, the whispers of the queen and monarch dragon resounded solemly, yet by no means they carried any unpleasant emotion inside.



The strongest butler who had been at her side since her childhood offered a handkerchief silently. And then, he asked with reservation as though giving consideration.



「……Roze-sama. Is this okay?」



'Is it fine to not stop them from leaving?' Roze who thought that she was asked that wiped her eyes that turned red from tears while she nodded with a bright smile even then.



「No matter what reason we have, surely no one will be able to stop those people to stay here. Then, let us wait instead. We will do what we ought to do, make this world even more beautiful, so that when they come here once again riding on the wind we will be able to give them satisfaction.」



'A splendid determination. You have grown,' Sabas wanted to say that.



However, he couldn't say it. Because the meaning of his question was different.



「That, err, it's not that……they are, taking away Avenst, is that okay?」



「Eh?」



Roze-chan stiffened with a snap, a smile still on her face. After her, Kuwaibel who was in her embrace and Bovid and others who were cheering behind them also stiffened in a snap.



Roze averted her gaze still with a smiling face thinking 'Just what is gramps talking about I wonder?'. Her gaze moved toward the place where Avenst was parked.



Not there.



No matter how many times she looked, the nation on ship that had been together with them in joys and sorrows until now wasn't there. Or rather, the goods and tools for living, the personal effects that should be placed in the resident district and production district, all of them were left into a huge mound at slight distance away before anyone noticed.



A wind blew pass the empty space. Ah, the adult underwear of a lady that was previously hanged on the tip of the main cannon to dry it was blown by the wind! It was lightly dancing in the sky!



Roze blinked.



As she thought, the figure of mother ship Avenst wasn't there. If this was in anime, then surely there would be the ship's silhouette blinking in the empty spot with sound effect *pikon pikon-*.



Sabas spoke with a really complicated expression toward Roze who was in the state of petrification still with a smiling face.



「If I may be so presumptuous to speak……」



「Wha, what is it, gramps?」



「……Perhaps, that person had taken our commitment?」



「Commitment?」



The conversation that showed Roze's determination and resolve to Hajime was flowing inside Roze's brain. The memory was filtered by the truth that was Sabas's words.



Now, let's try remembering it clearly!



『Yes, perhaps that is so. But, didn't Hajime-sama say it yourself? What is starting from here on is the "rebirth" dragon kingdom Avenst. Even if that isn't a monarch dragon core, even if it's a dragon core energy that is already processed, we will never make use of dragon core as weapon until the end of the world.』



・Roze-chan's true feeling



――We won't use Avenst as weapon, so we don't need the jewel for activating it.



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――We don't need this kind of battleship anymore okay!



『……You really, won't use it until the end the world?』



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――Eh, seriously? Seriously, not just the jewel, but you also don't need Avenst?



『Yes. We won't.』



・Roze-chan's true feeling



――Yes, we don't need the jewel



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――Totally seriously. I say that we seriously don't need something like Avenst. Rather it's just a baggage.



『……This is a power that can rule the world. The strongest battleship. You really don't need it?』



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――Really? Even if later you say 'as I thought we need it' that won't be my problem y'know? You rea~lly don't need it then?



『Yes, we don't need it.』



・Roze-chan's true feeling



――For you to be that worried for us……. But, we really don't need that jewel.



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――How persistent. We really don't need this kind of battleship I told you. Rather, we are troubled of how to deal with it!



『But, just with this thing remaining here, it will only wither queen-san's determination and also your persuasiveness to the external side. ……Can't be helped. I'll take responsibility as the creator and deal with this thing.』



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――Got it then, if it's that much a bother for you, I'll take responsibility and accept Avenst.



『Fufu, thank you very much. At the very end……Hajime-sama is a really kind demon god-sama.』



・Roze-chan's true feeling



――Defeating Helmut, purifying the world, and on top of that you even worry about our war strength in the future, really how kind. But, even if for example it has no meaning as a battleship, it's fine for Avenst to be like that. Whether for the sake of the world, and also for our sake.



・Hajime-san's liberal translation



――Myy! Even though this is something troubling that ought to be recycled or collected as an oversized garbage, but you actually take it away for us! What kindness!



The above was the content of the chain of conversation.



What Hajime said in the end, 「Your words queen-san are the greatest gift more than anything」it also wasn't a lie. It was a gratitude that came from heart, something like thank you for letting me take your commitment.



Roze who carefully recalled her conversation's content with Hajime and guessed Hajime's true intention then began to tremble all over still with smiling face.



She certainly said that they didn't need the jewel that could return the nation on ship Avenst back into a battleship.



However, she didn't say a single word that they also didn't need Avenst with it. No, it looked like she said it, but it should be understood right!? Like from the flow of conversation, or from the particulars until now!



「Thi, thi, thi……」



「「「「「Thi?」」」」」



While Bovid and others who seemed to similarly guess the situation were making twitching expression, Roze was shaking all over while muttering……



「Thi, THIE――――――――――F!!!」



Queen-sama, that guy had stolen something enormous.



Yes, it's your nation on ship!



Roze's scream that felt like it could reach until the end of the world reverberated.



『Nou, Goshujin-sama. Art this really fine?』



「It's fine, after all the queen herself said it's fine.」



That absolutely wasn't her true intention. Or rather, it was this person who was leading on so it turned like that. Tio-san who saw the expression of Hajime who looked in terribly good mood couldn't say that. She was flying in the sky casually while her neck twisted to send her gaze at Hajime on her back.



「Even though I said that I'm taking it, but actually it's only borrowing for a bit long. I won't break it so it will be fine.」



Tio's completely wordless gaze as expected caused Hajime to be unable to endure and he spoke his rationalization. Tio shook her head as though to say 'can't be helped'.



『Nevertheless, thou looked really pleased Goshujin-sama. Was it that great to hath that jewel created? In mine opinion, I couldst not think that this artifact is that amazing for Goshujin-sama who art able to create god crystal.』



For now, let's put aside the matter about taking――borrowing a battleship from the pure queen-sama, Tio threw a question at Hajime who since some time ago was toying around with the jewel in his hand while grinning widely.



Indeed, if it was Hajime who could create god crystal, something like a crystal that was filled with immense energy wasn't something that rare. The point where it could stimulate the surrounding energy to supply heat made it seemed like it was more all-purpose than the god water that was created from god crystal, but Tio tilted her head feeling puzzled if it was something to feel that happy about.



Hajime's eyes gazed in amazement at such Tio.



「Eh? Huh? I more or less explained it right, about the thing I was trying to create?」



『Hmm? Certainly that art so, but in the middle it was mostly Goshujin-sama talking to thyself and thou immediately started to be immersed in thy own thought, honestly speaking, I didst not really understand but I thought it was something like Goshujin-sama art wishing to make something similar with god crystal.』



Hajime comprehended about Tio's thin reaction at the thing he created after hearing what she said. And then Hajime showed an self-triumphant look that he rarely showed as though saying 'then I'll let you hear it'.



「Tio, the energy that is unique to this world, the sky core energy and dragon core energy――it's troublesome so I'll call it sky dragon energy, I talked a bit about its property to you right?」



『Right, the positive energy give invigoration, and the negative energy possess the nature of pacification to obstruction. All those circulate with the core as the center which maintain the world's balance.』



「That's right. But see, that's not the essence of sky dragon core. No, if you say that's its essence then it's true that's the essence, but what ought to be really paid attention to, the property that is worthy to feel astonishment toward is not that.」



『Hou? And that is?』



Hajime who was unusually putting on airs spoke about the core's property that he became convinced about from his two days interaction with the craftsmen of Avensts and from his analysis toward the flow of dragon core energy of Helmut and Kuwaibel.



「The terrific property of sky dragon core――is in the aspect of its circulation efficiency that is a hundred percent.」



『Hmm……hmm?』



Seeing Tio who didn't really get it, Hajime began to talk gleefully.



「Tio, this is something amazing. Even in earth or Tortus, you can find any amount of circulation system, whether nature or artificial. However, you can say that a system with one hundred percent circulation rate doesn't exist. Fundamentally there must be loss that occurred without exception.」



『Hm~m, I vaguely hath heard about that. Art this a talk about thermodynamics?』



「Yeah, that's right. It's a talk about a law of thermodynamics. ……Don't you get it Tio? One of mankind's grand problems that denied thermodynamics and is said to be impossible to be realized.」



『I'm not that detailed about it though……nn? Wait a second, Goshujin-sama. Loss wouldst occur without exception, because of that it's impossible to realize? By any chance that is……』



Hajime smiled complacently at Tio who was amazingly good in making conjecture. Seeing his expression, Tio opened her eyes in shock for sure this time.



「That's right. This is still a prototype, and it can only deal with sky dragon power but……I finally laid my hands on it. One of mankind's grand problem――」



――The creation of perpetual motion.



The sky dragon power of this world, although the circulation rate was different based from the time difference and core's amount, but the energy itself would be converted from negative to positive with a hundred percent circulation rate once it got taken in into the core.



In other words, if this energy was made to circulate within a certain range, it would continue to circulate perpetually. Yes, just like how the sky dragon power was continuing to circulate within this planet.



The jewel Hajime created had sky core and processed dragon core stored inside Qwailent fleet's fuel bunker compressed until the very limit using transmutation, and the result was inserted at the center of the jewel. God crystal was then fused with it so that the problem of the small energy retention amount of the sky dragon core was cleared. And then the circulation performance was explosively increased by using sublimation magic and creation magic.



That center core――the true core had gravitational field generated by gravity magic so that the energy wouldn't escape to outside, furthermore the outer shell that was using god crystal used space magic to permit only the property of invigoration effect from the positive energy to exert influence to outside.



The positive energy that lost the invigoration power would be altered into negative energy, the true core would absorb it and converted it back into positive energy once more. The loss was zero percent so it would circulate for perpetuity.



「Currently it can only be operated with sky dragon power that can be used only by this world's machine. But, I discovered the method to convert magic power into electricity, and electricity into magic power. If I can similarly find the method to convert sky dragon power into magic power or something else……」



『Wa, wait a second Goshujin-sama.』



'I'll be able to freely control infinite magic power, or perhaps infinite heat――the dream is spreading wide yeah', Tio put a stop at Hajime who was talking passionately. As expected even Tio couldn't suppress her shudder seeing her master who was smoothly talking about something really terrifying with an expression that looked like a boy.



To speak further, that jewel that possessed a core at the center and continuously circulate for perpetuity inside the sphere could be said to be something that imitate this very planet itself. That was to say……



『Goshujin-sama, thou spoke it so easily but……art not that thing, couldst be called as a planet already?』



「Hm? ……Well, this is a really simplified one so it's doubtful whether this can be called that unconditionally. But calling it that is also not mistaken. Hm~m, come to think of it this thing is also still not named……yosh-, let's name this thing like this.」



――Perpetual motion machine Grasp Gloria(Planet in hand that is rotating for perpetuity)



It seemed that demon god-sama finally created a planet that he took possession above his hand.



「Tio. I'm going to show Avenst at Yue and others when we go home. It feels like it can even go to space if it's modified. There is also no worry about the fuel if there is Grasp Gloria. Let's even try a space travel of year 20XX!」



Tio was in a state of being filled with astonishment until she was almost bursting, but when she was Hajime's good mood it seemed that her heart was also gradually calming down.



Even if she lived for more than five hundred years, but as long as she was beside Hajime then she might not get tired of living. While vaguely thinking of such thing, she energetically replied『Right!』.



But, at that timing a voice resounded from a bit far away.「Oh?」The two of them tilted their head at each other, and then when Hajime and Tio looked behind, there they saw the figure of Roze riding on the back of Kuwaibel who was flying even though a bit unsteadily in his grown-up form.



In addition there were even Bovid, Crow siblings, and Sabas riding sky battlecraft. Even behind them there were a lot of people riding sky battlecrafts and small airships with every single one filled in over capacity. The dragons were flying in parallel of all those while they were watching over the humans worriedly.



「The thief over thereee~~. Return Avenst backkk~~!」



「From the legendary dragon knight to demon king, and then ranked up to demon god, and yet at the end you call me a thief. Don't you think that's a cruel false accusation?」



『I toast to Goshujin-sama's thick nerve that couldst declare what she said as a false accusation.』



Hajime and Tio cracked jokes at each other. Tio smiled wryly and she suggested at Hajime while directing a slightly gentle eyes at him.



『Now then, getting caught here wouldst be too uncool for the end of the adventure. Goshujin-sama, let's return home to earth soon.』



「Hm~? ……I guess. Yue and others will soon pick――」



『No, it's fine already. Thou bring it correct, the compass?』



Hajime smiled wryly「As I thought, it got found out huh」at Tio's statement and he took out the compass from "Treasure Warehouse II".



「When did you notice? As I thought was it that time, when I sent Avenst to Qwailent?」



『No, I felt suspicious at that time we were chasing after the sky battlecraft that got away at first. I was convinced when we boarded the mother ship. At either time, Goshujin-sama didst not show any sign of getting lost. Thou held confidence of the location of the opponent we chased in this vast world where there is only sky.』



「So, so since that time……as expected from Tio. You are sharp despite being a pervert.」



『Nn-, stop it with the surprise reward. I'm going to fall. Cough-, in all possibility, that was a consideration so I couldst enjoy my time together with just Goshujin-sama without reservation correct?』



「It's meaningless if it was exposed so quickly though.」



Hajime scratched his cheek「I'm too high spirited huh」looking awkward. With a flash Tio released her dragon transformation, and then she gave a kiss on Hajime's cheek really nonchalantly.



「I hath enjoyed to mine heart content of Goshujin-sama who art full of consideration, and also Goshujin-sama who make merry like a child. Thank you. Now, let's go home to where everyone art.」



「……Good grief. Sometimes when I'm with you it feels like I'm really childish.」



Hajime smiled wryly while he thrust forward the crystal key using the image of his homeland that he searched using the compass. The space undulated and a solemn door around two meter high appeared.



「Aa~~~, wait! Please waii~~~t!」



『Piih! Piih!』



With Roze in the lead, the people of Avenst also yelled loudly.



Hajime turned around toward them while he also raised his voice.



「I'm borrowing Avenst a bit! I'm going to play again here eventually! At that time, I'll show off the Avenst that became something like a luxurious ship from my demonic remodeling okay!」



Not as a battleship, but as a extravagance ship that invited people's dream and romance.



Those words caused the chests of Roze and the people of Avenst to feel tight. In the first place they didn't come here with serious intention of taking back the ship. They wished to say this without any strange misunderstanding.



「Aah, geez-! Please take a good care of it okay! Because that's our second homeland! Please make it into an extraordinarily lovely ship! Because I'll entrust it to you forever and eveerr~~! Plee~~~aase, absolutely come here again to meet us! Riding that ship at that time!」



「Hahah. Fine! Flying in the sky of this world is the best. We are going to come again for an adventure! Later, for real this time!」



Hajime and Tio smiled while waving their hand and they threw their body as though falling into the gate behind them. They could see the figure of Avenst's people waving their hands from the gap. Along with a very loud words of「Thank you!」.



*hyuuoooooo-* Such sound of wind pierced the ears.



「Goshujin-sama, couldst I ask why we art like this?」



「Sorry, I made a little miss.」



Hajime and Tio safely accomplished returning home. The place was at altitude eight thousand meter. They were in the middle of a grand free fall. It seemed that they were more or less right above the home of Nagumo grandparents. Because they were always above the sky at the other world, Hajime's sense was amiss and they came out in the sky despite trying to teleport in the garden.



Hajime averted his gaze looking a bit embarrassed at the really sloppy return.



While they were talking the ground was approaching, by the time the two thought about taking landing stance soon, soft golden light enveloped them. The two were immediately released from the wedge of gravity and their altitude slowly descended.



When they looked at the ground, there were the figures of the grandpa who was unable to stand up from shock, and the grandma who was looking up open mouthed at the sky with one hand holding laundry, and then, the figure of Yue smiling gently.



It was about three days since they departed. But, there was no sign of worry that could be seen in Yue's expression. Myuu and Shia who came out to the garden with light footsteps and Remia also didn't look worried at all. Rather the color of exasperation「Finally coming home huh~」could be seen strongly in their face.



While looking at Yue who quickly used soul magic to return to the present world the souls of Jii-chan and Baa-chan that slipped out because they were knocked out of their wits from seeing Hajime and Tio who landed on the garden,



「I'm home.」



「We hath returned.」



The two said their coming home words.



「Geez-. Hajime-san and Tio-san, where were you two loitering around with just the two of you desu!? We saw the letter that said you two are going adventuring, but I never heard about doing it for three days!」



Shia went angry with a huff. Her rabbit ears were pointed straight up as though to say「Hey hey, what's the meaning of this?」.



「Muu. Papa and also Tio-oneechan are unfair nano! Even though Myuu also want to go in a trip」



「Putting us aside, Ojii-sama and Obaa-sama were really worried you know?」



Myuu ran with a fast pace *sutetetete-* still wearing a sullenly bloated cheeks and she clung tightly on Hajime's leg. When the two turned their gaze from Remia's words, there they saw the Jii-chan and Baa-chan who fainted even though their soul had returned back. Sumire and Shii were looking after the two. Both of them said「Welcome home~」with really light feeling.



「……And? Where were you two going until now?」



Yue tilted her head while asking. She understood that the two went out spontaneously from the letter left behind, but as expected it seemed she guessed that the two encountered some kind of unavoidable circumstance with how they were spending three nights away without notice.



Hajime looked at Tio. Tio also looked at Hajime. After looking at each other for some reason, Hajime made a small smile



「Secret」



And said such thing.



He decided that he would save his adventure that he started with just Tio inside his chest until the time came it was necessary. Tio's gaze was wandering around with an expression as though she had stuffed her mouth with sweet candies.



Seeing such two, Yue tilted her head a bit before she smiled gently.



「……I see. Tio, did you have fun?」



「Yes. Very.」



Enticed by Yue's gentle smile, Tio also made a smile that looked like a girl.



「……It's afternoon only just now but, want to eat?」



「Ou. My stomach is really empty here.」



「I guess. We hath just gone through various things.」



The moment Yue suggested that, Hajime and Tio's stomach growled harmoniously, Yue chuckled seeing that while she returned inside the house.



Hajime and Tio followed behind her while for some reason they looked up to the sky, and then they chuckled at each other for some reason seeing each other doing similar thing.



「Wai, what's with that atmosphere of mutual understanding! Even if Yue-san ignored it, I won't be like that! Hey hey, what happened desu? Please teach meee. This is the two of you, so something must be blown away, someone raised a scream, and it absolutely became a festival of pandemonium right? I'm really curiousss」



「Myuu too! Myuu is also curious nano!」



Getting coaxed by the rabbit ears and little girl, the two of them were increasingly smiling more in humor.



Like that Hajime and Tio secretly talked at each other while soothing down Shia and Myuu.



――Someday, let's unveil the huge battleship and perpetual motion machine.



They said at each other.



While looking really amused.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Tio arc is finally over. It was long……



The passage of perpetual motion machine was done vaguely, so please spare me from any retort (sweat)



By the way, not using monarch dragon core was Hajime's consideration after a fashion.



About what will the people of that world do with the monarch dragon cores of Helmut and his sibling, it will depend on that world's people.



Well, surely Kuwaibel won't let them do as they pleased.



……I'll also say that it was simply because it was too much to write.



Now then, who should I write next I wonder





Chapter 249




AN: It will be idle stories until the next long arc after story.



I will put in unserious story one, or two more times.



By the way, this chapter's chronological order is around one month after the return.



The occupation of a reportage writer is a work of finding an interesting topic, collected data on it, and then reported it as news.



I, Hamada Shouta (28 years old), am such a reportage writer. I mainly introduced hidden well-known store and specialty of a town. ……I have never missed a meal doing this job, but there were times when there was no story to sell, so I have also done running gossip occasionally.



What someone like me is observing lately is a western restaurant『Wisteria』. It's a hidden well-know store in the city, a restaurant where you can enjoy food and coffee together without doubt.



Originally this will be where I get requested for formal news coverage and I will interview the owner for several of their prided menu, but currently I,



「Welcome. Have you decide what you will order?」



「Ah, yeah. This omelet rice, and jasmine tea. Also a blend coffee after the meal please.」



「Omelet rice and jasmine tea. And then a blend coffee after meal is it? Thank you for the order. Please wait for a bit.」



Like this, I'm coming as a normal guest. Of course, I don't tell the restaurant side that I'm a reporter or that I'm wishing for an interview.



I am staring at the back figure of the girl that is one of the reasons of that――the girl that just now was politely taking my order, the daughter of this restaurant's owner Sonobe Yuuka-chan.



Her style, I guess is fairly nice. Her chestnut hair that seems to be dyed is tied into one and her nice walking posture give a diligent impression that run counter with her appearance that is like a juvenile delinquent. How she is helping in the restaurant in holiday like this is also showing that. She is a high school student but she has a really calm atmosphere. That make her look adult.



Her long slits eyes and sharp gaze that even look glaring at other people also softened gently when she is talking with customer, that become a gap that deepen the favorable impression to her……



Hah!? The auntie at the opposite seating is glaring at me with a terrible look!? Tha, that's not it! By no means I'm staring with a feeling I need to feel guilty about! It's true I tell you! That's why, please don't look at me with those eyes as though I'm a pervert aiming at a high school girl!



The auntie averted her gaze with suspicion still remaining. From how she is calling at the girl using Yuuka-chan, most likely she is a regular customer. It seems there are a lot of elderly people in this restaurant who are thinking of Yuuka-chan like their real daughter or granddaughter.



It's not just the auntie at the opposite seat, there are even an uncle who is sitting unnoticed at the neighboring seat sending a gaze toward here like a hard-boiled detective investigating a criminal, and an old man who is reading a newspaper at the inner seating of the restaurant, but actually there is an opened hole on that newspaper from where the old man is observing me like an investigator.



……Surely everyone is worried about the girl, thanks to the incident that happened to the girl some time ago and the commotion of this and that currently happening around the girl.



Of course, it's not just because they are worried, it's also because she is really that charming of a girl――



「Thank you for waiting. Here is your jasmine tea.」



「Ah, tha, thanks.」



Damn it. I completely stuttered. Yuuka-chan is tilting her head at my suspicious behavior. Her expression is also puzzled……



「Is something the matter?」



「N, no, there is nothing.」



This is really a disgraceful behavior for a pro reporter. What are you doing getting shaken against a girl more than a decade younger huh. I cleared my throat once. I change my mindset to work mode. What is necessary is an observation ability that won't overlook even anything trivial. And then, the concentration needed for that.



「By the way――」



I open my mouth to casually probe whether I can pull out some information even just for a bit, but before I can do that, the restaurant bell is ringing *cling cling* to notify of a customer's arrival.



Naturally, Yuuka-chan's gaze speedily moves away from me. The girl's eyes narrowed just for a moment at the entering person before she turned at me once more, bow and left.



For some reason I become curious about Yuuka-chan's gaze that turned sharp and so I turn my eyes toward the man who just entered the shop even while feeling the gaze of the auntie on me. The man is wearing a shabby jacket, carrying a large bag hanging on his shoulder, and a lot of stubble on his chin. My sense of smell as a pro smell that man's true identity. In that case, as expected his objective is……



「――I told you many times already, I won't accept that kind of interview. Please don't come intruding until the restaurant.」



「Just calm down, please don't be that cruel here. If you are that obstinate, then I too cannot help but think that there is really something suspicious. It's fine even if it's just five minutes. Of course I'll wait until after the restaurant's closing. Please let me ask just for a bit――regarding all of you the "returnees".」



Bingo. As I though he is a person of the same business with that reason.



――Returnees



That is the cause that makes the situation that dragged in the girl to be complicated.



The whereabouts of Yuuka-chan along with her classmates became unknown more than a year ago. At the time it was a really big uproar about a case of spirited away that happened at a school in daytime. Similarly my interest was also pickled and I investigated various things about it.



But, regardless of the many specialists who investigated the case, in the end the cause of their disappearance and their whereabouts stayed unclear.



It was thought that perhaps this case will vanish from the people's memory at this rate, but just a little bit of time ago, Yuuka-chan and others suddenly returned back. Along with most of the students.



Where did they go? Naturally, not just the police, every public institution and information media pressed for an answer, but the answer the returnees gave to all of them was――fighting an army led by an evil god in another world, they said.



Naturally they were suspected to have abnormality in their mind or perhaps they were brainwashed using drugs. It seemed that they had been examined many times, but in the end there are no abnormality discovered from them and many institutions concluded like this.



――These people who were spirited away are trying to hide the blank one year when they vanished.



Like that. The press got superheated, and it seemed the questioning from the government also became more forceful. There were also students who don't come back until now, so it can be said to be only natural.



However, a strange situation is occurring here. With one day as the turning point, the questioning toward them is settling down like a tide pulling back.



Even a free reporter like me got warned by my comrades and seniors in the industry, and by the publishers I'm close with, they said「It's better to not get involved with this case」. Surely something, a great power that an individual like me cannot measure is in the work.



Even so, there are a lot of people who cannot stop because of their curiosity and ambition that is even bigger than that, and I'm one of such hopeless people, this man is also the same.



「Please quit it already. More than this is an obstruction of business already.」



「……Haa. I get it. Then I'll ask again another day. It will be great if at that time you will talk about what's inside your chest. Surely it's also hard for you to keep close to the chest about the matter of your friends who won't be able to come back forever right?」



「……」



Inside the restaurant become enveloped by an uneasy air. An aura that absolutely isn't respectable is emitted from the gaze of an elderly! That man, is he looking for death here!?



As expected, the man who noticed the strange air inside the restaurant is starting to rapidly retreat with twitching expression. He take out a business card from his pocket and forcefully make Yuuka-chan to hold it.



「I hope you won't misunderstand, I actually want to become your strength. Surely it's tiresome for you who is still a student to carry this large burden right? If you are fine with me, I'll listen to your story anytime.」



The man said such thing while showing a smile that is obviously fishy for anyone with working eyes before he turned around, and then perhaps to look at how Yuuka-chan is taking the situation, the man turn around while his hand is reaching toward the entrance door.



Instantly.



「Aa~, right right. Your――」



――*supan-*



The man's speech stopped. No, it was stopped.



By his own business card that flew so close it almost grazed his eyes when he was turning back, and without pause it then stabbed on the door like a joke.



No, really, what kind of joke this is? Looking there, Yuuka-chan is standing with one hand on her waist, and her other hand is lifted with two fingers pointing toward the man. It's as though those fingers were just throwing the business card that was held between them.



……Before this, I once watched a television show where a vegetable was cut using a trump card. That's why, this situation really looks like a joke, but it's also not something impossible if one has a preeminent skill I guess.



Even if for example the business card is made from paper that is far thicker than a trump card, or even though the door is made from wood that is hard in nature. Or even if the thrower isn't a pro with such occupation, but a female high school student helping out her family in her holiday!



The man's gaze is moving slowly toward the business card that is stabbed on the entrance door. The twitching on his cheeks is already at the level that cannot be hidden away.



Yuuka-chan speak with a dignified voice toward that man.



「Thank you for your concern. But, even though I look like this I'm a really strong woman, so I'll shoulder by myself the baggage I have decided to shoulder by my own will until the end. Besides……」



Yuuka-chan smile gently. In that smile there is the utmost trust? Anyone who see that smile will understand that there is no gloominess or worry at all in there, it's a smiling face that is packed with a charm that is hard to describe.



「I know someone who will do something about it when it really matters.」



'That's why, take away that business card and scram right away.' Such wordless pressure is lurking inside that charming smile. Aa, certainly, if someone get ordered by that kind of smile and gaze, then that person won't even feel like disobeying.



「I see. It will be great if you won't regret that.」



Surely that parting threat is the best the man can do. The man roughly pull out the business card and get out without even hiding his irritation.



Yuuka-chan sighed 'fuuh' and then she lightly nod at her parents who have been watching over all this time from the kitchen and counter. The parents also nodded back lightly and they return back to their work.



「Eerr, I'm really sorry for the disturbance. Please forgive the discomfort it has caused you customers.」



Yuuka-chan faced the customer seats and she quickly bowed her head. The regular customers are striving to be the first to say「Don't mind it」「It's fine you know~」「The next time he come, uncle will make my subordinate deal with him」and so on. Even the customers who aren't regulars also doesn't look like they mind it, perhaps they are affected by the dignified figure and smile of Yuuka-chan just now.



Rather, they are keep sending glances with deep interest. Those gazes feel like they are looking interested purely at Yuuka-chan herself rather than because she is a "returnee".



Right, like this Yuuka-chan's fans are increasing. Similarly I too feel toward Yuuka-chan just now――



*glare-* The auntie's gaze is flying at me. That auntie is absolutely an esper.



By the way, who is this person who will do something somehow that she refers to?



Now then, around one week since the day I learned the shocking truth that Yuuka-chan is actually an expert at card throwing.



During that time I visited Wisteria four times and observed Yuuka-chan.



……No, I'm not a stalker. Until the end this is for work. A data gathering. I feel bad for Yuuka-chan, but I too am a pro, and so I won't be merciful. I endure the abnormal stare of the regulars and also the bombing that is Yuuka-chan's smile, and stand on guard waiting until the girl reveal her faults!



The result is that it end in vain, it's completely a wasted effort. There is nothing suspicious about the girl, and there is also nothing suspicious about her classmates that come playing to the restaurant.



If I have to say what I have learned, it's that the girl is a serious girl as expected, she is lovely, and not just card throwing, from pen until vegetable stick, she is a master at throwing whatever, those are all that I learned.



I only learned for the first time the fact that even a pen can pierce through a smartphone.



The male student who seems to be a classmate and got such thing done at his smartphone and Yuuka-chan herself are,



「Sonobeee!? What the hell have you done!? My smartphone is dying here! Don't get carried away just because you are that guy's mistress okay!?」



「Shut up, idiot Tamai-. I'm not a mistress! So it's because you guys are saying such things that recently Yue-san and others are looking at me strangely isn't it!?」



「Just because of that, this is still too much right!? Aa, now my smartphone looks like Tio-san whose ass is stabbed by Nagumo ain't it. Even though my smartphone is skewered it's still gasping and not dying yet. Shiitt, can I at least take out the data? Oi, Sonobe, take responsibility and ask Nagumo for a new one. Even that guy if he is begged by his mistress――」



「Fuhn」



「Aa!? Carrot and radish and cucumber are stabbing my smartphone all over!?」



They were quarreling with each other really like a student.



I only learned for the first time the fact that even vegetable stick can pierce through a smartphone.



They yelled several words that I'm curious about, but Yuuka-chan who is angry with that bright red face is somehow cute so I cannot remember.



Nevertheless, what is the meaning of "aijin" I wonder? Oh man, I don't really get the most recent vocabs that the youngsters are using. (TN: Aijin means mistress in Japan. The dialogue in Japan is heavily relying context because many Japanese words sound similar. When Yuuka and Tamai were talking, the word aijin was written using kanji so it can be quickly understood what they were talking about. But the reporter is parroting aijin using katakana, he is under the impression that it might be some new slang because it's unthinkable for a good kid to be called a mistress just from that conversation.)



I am recalling such trivial thing while today too my feet are heading toward Wisteria.



Even if there is no information I can get about the returnees, the cooking in that restaurant is really good. The atmosphere of the restaurant is also calming, so I can drink coffee at the end while relaxing. After soaking my body in this harsh industry, taking a short time in this kind of restaurant is really healing me.



I can see Wisteria in front of me right now. A large stylish signboard can be seen on the quiet restaurant's appearance. The time is evening, so Wisteria that is illuminated by the madder red of evening even looks like the entrance to a different world.



「Just what am I thinking」



Is it because the girl had encountered spirited away phenomenon? I retort to myself after saying that kind of impossible imagination. I'm thinking for a little, perhaps it's better to just normally interview about the restaurant.



The restaurant's atmosphere and cooking, coffee, and then a beautiful high school student is the future second generation~



Yep, I feels like that can become a good enough article. Although, if I do that, then inevitably Yuuka-chan's background will get exposed and it will only shift back to the topic of "returnee".



When I'm about to arrive after a little bit more with a wry smile on my face, suddenly a familiar girl get out from the restaurant, it's Yuuka-chan.



「What? She looks strange……」



Yuuka-chan is holding a mobile phone in her hand and she is talking to somewhere while walking briskly through a path that is different from the path I'm coming from.



I become strangely concerned and in the end I don't enter the restaurant and follow behind Yuuka-chan instead.



Yuuka-chan ended her call midway and she started jogging.



……She, she is unexpectedly fast. I have confidence with my waist and legs from my work, but after ten minutes I'm starting to run out of breath. The cause is one. Yuuka-chan looks like she is jogging in a glance, but the fact is, amazingly with each step she is steadily accelerating. Inevitably I am sprinting almost with all my strength.



Yuuka-chan. You aren't just a throwing master, you are also a jogging master aren't you?



A man desperately following behind a high school girl while breathing roughly 'zee~ zee~'. If someone is looking from the side then it's definitely out. I'm praying so that no one will report me while sprinting for a while.



Yuuka-chan entered an empty building that is for sale.



「In this kind of day when the sun is already sinking, toward this kind of place, just what is her business?」



I'm feeling suspicious while gripping my phone tightly so that if something happened to Yuuka-chan I can report it anytime. At the same time, I'm also feeling the indication of a scoop and take out the camera I'm always carrying.



While confirming that there is no one around, I step into the building cautiously.



I guess originally this building was used for office. The first floor is spacious and wide, and there is the figure of Yuuka-chan at the center.



I'm hiding behind a pillar and watch over the situation.



And then before long, five men appear from deeper inside the building. All of them are wearing black suits. No matter how you look they aren't respectable person.



「I came. And then where is the customer of my restaurant?」



I guess it right now. Yuuka-chan was called by those suspicious fellows! Her customer is taken hostage! Just who are these people?



Abduction and confinement, this is not a usual situation.



I clicked my camera shutter wordlessly.



「Don't be so rushed. We aren't kidnapping anyone or anything. They must be eating dinner normally around this time. It's just that our colleagues are on the lookout near the,, that's all.」



「Oh, really. And? What do you want me to do?」



Even though this is an outrageous situation, Yuuka-chan is still keeping her hands on her jacket's pockets, while her mouth that is holding a chewing gum without me noticing is blowing out a balloon. Fear and unease are nonexistent in her expression, if I have to say the color of exasperation is stronger in her face.



In a glance, she is a delinquent girl looking down at an adult――she can be seen like that.



In fact the opponent might be feeling like that because their face frowned slightly.



「Just like what we said before, we only want you to cooperate with us. About the ability that all of you have, and then about the method to obtain it and the place.」



「Haa. And, why is it I'm the one who you called out using a method that is going as far as that?」



I understood that they are people aiming for information of the returnees based from the flow of their dialogue. However, Yuuka-chan isn't the only returnee. Why is she the one targeted and not the other students?



The answer is spoken from the man's mouth.



「It's nothing big, you are that boy's mistress right?」



「……」



That word came out again. The word "aijin". Is that some kind of secret jargon? Hahah, I really don't get it all~. Eh, why is Yuuka-chan turning that red? Just where does her cool figure just now gone to!?



The man glanced at the fiercely trembling Yuuka-chan and he continued.



「We are really well aware about that boy's abnormality. It's impossible to even approach him and his relative. Our colleagues were only "changing job" one after another. The other students look like they have weak influence. But, you are different. You are outside the framework of relative, but you have special relationship with that boy. If it's your words, even that boy won't be able to bluntly ignore it.」



Special re――eh? What did he say? I didn't hear it really clearly just now.



「We want you to request him following our instruction. That's all. If you do just that, all of your customers can go to your restaurant without knowing any――」



「First thing first, that thing about mi, mi, mistress. Where did you hear it from?」



Yuuka-chan questioned while still looking down with her body trembling. The man raised an eyebrow as though to say「Why are you concerned with that one?」, yet he still answered.



「Mainly from your classmates, then also from your parents. They were talking about it normally in the restaurant, and then even from the conversation when shopping, I got the report that your parents were talking worriedly that they wished you won't be a mistress but marry normally.」



「……Everyone you better remember this. My vegetable sticks are hungering for smartphone.」



It seems that the smartphones of her classmates and parents will become the prey of the vegetable sticks, just like the smartphone of that boy some time ago.



The eyes of Yuuka-chan who lifted up her face are steady. As might be expected from the face of a beauty that possess long slits eyes, it has a remarkable intensity when it make such expression. The man in the front stirred for a moment as though he is faltering.



「A, anyway, will you follow along with our "cooperation request"?」



「If I don't, my customers will randomly meet misfortune?」



「……」



The wordless reply is the proof of affirmation.



Seeing the situation that is becoming more and more outrageous, I decided to withdraw for the moment from here to report this. What is passing through my mind is the sudden calming down of the returnees commotion and the warning from the people in the same business. Furthermore, from the talk of those men in suits in addition with their experienced air, the possibility that they are government people is high.



Perhaps reporting this to police will be pointless. On the contrary, perhaps I will also be in danger with the reason that informer = witness.



However, there is no way I cannot leave this as it is. Yuuka-chan came here alone for the sake of her restaurant customers even knowing the danger. She is a girl who is more than a decade younger than me, but she came here after mustering her courage for the sake of others! Then, I too have to do what I can!



Because, even I am a customer that love Wisteria!



(Yuuka-chan. Please don't provoke the opponent and do your best just a little bit――)



While gritting my teeth that I cannot leap out like a hero, I try to retreat until a place where my voice won't be able to be heard when I report this.



But, that cannot come true.



「Uguh」



「……Good grief. Rat like your kind is always barging in from everywhere.」



I got caught. There was also these guys comrade behind me. My neck get choked by an arm and I get trouble breathing. My body get groped around with one hand and my camera and smartphone are taken. I get dragged along out from behind the pillar.



Noticing the commotion, Yuuka-chan and the men look to this direction. The men are making unpleasant face. Yuuka-chan's expression looks like she wants to say「What the hell」. No, it's strange for me to be the one to say it but Yuuka-chan, isn't it better if you show a bit different reaction than that……. What happen with your cool and unperturbed attitude?



「That person, is more or less my customer though?」



「A reporter, Hamada Shouta. Looks like he is investigating your surrounding.」



My background is exposed from the business card they took. What kind of expression Yuuka-chan will make now she know I'm tricking her I wonder. Her expression that enter my sight that is turning blurry from the distress is……ah, yep, it's just like usual. She isn't thinking anything of it. She is cool and lovely. Can I cry?



「It doesn't matter what is that person's background. And? What are you going to do with that person?」



「……It's something you don't need to know. Can I consider that our deal is struck? Then, you can go back to your restaurant. We will contact you again later. Our thanks for your cooperation.」



Whose mouth is saying that? After threatening a girl who is still a student!



An indescribable rage is surging inside me. What will happen to me after this? Of course I'm feeling scared about that. The inside of my head is already messed up. What to do? What to do!? There are only those words that keep flowing in and vanishing inside.



In this hopeless situation, a voice suddenly resounded. It's Yuuka-chan's voice.



「……Ah, yep. This side is all right though. Ah, I see, so it's over. Okay.」



The men look suspicious. Me too. The reason is because Yuuka-chan is talking to empty space.



The sudden happening make me only able to be confused, but it appears the men are different. Their facial expression changes as though they recalled something and their hand moved toward their chest pocket.



「Chih. Some kind of ability!? Don't mo――」



「Shut up.」



Yuuka-chan says sharp words. Right after that, the two men raised short scream and they crumble down. Almost at the same time, Yuuka-chan's face turn at my direction, and at the next moment, 'puih' she spit out something.



That thing make the sound of slicing wind while passing through near my forehead, right after that, the pressure restricting my neck vanished.「Guah」That cry make me turn around reflexively, and there I see the figure of a man holding his eye looking pained.



The hand of me who fell on my backside felt a flabby sensation. When I look there, there is a chewing gum that has been stretched long and narrow. This is the chewing gum Yuuka-chan was chewing. There is no need to guess, perhaps Yuuka-chan threw the gum she held in her mouth to hit the man's eyes.



Groans and screams are overlapping even while I'm slightly befuddled.



When I turned my gaze, there are already five men collapsing. Their leg is stabbed by a knife that release electrical discharge *crackle crackle* and then men are convulsing.



「Shit-. Do you think this will end well for you after doing something like this?」



The man who received the chewing gum spit said such thing while tears are trickling from his one eye. At the same time, his hand secretly reach toward his breast pocket, and *ton-* that hand is stabbed lightly by a long and narrow knife like a joke.



「I'll return those exact words back to you. Get punished a lot later by the demon king-sama.」



*pachin-* Yuuka-chan's fingers snap resounded. The knife stabbed into the man's hand immediately crackled. The man raises a small scream and fall powerlessly.



「Please don't move from there.」



Faster than I can comprehend that those words are directed at me, Yuuka-chan look toward the entrance while she lifted her hand toward the collapsed men. Thereupon, of all things. The knives pulled out by itself and fly toward her hand.



I can only open my eyes wide at the strange happening before my eyes. I don't even have the composure to scrap off Yuuka-chan's chewing gum from my hand.



Yuuka-chan catch the five knives flying at her with one hand and she start juggling them using one hand like a street performer. Wha, what a dangerous act……is what I thought, but her gaze is fixed toward the entrance without change. From that I understand that this extremely dangerous skill is nothing more than a diversion for her.



The figure of the girl looking relaxed with one hand still put inside her pocket and the other hand juggling throwing knives is really picturesque that I get completely fascinated.



Even unconsciously I feel like I have to say something here, I try to let out words by desperately moving my mouth that doesn't really want to hear what my brain is ordering it to do.



However, before I can, the reason why Yuuka-chan is staring at the entrance finally arrives.



What entered the building along with a low engine sound is two black cars. No matter how I think, they are obviously the comrade of the fainted guys here. Come to think of it, before I entered here, I believe I saw no car nearby. That means, were they already coming here to pick up these men, or else they had arranged to come if there is no contact in certain interval……



「How ill-prepared. As expected is it just like Nagumo said, they are underestimating us because we are children?」



Yuuka-chan whispered that. The cars' headlight illuminated at Yuuka-chan. At her feet are naturally me who fell on my ass and the collapsed men. The cars came to a sudden stop and they try to back away in hurry.



「My bad, but this is an order from the sca~ry demon king-sama. Well, he told me to only do it if possible though.」



Inside the building that is shined by the headlights, a new light source is created. It's from Yuuka-chan's knives. The juggled throwing knives are blazing up along with *gou-* sound.



Yuuka-chan throw three knives high in the air, she catch the remaining two blazing knives between her fingers, and right after that, 「shih」she throw them along with such spirited voice.



The two knives are flying while pulling trail of fire behind them. Each of them is like a streak of laser, stabbing on both cars' bonnet and explosive sound roared from there. The cars lost their momentum and also the control before they crashed on a pillar and wall.



……Unbelievably, it seemed that Yuuka-chan's blazing knives pierced the car engines.



Men rolled out from the driving seats of the cars. At that time Yuuka-chan caught the falling knives and throws them again. At the same time, even though she is throwing with one hand, the two knives splendidly follow two different tracks and stabbed the thigh of the men. They collapsed with a thud from the stun gun effect.



「Something like this I think. The rest, I'll leave the clean up at Nagumo just like he said……」



Yuuka-chan is playing around with her knives by twirling them around while her gaze is moving toward me.



……Just what is this extremely extraordinary situation?



Now I'm sharing a special circumstance with her. Will I become a secret cooperator that protects her secret after this? Will the two of us face against powerful organization? Will I give comfort to her when she is tired of fighting?



Like that someday the two people……



「E~rr, anyway, sorry to do this while you are in your own world but, hoih」



*pushu-* It feels like something stabbed me. When I look at the back of my hand, there is a knife that she was holding before this. Hm, can you wait a bit, Yuuka-chan? Right now my hand is sticky with the chewing gum that you were chewing, and now the back of my hand is stabbed like this, just what is this situation……



「Please come to the restaurant again as a normal customer.」



「Ah, wai-, ABABABABABABABABAABABABABABAHBAAH!?」



There my consciousness is swallowed into darkness.



Her last words. I see, until the end, you are going to fight without anyone else knowing huh. So that's your resolve.



Loving the normal everyday, possessing mysterious power, you leap into the extraordinary days without hesitation for the sake of other people.



Aa, I know. Just what is such a girl is called. I never thought that it really exist in reality.



Yes, you are――



A few days later after the ill-prepared attack of a certain government agency. The western restaurant Wisteria that was loved by the local people. It was afternoon, when it was time where people's visit was the slowest, inside the restaurant was sparse despite it was a holiday.



At such Wisteria the bell that informed of the customer's arrival played its ring. When Yuuka who was wiping the table turned her gaze, there she found the boys trio Tamai and co, and also Miyasaki Nana and Sugawara Taeko.



While smiling wryly thinking that her friends came for jabbering again, Yuuka opened her mouth to welcome them,



「Yo-, magical girl!」



「Are business flourishing, magical girl!」



「Oh man, that's really a great picture yeah, magical girl!」



She got called with strange nickname by the boys trio. After mistress now it was magical girl? Fine then. If that's what you wish then it's war. Do you have enough spare smartphone in stock?



With a fixed smiling face, Yuuka took out vegetable sticks from the kitchen.



「Wait wait, Yuuka-chi! It's not like we are making fun of you. No, Tamai-kun and co are making fun of you though.」



「Ahaha, err, Yuuka. Here.」



Nana immediately hid her smartphone and pacified Yuuka, while Taeko was smiling wryly and took out a magazine from her bag and handed it over to Yuuka. Beside her, 「Ple, please spare at least this childdd!」Tamai embraced his new smartphone on his stomach and crouched down.



「Geez, just what's with you guys.」



When Yuuka dropped her gaze at the magazine she was given while saying that, it appeared that it was s minor gossip magazine. It was something that published things like urban legend and so on. Its credibility was zero. It was that kind of magazine.



Yuuka found a page that was folded and she opened that page while gazing dubiously at Taeko,



「!?」



She stiffened.



It was only natural. Because there,



――A battle of dusk! Magical girl exist! What is the true identity of her who protects the citizens from a mysterious organization!?



Such headline was written with large font, and the picture of Yuuka who was emitting flame was printed there.



Of course, Yuuka's face wasn't shown, there was only the side profile of a girl who looked like she was emitting flame projected there. But, it was obvious in a glance for those who knew Yuuka. The knives that were faintly visible inside the flame and the sparking knives were also the proof.



Yuuka was opening wind holes using curving throwing vegetable sticks at the smartphones of Tamai and co who were cackling while saying things like「Magical girl(mahou shoujo)? No, this is magical high school girl right?」「No, it's magical mistress(mahout aijin) see」「That sound indecent somehow. Rather how about demon king mistress(maou aijin)?」, and then she made a phone call from her own smartphone.



『What's up?』



「What do you mean what's up, Nagumo! The concealment!? You were concealing the case weren't you!?」



『Aa, about that article huh. You see……hm? Do you hear anyone screaming? Sounds like Tamai and co there.』



「Who cares about that, explain the reason why I become a magical girl!」



Yuuka questioned Hajime while ignoring Tamai and co who were grieving「This time it's celery!? Damn it!」while embracing their smartphones that were returning blank eye(screen).



『No, I erased everything like the camera data and so on, I also manipulated their memory. But as expected from a pro journalist. It appeared he also took several picture using his smartphone and transferred the pictures into his PC at his home.』



「Guh. His gaze was always following me stickily every time he came to the restaurant, so I thought he was surely a no-hoper third class reporter.」



『……Well, putting aside your harsh evaluation. That reporter put out the article at a gossip publisher while I was pressed with dealing at the public safety side. Even though he should have no memory, he moved fast to make the article because the picture was just interesting.』



Yuuka was determined. The next time that reporter bastard came, it wouldn't end well for him, she resolved.



It was impossible for anyone to judge that it was Yuuka from that picture except her friends and comrades, and above all the magazine was a local gossip publisher. The number of copies printed and also the number of buyer was few. Yuuka considered the reporter as a customer and against her better judgment she didn't make him faint. She cursed her careless self and let out a sigh of resignation.



By the way, when she eventually made him fainted, for some reason around the end that reporter was staring at her stickily, on top of that he was excessively grinning in his own world, he looked simply revolting so Yuuka electrified him somewhat reflexively.



『Well, in the end it's just gossip. It won't become a big problem I believe. If it happens then it happens, I'll crush it entirely at that time. So don't worry about that.』



「It's not like I'm particularly uneasy or anything. It's Nagumo after all.」



Just what was it? Yuuka felt smirking gazes from outside her field of vision. It also felt like there was exasperated gazes「They are do~ing it again~」.



A voice calling at Hajime could be heard from the other side of the phone. It seemed that he was still in the middle of dealing with a trouble.



「My bad suddenly calling you. I got already for now about the situation.」



『Aa. Then later――』



Yuuka told that she was ending the call seeing that Hajime was busy, Hajime too also replied――just before that, it was as though he got a mischievous idea and made a stifled laugh. And then,



『Later, magical girl Yuuka-chan』



「-, You-」



Before she could complain, *tuut tuut* lifeless electronic sound sounded. Yuuka was trembling all over with her eyes staring fixedly at the smartphone while her cheeks were gradually turning red. Then she whispered.



「……Don't call me, Yuuka-chan.」



Naturally, it went without saying that she was given the wide grin of the two people at the kitchen and the counter, and her five friends.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I caught cold. The Word frequently deadlocked. When I changed using Ichitaro(TN: Japanese program), my data flew. Okay. I'm gonna post the chapter at any cost.



And so this chapter was late, but it's Yuuka chapter that felt tedious.



I also want to write a long arc with Yuuka as the main, so this time it's just an idle story.



The chronological order is around one month after the return.



Everyone too please be careful of catching cold.





Chapter 250




AN: Thank you for waiting.



It's a trifling ordinary day arc.



I wrote ①, but I'm planning to interpose the student life arc with idle story, so it's just for numbering.



I'm undecided whether next week I'll also write student life arc's continuation. It will depend on my mood.



Blue sky without a single cloud was spreading vast, in a corner of resident area that was filled with comfortable cool air that was characteristic of the morning time,



――*gashan-*



Such sound of crashing and,



――Gupeh!?



Such scream were resounding.



「……Hajime? Are you listening?」



「Hm? A, aah. I'm listening Yue.」



Yue who was walking beside Hajime while making footstep sounds regularly puffed up her cheeks in a bit of dissatisfaction.



With their height difference as one factor, Yue who was turning her gaze at Hajime as though she was peering from below was naturally looking like she was directing upturned gaze at him, and despite having seeing her gesture that was like that many times until now, Hajime couldn't prevent his heartbeat from jumping up for a moment.



And so, the cause of the sound of crashing and scream just now――a passing by salary man riding a bicycle in his way to his workplace who was driving inattentively, and in the end he crashed onto a telephone pole and toppled over, such tragedy was smoothly slipping off from Hajime's mind along with his moving away gaze.



Yue fastened her pace to move ahead of Hajime and then there she made a beautiful turn with a twirl. Her golden threads hair softly fluttered and glittered as though it was even blessed by the morning sunlight, while her skirt that was similarly fluttering softly greatly emphasized her whitely alluring absolute territory. (TN: Absolute territory = zettai ryouiki = exposed skin between top of knee-high socks and hemline of skirt)



――*zubo-*, dowah!?



A boy who seemed to be a high school student from another school walking at the edge of street put his foot into a ditch and he screamed, but Hajime whose heart was captured by Yue who was staring straight at him while walking backward didn't even turn his gaze there.



「It's dangerous walking backward like that you know?」



「……Nn. But, like this both of us are inside each other's sight.」



Yue was staring still at him expressionlessly, but her default expression crumbled slightly. The gently softening expression――Yue's smile stimulated Hajime's déjà vu and he narrowed his eyes.



……A postman overtaking Hajime from the side seemed to get his brain stimulated. As the compensation of not looking straight while driving, he almost got into an accident and put on his emergency brake *kikii――!!*. He came to a stop with a really impressive drift.



「……Hajime?」



Yue tilted her head at Hajime's state. Hajime realized the source of his déjà vu and he muttered「My dream became reality huh」. Hearing that mutter, Yue tilted her head even further to the opposite side to show her confusion.



That gesture was so lovely that Hajime loosened his face.



At the same time, a female high schooler walking from the roadside suddenly pressed on her nose and crouched down. Red liquid of joy was dripping from between her hand. This female high schooler who was whispering「I, I saw it again. It's just too angelic just now」was also discharging out drips of red joy at the same place four, five days ago, so surely she was in a healthy state without any abnormality.



「You see, I had seen Yue's figure wearing that uniform while walking backward like this before.」



「……Nn? I had done this before?」



「No, we have gone to school together many times, but something like this is the first time. It's just, it's embarrassing to confess this but……I saw it at Haltina's great dungeon, yeah.」



「……ah. Fufuh. Did you dream it?」



「Don't laugh.」



Hajime looked aside while scratching his cheek. For his delusion and desire to be known by his lover, even though it was at this late hour, no, exactly because it was at this late hour that it was a bit embarrassing.



The true identity of the déjà vu Hajime felt. The cause was one of the trial that he received at the capturing of great sea of trees Haltina. The capturing members were shown world of dream at the same time when they were teleported. There they experienced a world of supreme convenient wish they desired on top of having their inconvenient past written off.



What Hajime dreamed off inside that world was ordinary days on top of the erasure of his despair and hellish pain he experienced at the abyss. Inside that world there was Yue as his lover and he went to school with her like this. Both of them were carefree under the sunlight without any conflict, pain, and anxiety.



Yue was twirling like now and she steadily walked backward in front of Hajime, wearing the uniform of the school Hajime attended.



The figure of Yue wearing blazer and skirt, and then loafers, with the school bag held behind her, she was walking backward……. This spectacle of dream waiting ahead after he passed through all difficulties was truly the symbol of happiness for Hajime.



「Haa haa, my goddess――abeshih!?」



The finger bullet Hajime unconsciously fired splendidly hit the forehead of a man peeking out from between the curtain of the second floor room of a house the two happened to pass by. Of course, the glass window was beautifully pierced through.



The man who was blown away along with an impact that felt like it would tear off the head, without pause he was sent flying into the corridor with a force that could smash through a door. From inside the house,「Dear-, Takeshi is! Takeshi is coming out from his room!」「What!? Recently he is doing this every morning isn't he!? Finally Takeshi too is resolved to return to society……uuuh」such harmonious voices could be heard.



Surely the number of family conversation there was increasing in proportion of the number of hole in the window. It was something wonderful.



「You are used with the school already?」



「……Nn. It's fresh and novel. Especially the going to and from school alone with just Hajime.」



Yue's smile deepened at Hajime's attempt to change topic while she replied.



「Though I also feels like this isn't something we need to decide the rotation shift and even purposefully not using car though. Even going through shortcut, it's still faster by riding bicycle.」



「……Hajime don't get it. Going to and from school with just two people is our important time. This is the consensus of opinion so objection or refusal won't be allowed.」



「I, I see. But still……」



Just as Yue said, Yue, Shia, Kaori, and Shizuku enforced a rotation shift where each of them would go to school with just Hajime once a week. It was something that was decided by their consensus of opinion, and the time became an important time where they could be together with just Hajime who most of time was together with someone among his families.



Hajime more or less also guessed that. However, there was a relatively pressing problem in the case of all these four people, especially in regard to Yue, because of that Hajime's expression was a bit twitching.



「……You don't like, being alone with me?」



「There is no way that's true.」



Getting asked such thing with a sad looking gaze, Hajime had no other option than giving an immediate answer.



Even if he witnessed the tragic scenes of all the passerby in the range where Yue's expression was visible were crashing, tumbling over, or spraying out joy from their nose.



When he was going to and from school with just Yue, most of the time the path they traveled became like a disaster site in their passing. Also to say more, the smartphones of the smartphone users all over the place who suddenly became unmannered were invited to heaven and agonizing cries in that kind of meaning also echoed in the path that was turned into a road of tragedy……



Hajime fastened his brisk pace and caught up to Yue, he then took out a glasses with crimson frame from his pocket and gently put it on Yue. Glasses girl Yue blinked her eyes.



This glasses was actually an artifact that possessed recognition obstruction effect but,



――*Gashan! Kikii――, gosha! Chuin!*



――So, so cutebuberah!? Hidebuh. Abeshi!?



In front of the charm of Yue wearing glasses, the artifact bent its knees in defeat.



「……A charm that nullified an artifact that is enchanted with age of god magic, huh. You haven't actually obtained a concept magic of charm or something haven't you?」



「……?」



Hajime whispered to himself and took off the glasses that had opposite effect from Yue. The glasses artifact of recognition obstruction was quite effective at first, but recently it was becoming an item that increased Yue's charm instead.



Hajime could only cocked his head in puzzlement, but his mother Sumire who heard this story was staring blankly while answering「That's must be because she is with you」as though it was nothing. Recently their surrounding had calmed down compared to at the beginning and Yue became able to enjoy her time alone with Hajime to her heart's content. Surely Yue's euphoria was overflowing out at her time alone with her beloved, that seemed to be the case.



While thinking 'Don't tell me it's really that kind of reason?', Hajime turned his gaze from the glasses back to Yue,



*howawan~*



Small heart mark bubbles were gushing out from Yue's body only from her gaze meeting Hajime's……was how it looked like. Hajime scrubbed his eyes and when he looked at her one more time, there was only Yue there smiling normally. It seemed that he was hallucinating.



「We arrived, at the station.」



「Nn」



Deciding not thinking deeper about it, Hajime thought of preparing a more powerful artifact. When Hajime was thinking that, they arrived at the nearest station that was actually the a detour in their going to and from school.



Yue returned walking at Hajime's side once more and with an extremely natural motion she linked her arm with Hajime's. Her soft sensation and sweet fragrance tickled his nose and he received sharp gazes from the station workers and salary men. Even now their expression looked as though they were going to yell out「Showing off right from the morning」with spits flying out.



Yue-sama who was in cloud nine of happiness from the morning didn't seem to bother at all with the surrounding, but for Hajime who was endeavoring to return to his former livelihood in the modern Japan, this situation was really serious. It was to the degree that he needed to hold back his hand that wanted to immediately move toward his thigh. Of course his partner railgun wasn't there.



While the two were having idle chat like nothing at the station platform, a strange situation that was already the routine every morning was starting to occur.



No matter how one looked, people were congesting at the position of the train coach Hajime and Yue were lining up for. There were many male, but there was also quite the number of female. Also, in a glance the females were looking like they were fixing their eyes on smartphone, newspaper, or book, but from Hajime's viewpoint it was totally obvious that they kept glancing his and Yue's way.



(Every single morning, they aren't getting tired of it. This is already at the level of killing intent. ……Well, going to school with different woman every morning, if it's asked whether this can't be helped then it really can't be helped I guess.)



Among these people that were forming lines, there weren't only Yue's fans, there must be Shia's fans too there. Small voices like「Toying around with Shia-chan, this shitty braatt」could be heard sometimes. By the way, when he was going with Kaori or Shizuku, Hajime would go until their house to pick them up by riding train, but at that time there would be salary men that happened to catch sight of him without fail.



By the way, the closest station from Kaori and Shizuku's house was at the opposite site with the school sandwiched in between of that station and the nearest station from Hajime's house. There were eight stations until this station.



If this happened to a normal male high schooler, their mind would surely get disturbed from getting exposed to this storm of negative emotions like jealousy and so on that the mere expression of bed of nails wasn't possibly enough to signify the significance.



Of course, the one here wasn't a possessor of soft mind that would wither down from such thing.



Glancing at a salary man uncle lining up behind him who was subtly closing the distance, Hajime circled his hand around Yue's waist and he pressed her body tightly toward him.



The surrounding became noisy. Murderous gazes were doubling.



「……Hajime?」



「Hey, Yue. It's fine even if we take detour, so how about we stop riding train? I don't have any intention at all letting you get touched by anyone, and if there is that kind of guy trying that, I'll tear off his nails even if it's still in the stage of attempt, but there is also no need at all to mass produce people with their life ended right?」



Yue who tilted her head in puzzlement seemed to guess the meaning of his words a beat later. Or rather, it seemed she was really ignoring the surrounding's situation as though it was only natural. As expected from a former royalty. It appeared that it was the default state to put the gazes of the rabble outside the mind. Or possibly, perhaps it was also that she wasn't able to see anything but Hajime.



Yue showed a bit of thinking gesture「……Nn~~」and her index finger suddenly stood up straight.



「……『Everyone, bee~~come unconcerned with us』」



The words sounded slow and stupid, but they were whispered with a mysterious echo. Invisible power permeated the whole station as though it was spreading in ripples, and right after that, including the salary man who was gradually getting closer, the expression of the people who were focusing on Hajime and Yue went 'hah' as though they returned to their senses.



And then, they were making wondering expression about why were they making long lines in the entrance for this train coach like this while scattering toward other spots.



「What should I say, that's a special bargain sale of【Divine Statement】huh. You want to go to school by train that much?」



「Nn-. To speak in Hajime's wording, this is romance. Therefore I won't give it up.」



「Yo, you are insisting it like that huh. I got it. Well, it's also nothing really difficult, I'll reinforce the recognition obstruction artifact quickly.」



「……Glasses?」



「Glasses.」



He wouldn't give that up. Glasses girl Yue-sama was the key point for Hajime.



After that, during their walk until they reached the school, it went without saying that the words of god were literally firing in rapid succession toward the people who just arrived to ride the train and the crowd of people getting off the train. If it was for the sake of her desire, Yue-sama wouldn't be stingy with using the words of god! It was Hajime>Unsurpassed wall>Everything else for her!



Hajime and Yue who arrived at school reached the shoe locker while respectively gathering attention.



There was one more template that was still continuing here.



――*rustle rustle rustle-*



Numerous letters surged like avalanche. It was a really retro method to put letter into shoe locker, but there was no other way for these people to convey their feeling so it couldn't be helped. After all, the contact address of Yue and co weren't known except by their classmates and a part of friends, and on top of that if they tried to talk to them directly there was always demon king level escort constantly beside them.



「Just like always.」



「……Nn. Being liked itself isn't bad. But I cannot help to say that this is really a bother.」



Yue didn't even hide her expression of feeling troublesome, her eyes narrowed for a moment to see through something and she put several letters into her pocket while she pushed in everything else into another locker. By the way, that locker was Kaori's.



「Are those love letters from girls again?」



Hajime said that with a wry smile after guessing the sender of the letters that Yue pocketed. Just as he said, about 30 or 40 percent of the love letters Yue received came from female students.



「……Rather than calling them love letter, the letters are more like from fan or requesting to become friend, those kind of things. Idiots who are sending love letter even knowing I have Hajime doesn't matter at all, but I cannot carelessly treat the letter from girls who want to be friend with me.」



「That kind of treatment is the reason you are popular.」



Seeing Yue who lowered her eyebrows looking a bit troubled, Hajime said that looking amused while opening his own locker. Several cute letters were piled up snugly inside. Yue-sama's gaze stabbed.



Helplessly Hajime took out the letters and put them inside another locker. By the way that locker had the name "Amanogawa Kouki" written on it.



Seeing such Hajime, Yue asked with a bit amused expression.



「…….Hajime. Is it fine not to read the letter right at the top?」



「The top one? What, is there something in it?」



The words of Yue who somehow understood the state of when the letter was created by using regeneration magic caused Hajime to make a dubious expression.



Yue took out the aforementioned letter from the locker and,



「……Nn. This is from a cute fan of Hajime……a girlish boy's――」



「Sooih!!!」



Hajime snatched the letter with godspeed, super compressed it with his grip strength and threw it with full power toward outside the school. The crumpled letter casually hit the speed of 166 kilometer per hour and the letter that was compressed until it was smaller than a pinball flew away like a laser beam.



It felt like a pained voice「Aah, my letteerr!!」could be heard from somewhere, but surely it was just an imagination.



「……As always, Hajime is popular among the cute boys.」



「Stop that. They don't feel repulsive like when I was stared at by Chrystabel, even so those guys' gazes are unbearable. Recently the fellows in class are shuddering『The demon king is finally feeling like turning his hand at that direction!?』while nonchalantly taking distance away from me. It's just plainly weighing the mind.」



「……Even though, Chrystabel is a good person.」



「Your lover's ass is being targeted here you know? Don't just conclude that he is a good person.」



Yue chuckled at the dejected Hajime. Lured by that amused look of Yue, the students who were arriving at school were rapidly getting slower in their walk. A crowd trying to get even just a glimpse at the beautiful face of the girl who outwardly changed school was starting to form.



Hajime took Yue's hand to quickly head toward the classroom.



The classroom of Hajime and others were at the highest floor and the farthest corner of the school building. They were at second year of high school, so normally they should be at the second floor, but their classroom was at that place where normally no one would come at was because Hajime and others were "returnees".



With the uneasiness from the school side and a part of students' family, and the criticism from the society about the decency if the students who returned back miraculously at great pains were to be driven out from school, the school administration compromised by wishing to gather the returnees in one place and they set up a "special classroom" at a place that was isolated in the same school building.



Also, Hajime and others were in the middle of their first year when they were summoned to the other world Tortus. And so, originally they should be held back a grade, but although Hajime and others were put into a special classroom, but their school grade was properly in the second year.



This was the result of the conformance between the demand of Hajime and co "no way we will repeat the year", and the opinion of the school side that wished for them to quickly graduate the school and left with the official stance that it was their sympathy and compassion at work.



As the result, a special short course period was prepared for the returnees and on top of that they were given examination, it was to confirm whether they were equipped with the scholarly ability of the first year curriculum of high school, if there was no problem with the test result then their grade advancement would be recognized. That was the special measure that the school taken.



Of course, it was also the result of a demon king somewhere and the wive~s working behind the scene.



And so, amidst the hectic situation of dealing with the government and mass media, all the classmates received special short course and in the end all of them struck high score without anything that could be complained about and their grade advancement was recognized.



At that time, after the special short course, the classmates held a study meeting by their own initiative and diligently study hard. The school officials were really in admiration seeing that but……



Things like encouragement yell「Limit Break-」could sometimes be heard from the classroom.



Actually, they increased their concentration power and learning power by taking in a drug named Cheatmate while in addition they invoked Limit Break using Last Zell to study. It didn't stop there, after the school was over they would also gather in Yuuka's restaurant for a study meeting and used Hour Crystal to lengthen their time.



It was only getting held back a grade that everyone hated. To a very great extent.



Arriving at the topmost floor, the number of people decreased right away the moment Hajime and Yue stepped into a corridor where their classroom was located. It was natural because originally the classroom here wasn't used and other than that there was only storage room.



But, this morning there was the silhouettes of another people other than the classmates.



「That's, the vice principal and, Aiko, sensei who is completely hidden behind the silhouette?」



「……Nn. It looks like they are quarreling?」



Indeed, over there they saw the back of the vice principal who was famous with his hair that had overly splendid 7:3 ratio it was unnatural, and opposite him seemed to be Aiko seeing from the tiny legs that were barely visible from the two's position. The voice of the vice principal sounded angry for some reason, so it seemed that Aiko was being scolded or preached at.



Hajime and Yue looked at each other and they slowly and smoothly sneaked behind the vice principal after cutting off their presence.



「Now listen, Hatayama-sensei. You are still employed as teacher in this school because of this school's kindliness. I hope you will be aware of that a little bit more!」



「Ye, yes. About that I'm really grateful……」



「In that case, why did you leak an extremely careless statement that show contempt to our school toward the likes of the press. I'm greatly troubled by this!」



「My, my deepest apologies. By no means I'm intending to show contempt……」



「Hou. The statement that the reason the special classroom is set up because the school is discriminating, you are saying that's not you showing contempt?」



「No! I didn't say anything like discrimination! It's just, I was only saying, if only the school side is also able to treat the students a bit more normally……」



The reason the vice principal was offended seemed to be the statement Aiko leaked out to the press. Aiko often came out in front of the press with her position as the representative of the returnees. So far as it went she took formal appointment for something like interview, and it was done after talking it thoroughly with the school side, but the persistent reporters were staking out in front of her house and rushed her with questions.



At that time Aiko fastened her pace while doing her utmost to not answer, but the statement of a reporter who spoke as though the students were dangerous individuals and claimed that the special classroom was something that proved it to be true caused Aiko to object against her better judgment.



She said, that the students weren't dangerous or anything. That originally they should be able to attend school normally.



The press that happily picked up on that made an uproar claiming that the school side was discriminating and whatever, and the vice principal who received the news got angry.



(This wig-wearing baldy vice principal. What is he doing venting at Aiko.)



(……Nn. It's the fact that the school is treating us with isolation. This baldy wig-covered head is only protecting himself.)



Hajime and Yue were squinting their eyes toward the vice principal who were still nagging angrily at Aiko. Both of them sneaked even closer behind the vice principal with their presence still cut off.



There, Aiko finally noticed Hajime and Yue's existence. Seeing the two who were slowly and stealthily approaching behind the vice principal, Aiko felt a violent bad premonition and she sent repeated glances at the vice principal and Hajime alternately.



Hajime smilingly conveyed「Morning」with his lip movement. Aiko too sent glances at the vice principal who was absorbed with his preaching while conveying「Good morning」with her lips movement.



Hajime nodded once and,



(For now, how about I attack this guy?)



He slowly took out Donner and aimed at the back of the vice principal's head.



「No way-! Absolutely no way!」



「Muh. Exactly. It's self-explanatory what does alma mater meant. It's something that will be unforgettable for the whole life for the students, and you must not do anything that can harm this alma mater. In the first place――」



Aiko reflexively yelled and crossed both her arms to make a cross mark. She did that incidentally right after the vice principal was saying「Do you think it's fine to put a stigma on the school?」, and so Aiko's sudden eccentric behavior was also miraculously ignored.



Yue straightened up her index finger all of a sudden,



(……Don't worry Aiko. Right now I'll annihilate this barely remaining hair roots for you.)



Fire lit up above the finger. Yue's gaze was directed toward the vice principal's head.



「More than this is no good! It will be completely gone!」



「Exactly, Hatayama-sensei! The prestige of our school must not be harmed even more than this. If we lose our credence, it's also possible for the alma mater of the students to be gone!」



Once more it was a relay of miraculous conversation.



Surely under the 7:3 ratio wig, the hair roots that were already in the verge of annihilation were squeezing out their final willpower. As expected, perhaps feeling the danger instinctively, the vice principal inadvertently looked behind. Hajime and Yue smoothly moved to his blind spot with harmonized breathing.



Confirming that there wasn't anyone behind him, the vice principal returned his gaze at Aiko. At the same time, Hajime and Yue also smoothly returned behind him.



The vice principal checked his watch and it seemed he would conclude his preaching. Surely this talk was something important to him that was grounded on his belief. But, Aiko was helplessly bothered by the two behind the vice principal that his words didn't enter her head at all.



(The bell will ring soon! Please enter the classroom quickly! Or rather, eh? Why am I conversing with lip movement like this?)



Aiko responded with lip movement talk from being somehow carried away by the place's atmosphere, she noticed the strangeness about that while urging Hajime and Yue with a scolding.



The two who even now were reaching out their hand together toward the wig of the vice principal as though to say 'This is the first group work of us two desu!' looked at each other's face after seeing Aiko's upset look and desperate lips movement. And then, they nodded as though something had passed between them, and right after that the two of them acted despondently which didn't suit them.



(Even though I did this because I though Aiko is troubled……)



(……Even though I'm doing my best to help Aiko)



No matter how one thought of it what they were doing was nothing more than being mischievous, but Aiko who was in overwhelmed so much by the situation honestly felt guilt pressing on her chest.



Toward such Aiko, Hajime and Yue moistened their eyes with their mischievousness in full throttle while appealing.



(Aiko already hated me now huh.)



(……Aiko already hated me now?)



Getting told that by the man she was in love with and the top of the wive~s, there was no way Aiko who was already at her wits end could recover her calm,



「Such thing-, it's obvious that I love you very much!」



「Wha-. Ha, Hatayama-sensei, what are you suddenly……」



For some reason vice principal was greatly flustered. His wig head was blushing red until the tip of his ears and his expression was taken aback for a while. And then he cleared his throat once *cough-*.



「Ha, Hatayama-sensei. That's, it's, just what do you mean by that?」



The talk of the wig vice principal before this was「Anyway, there is no time, I'll stop with this much for now. I really wish that you can realize just how large the influence your carelessness in your speech has brought to our school. Although, it seem that you are hating me, perhaps my words are only entering your right ear before going out from the left ear right away」that was said with a lot of sarcasm in his tone.



It was at that timing that Aiko finally turned her focus at her talk with the vice principal. Of course, she wasn't listening to the vice principal's talk just now so she also didn't really understand what was said and asked at her. But, with the atmosphere and also with her social standing, here she absolutely cannot say anything like「Actually I'm not listening! I'm sorry!」.



(Wha, what to do? I don't know at all what is he talking about……. Wait, Aiko, remember it well. This wig, cough-, vice principal is talking about how to protect the school and about the necessity of protecting the school so……that's right! There is no doubt he is asking me whether I'm treasuring, loving the school or not!)



「Err, even if you ask me what I mean, the meaning is exactly just like I said……」



Ai-chan-sensei replied carefully while watching the situation. With how she was also turning upturned gaze to observe the situation, the wig vice principal was further bewildered.



「You, you really mean what you said……. Hatayama-sensei, you, in this kind of place you suddenly……please stop with you joke.」



The vice principal averted his gaze away with a huff. Hajime and Yue escaped to outside the field of vision with a splendid moving technique.



Aiko felt a heartburn seeing the wig-wearing middle-aged man blushing for some reason, so she gripped her chest tightly and racked her brain hard.



(What's this, this situation feel somewhat strange but……he is telling me to stop joking, that means he is thinking that I'm not thinking seriously about the school. As I thought from the view point of vice principal who has worked in teaching profession for nearly thirty years until now, someone like me introducing myself as teacher is just presumptuous……but, it's true that a school is a place to protect the students, and it's a place of important memory that will remain through our life. Then, at the very least I have to convey that I'm serious!)



Still being unaware that the perception of both sides were mutually greatly deviating from each other, Aiko took a deep breath with resolve. The wig vice principal twitched seeing that straightforward gaze.



Aiko didn't even pay attention to the wig vice principal twitching and she met his gaze frankly and,



「I'm not joking, I really feel fondness (for the school and students)! No, rather, it's not an exaggeration even if I say that I feel love (for the school and students)!」



「Wha, what did you saayy――!?」



That powerful speech was delivered with a tightly clenched fist and a force that made one hallucinated the sea wave splashing behind her *splaa~~sh*. The serious feeling was conveyed clearly whether the recipient wanted it or not.



The wig vice principal took a step back as though he was overpowered and,



「I, I HAVE, A WIFE AND CHILDRENNNNNNNNNN~~~~」



He yelled such thing while running through the corridor. Of course, Hajime and Yue escaped to the blind spot with divine smoothness. At that time, a divine wind also blew and the vice principal's wig was smoothly taken and fell on the floor.



Aiko watched with her mouth wide open at the vice principal who suddenly yelled out incomprehensible thing while running away.



「……Aiko, you are a miraculous human. This is the first time since I was born witnessing this kind of artistic misunderstanding.」



「Hee? Eh?」



「Aa~, Aiko. You see, perhaps vice principal is thinking that he was confessed by Aiko. After all you gave him those lines after he was sarcastically asking whether you hate actually him.」



「Yes?」



Aiko was astonished. However, a beat later she recalled her dialogue with the vice principal and then thinking of what Hajime said she guessed the situation, which caused her expression to lose color in a flash. And then, she picked up the wig on the floor using her fingertips and,



「Vi, VICE PRINCIPAALLLLLLL-! IT'S A MISUNDERSTANDINGGG! THIS IS A MISUNDERSTANDING!!! ALSO YOUR WIGGG!!! PLEASE DON'T ENTER THE STAFF ROOM! THE TIME OF MORNING ASSEMBLY WILL BE HELL~~~!! YOUR WIG IS STILL HEREEEEEEEE-」



She yelled that and dashed with amazing speed.



It felt like it would ended up the same with her yelling 'wig wig' like that but……



While staring at the back figure of the cute homeroom teacher who was energetically running in place today too, Yue shortly said.



「……Nn. As I thought, school is fun.」



「Yep, well, I think it's relatively an extraordinary student life though.」



The bell rang at the same time with Hajime's retort.



Today too the mundane school life was starting.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 251




There was a spacious underground room at the underground of Nagumo residence. Of course it was a room that originally didn't exist, but after Hajime returned home from another world, he created it because it was necessary for various kind of his works.



In that personal underground workshop, the aforementioned Hajime was folding his arms while humming「Hm~~m」.



「The stage is created. The basic system is also okay. The fixing of consciousness and also the safety are cleared. What's left is the concrete story and character setting that match with it but……no matter how the idea doesn't really come to me.」



Hajime reconfirmed the situation by speaking to himself while he raised the humming sound of his worry once more. The gaze of such Hajime was fixed at the item that was put on the work stand, something like a mechanical eye mask that was embedded with bluish white crystal.



Its appearance was like an eye mask shaped electronic massager for the area around the eyes, or perhaps like a headset for virtual reality game……or rather, actually the item was exactly that, it was a game device that Hajime created himself. However, the technology and materials used to create it came from the mixture of earth and another world, even age of god magic was applied to make this game of full body experience.



In earth it was still at the level where human finally laid their hand on the tip of the technology of virtual world production, but when it was by the hand of the world's strongest transmutation master this completed product was easily realized.



By the way, by applying soul magic only the user's consciousness would be send to the virtual world, but actually this thing was something that was mostly close to out-of-body experience, in addition the virtual world was formed from something like an illusion that was endlessly close to reality because of the application of regeneration magic, so not only the five senses, the user could even sense other things like magic power or presence.



This item was the painstaking piece of Hajime's work that especially paid close attention to the safety mechanism. Rather, it wasn't even an exaggerated to call it his greatest masterpiece. As a gamer, and then as the son of the president of a game maker company, he made absolutely no compromise in this effort!



Now then, about the impetus of this game device's creation though……



(……Even though I made it painstakingly, but it will be meaningless if Myuu cannot enjoy it. The concept is pretty much "fun training" so it's settled that the game must be RPG……what kind of RPG that a girl will like? For now, I had put in characters noncommittally for checking its operation but……hm~~~m)



Just as could be understood from Hajime's worry, this device was created for Myuu's training use.



With Myuu pleading that she wanted to be strong like Hajime and others as the impetus, Hajime and party (other than the wive~s, the classmates also joined in) educated Myuu about fighting skill.



About the actual training itself, it could be done anywhere if barrier of concealment was laid out beforehand using magic or artifact, so there was no proble. However, from Hajime's thinking that a real combat, and furthermore a real combat against stronger enemy was far better than training, then as expected there would be no place for Myuu to test her strength except if they went to Tortus.



But, crossing worlds every time for training and then preparing opponent that was just at the right level were really troublesome. However, from Hajime's stand point, in this current time when there wasn't any emergency situation, he didn't have the slightest intention to make his beloved daughter going through severe training where "the worst case" could possibly happen, like when he tempered himself in the bottom of abyss against the monstrous opponents there.



――He wanted Myuu to annihilate stronger enemy without rushing and with some elbowroom, so she could have healthy growth.



That was the genuine parental love of a father who had a daughter.



And so, fighting virtual enemy in a virtual world was actually a method that was just right for this.



Now then, like that the creation of the game device was roughly completed, but here Hajime bumped into a wall here. He had progressed with the creation until here based on the concept of "Fighting against stronger enemy. However, doing it while having a blast", but he couldn't think of the "story" that would become the fundamental of the essential part of "having a blast".



After all, till the end this was a virtual practice for testing the result of Myuu's training. And so, for example if a goblin was put as the opening enemy befitting the standard of RPG. However, naturally Myuu would fight by freely using weapon artifacts like Donnerr and so on, it was clear that the goblins would become「Gobuu!?」at the end of their encounter with Myuu.



He didn't want to make Myuu go Ore TUEEEEE. Having said that, he didn't wasn't to see a goblin that could evade railgun by sight. A certain bugged rabbit somewhere was already enough for something like that. (TN: Ore TUEEEEE = an expression in Japan that kinda mean like I'm stronggg. Used when in a net game or fighting game when there is a player that is overwhelmingly strong compared to other players. Or to refer when in manga or LN the MC have transcendental strength)



In other words, the power level of the enemy following the scenario of the usual RPG and Myuu's strength didn't mesh with each other.



If he was going to create a content that could clear up this problem well, where Myuu could have fun advancing the story while she could constantly fight enemy whose strength was always a bit above hers……



「――No good. I cannot think of anything at all. Worst case, I can only set up goblin that can dodge railgun but……before that, perhaps I should try consulting Tou-san first.」



Hajime who frowned imagining a goblin that was leaving behind a line of afterimages behind when it move roughly scratched his head that had reached the limit, he then sighed while standing up from his chair.



He exited the underground workshop, climbed the stair and entered the living room. Today was a holiday, but there was no one in the room except Shia. Shuu and Sumire were working, but he didn't know about what the other members were doing.



「Eh? Shia, what about Yue and others?」



「Fuwaa. Ah, Hajime-san. Is your work over?」



It seemed Shia was napping on the living room's sofa while pleasantly getting showered by the shining in sunlight. She asked back with a slovenly absentminded expression. She looked a bit like she was half-awake.



Hajime prepared to go outside while answering Shia even when he was writhing slightly seeing the figure of "droopy Shia" with her rabbit ears laying down limply.



「No, I reached the limit already. So I'm going to Tou-san's place. I'll bring him some supply and also try to ask him between his works whether I can receive some kind of hint.」



「Howaa, is that sooo. Have a safe trip desuu. Ah, right right, about Yue-san and others, Kaori-san will come to play so Yue-san just now is waiting in ambus――cough-, is going to pick her uppp. Tio-san and Remia-san went out shipping for Myuu-chan's clothees」



「I see. And Shizuku?」



「It looks like a self proclaimed rival of Yaegashi family was coming with declaration of challenge, so she accompanied her family even though she was really reluctant to deal with the challenger desuu. And so, she said that today she cannot come desuu」



「……That girl is really a busybody huh.」



Imagining Shizuku who went along with her hustling family with a tired expression, Hajime looked at far away with a really speechless expression. She shouldn't be so reserved anymore after everything so far, so he guessed that her situation wasn't that serious if she didn't contact them for reinforcement.



「Well, got it. Then, Shia. I'm going out for a bit, so tell Yue and others for me.」



「Yhee~~s, leave it to mee~~desuu~~」



Shia who was burying her face again into the soft cushion sleepily waved around her rabbit ears as reply while she switched over into "droopy Shia mode" once more. She seemed to be in a really dreamy state of mind.



"Droopy Shia" who was bathing in sunlight while her panty was in full view, her rabbit tail shaking *furin~furin~* was terribly adorable. Hajime was driven with an impulse to give her lap pillow and loved her with all his might, but with an effort he endured in order to fulfill his duty as a papa and he exited the house.



A while after that, while the sound of sleeper's breathing *suya~* of a happy rabbit was resounding in the Nagumo residence's living room, there was the sound *clack* of the entrance door opening.



「Geez-, Yue you idiot! Pervert! You rascal!」



「……What abusive language against someone who went to pick you up. Stupid Kaori.」



「Something like that cannot be said as "picking up" you know? That's called ambushing! Furthermore you even use illusion magic to the street, you are really idiot-」



「……Kaori screamed 'Hyaaa~~~-'. You screamed 'Hyaaa~~~-'. Pufuh」



「Yueee~~~」



Such noisy quarrel could be heard.



It seemed Kaori was ambushed by Yue when she was in the middle of going to Nagumo residence. It seemed Yue even used illusion magic to shock Kaori. Recalling back Kaori's reaction of that time caused Yue to make a smile that looked really joyful.



Whether in the past or in the future, surely there would be no one other than Kaori for whom Yue would purposefully go out of the house just to make her shocked.



In her own way, Kaori as someone in the position who received Yue's mischievousness with her body was angry, even so she didn't look like that she hated it at all. Even now her hands were reaching toward the hair of Yue who was taking off her shoes, she used a hair styling product that she took out from somewhere and fought strenuously to tailor Yue's hair into Mohican style.



Yue walked toward the living room without even paying any mind that her fluffy and soft blonde hair was fumbled around and turned into a strange shape like the trees of the witch's forest by Kaori. She then caught sight of Shia who was napping with a loose expression that looked extremely careless. She was in the same state like before Yue went out.



「Ah, Shia, she is in the middle of nap. Then, we have to be quiet.」



「……Nn」



It was as though their quarrel just now was nonexistent. The two stopped their dispute completely and went quiet. They approached slo~wly toward Shia and they stared gently at Shia who was mumbling 'munya munya'.



「Munya munya……ehehe, more than this is impossible――I cannot beat you to death more than this you knoww~~」



「「……」」



「Nnyaa. ……Kufuu~~, then, just a bit moreee~~」



「「……」」



It was slightly off from the template.



This rabbit-san was making a happy expression, with a leisurely atmosphere, looking like she was feeling really pleasant, while going to beat up to death someone a bit more. Run awaaay! That someone inside the dream! Super run awaaay!



「……Let's leave her quietly.」



「……Nn. That's better.」



Yue and Kaori slo~wly slo~wly backed away. They also took distance of heart.



「Err, and, where is Hajime-kun? I heard that Myuu-chan and others aren't here, but Hajime-kun is here right?」



「……Nn. He is shutting himself inside the workshop since last night. It's troubling that he will forget the time right away when he got absorbed.」



「He would also forget his meal and sleep when he was like that. Then, let's go call him. Are we also going to make him rest while we are at it?」



「……He haven't taken lunch yet too, so it's just right.」



They nodded at each other and headed toward the underground workshop.



By the way, the main path to head toward the underground workshop was through the stair in the corridor, but actually the sofa in the living room could also be used to go there. The sofa would be overturned backward when someone was sitting on it, and then that person would be dropped into the underground corridor.



There was really no meaning to purposefully get dropped like that, so everyone used the stair to head there, but limited to the people of Yaegashi family who sometimes visited (excluding Shizuku) and Myuu, the instead had never used the stair even once until now. They liked getting flipped and dropped down.



「……Nn? Hajime, not here?」



「Eh? It's true.」



The two who entered the workshop tilted their head seeing that the place's owner wasn't there.



Did he leave the house? In that case did he not leave behind any notification memo? Thinking that the two walked deeper into the room.



It seemed there wasn't any memo, but in exchange a headset that was obviously in the middle of manufacturing entered their sight.



「……That's the artifact that Hajime is currently getting absorbed in developing.」



「Is that so. Somehow it looks similar with a headset used for seeing 3D movie isn't it?」



「……Nn. That's not necessarily wrong.」



Yue began to talk about the specific of its function in respond of Kaori's question. Kaori was listening in admiration and she was staring at the headset shaped artifact game device for some reason.



Yue spoke a sentence toward such Kaori.



「……Kaori you silent lecher.」



「Why!?」



Kaori was startled at the sudden insult. Yue answered that retort which was mixed with question.



「……The reason you are staring hard like that is only one. I saw through that you were having delusion that you would be able to experience flirting with Hajime anytime in your home if you have that. Just what in the world you are planning to do to Hajime in the virtual world? This silent lecher.」



「I'm not a silent lecher! I wasn't having any delusion like that! Or rather, it's Yue who is the silent lecher by the time you come to that conclusion!」



「……What stupid statement. Even without having delusion, I'm always flirting with Hajime!」



「Certainly!」



There was no room for argument there. But, Kaori wished that Yue would stop already with her attempt of planting the impression of "Kaori is a silent lecher" at every available opportunity.



Kaori was able to assert. That she was leading a wholesome life! Even if she had a bit of daydreaming habit, even if she was conscious toward any kind of things that had just gotten used by Hajime, but it was beyond doubt that she was a wholesome girl! There was no room for suspicion there! Should be!



And so, here she firmly objected at Yue.



But, Yue-sama tried to utterly destroy the objection of such Kaori head-on.



As the result, at the end it connected to the usual cat fight.



Nyaah――!! Nyaah――!! Mui-mui-! Mukiiiiih!!



Both of them pinched at each other's cheeks and rolled around on the floor of the workshop for a few minutes. The situation only looked like they were frolicking around with each other if seen from the side, however, the two who were seriously quarrelling with each other became engrossed with it against their better judgment and they completely forgot to pay attention to the surrounding.



Yes, they were at the workshop of a transmutation master where Hajime's hand-made artifacts, the artifacts created from Hajime's interest working in full throttle where there were understandable things until incomprehensible things scattered out everywhere.



*GON-* A nice sound rang out, coming from Yue who was going to stand out banging the back of her head strongly at the desk above her.



Yue reflexively raised a strange scream「Nmii!?」while Kaori was childishly making merry「Ya~i, ya~i」at such Yue, but the next moment, the headset and other minerals fell from the desk and hit the crown of her head and Kaori raised a matching scream「Nmii!?」.



While the both of them were holding their head while trembling, suddenly an ominous sound *pachi pachi* struck their ears.



「……Ah, err, Yue? This, by any chance, is this actually bad?」



「……This is bad degozaru.」



Cold sweats trickled down. If there was only broken item, then the two could just harmoniously prostrate dogeza in front of Hajime and apologized. But, the headset in front of them that was fiercely sparking and further flickering with magic power light and overflowing with immense magic power that made their skin tingled only gave off ominous feeling.



Yue's speech spontaneously became strange but her thinking was calm. No matter what happened, there was no way any phenomenon that happened here could leak outside from this workshop that boasted the strongest endurance in the world. Therefore, Yue would use the ultimate skill of instant teleportation "Divine Existence" and escaped together with Kaori.



Yue who decided that in an instant leaped toward Kaori, and then they escaped right――



*Flash-* Light exploded.



There was no sound or shockwave. There was only light that painted over the workshop for a beat.



Inside the workshop that recovered its former color, there were only Yue who was hanging over Kaori as though she had pushed her down, and Kaori who was tightly hugging such Yue left behind. It seemed that the two were unconscious.



「-, Yue!? Are you okay!?」



Kaori who was aware that her consciousness had flew away for a moment raised her body in a flash at the same time when her consciousness returned and she confirmed Yue's safety. But, she didn't hear that voice that was so pleasant to hear it was odious that usually would respond after a beat later.



She had confirmed that a moment before her consciousness was cut off, Yue was jumping toward her to cover her. That was why Kaori completely thought that Yue was on her bosom, but she didn't feel her weight there, and even when she looked around restlessly she didn't find her anywhere.



Or rather,



「Wha, what is thiss~~~~」



Kaori was in chaos!



The reason was even though before this she should be inside the workshop wearing her personal clothes, when she noticed she was inside a room that was surrounded with coarsely made wood and she was waking up above a bed. When she looked more carefully, the clothes she was wearing was also changed into something coarse that looked like it came from the period of Europe's Middle Age. It was a one piece and loose, yes, if this was in a movie or drama then this would be the clothing of a villager girl.



Kaori was looking down on herself dumbfounded for a while, next she rushed out in hurry. She opened the thin wooden door so hard the door could come off from its hinge, ignored an aging male that was talking about something smilingly inside what seemed to be a living room, and without pause she forcefully opened the entrance door and leaped out.



「Ju, just where, is this?」



Blue sky stretched without end. Numerous houses that looked like hovel. Foreign people working busily wearing simple clothes. This place was obviously not Japan.



Still in chaos, Kaori called out to a young man who happened to pass by.



「E, excuse me. I have a bit of question……」



「Heey, this is the village of beginning "AAAAAAAA".」



「The name is too noncommittal! Or rather I'm not asking that!」



Kaori was in chaos! The young man tilted his head「Oh?」at such Kaori.



「What's this, just when I thought who is it because I was called so suddenly――」



「Eh, eh? What is it?」



Seeing the young man suddenly stopped his sentence was also surprising, but the transparent floating projection display that manifested in front of Kaori's eyes right after that also made Kaori's body trembled from feeling startled.



Above the display, there was a line "Please decide your name", and below it there was a frame with blank space, and even further below was an unfamiliar keyboard.



「This is……could it be this place is……」



'Could it be I'm inside that game device that is in the middle of development?' Kaori reached that fact. The present condition where she suddenly arrived in an unfamiliar world, the young man that was spewing out stereotyped line, and also the display that appeared midair, they were all completely like an RPG world. Kaori's appearance must be also the setting where she likely started as a villager girl in the beginning.



「So that's how it is? Yue said that the artifact used soul magic, so the instant it was broken only my soul was sent flying inside the game, is that it? ……It doesn't feel like I'm only soul at all though……h~m, let's worry later. For now, I have to search Yue.」



Kaori who switched over her thinking looked forward at the young man who was smiling and waiting for her, she decided for now she would obey the rule of the game and at least decided her name before searching for Yue.



「Eerr, I'll use my name, Ka-o-ri.」



She typed in her name and clicked the enter key. A confirmation screen came out so she also pressed OK at it. And then the display vanished automatically.



「――but isn't this the deplorable daughter of the village chief Kaori.」



「Who are you calling deplorable!?」



She was suddenly insulted.



「And so what's the matter, village chief's deplorable daughter?」



「There is no meaning typing in my name isn't it!? Or rather this thing about deplorable is the default!?」



There was not even a fragment of ill will that could be seen from the young man who was still making an amiable smile without change. Kaori silently thought 'this is a game, this is a game' to suppress her welling up dissatisfaction and she asked once more.



「Do you know Yue? Ah, I wonder if you know what I mean by Yue. She is an extraordinarily beautiful girl with blond hair……」



「This is the village of beginning "AAAAAAAA".」



「Ah, yes. So you don't know.」



It seemed the person would return to its first line when he was asked something he didn't know. Kaori held the conviction that this place was a virtual reality as expected and she wracked her brain of what to do now.



But, it was at that time that the young man talked at Kaori.



「Come to think of it, village chief's deplorable daughter.」



「……What is it?」



Resignation was crucial in the society.



「You know, it seems this morning priest-san was picking up a sister with a screw loose.」



「That must be Yue!」



If the person in question was here, surely the curtain of great battle Yue VS Kaori of who knows how many times would be opened.



Talking to the villagers, gathered information, and then determined the destination――it was truly the classic flow. Kaori who became convinced of that faithfully expressed her gratitude before she sprinted away.



The church was the tallest building in the village. Because the houses in the village were all one-story house, the tall building with a cross affixed on its top could be seen from anywhere in the village.



「Uuh, my body is heavy……」



Although it was inside the game, in the first place the physical ability of Kaori who had obtained the flesh body of god apostle was in foul play level. Originally she was able to easily display a running in the level that would smash the heart of an Olympic sprinter into pieces.



But, the current Kaori could only display a speed that was at the level of that Olympic sprinter. She was told that this was a game for training use, so perhaps it was possible that a limitation was set up for the initial configuration.



After all, the current her was a villager girl……Kaori was sprinting while conjecturing the reason why her body wouldn't move like she wanted. She pretended as though she couldn't hear the villagers saying things like「Ah, that's the village chief's deplorable daughter!」「Today too she is running like that……what a deplorable girl」while pointing their finger at her.



Like that, Kaori who was dealt with delicate mental damage finally arrived nearby the church's front, it was at that time when she was about to enter inside the church.



*DOGON-* Such terrific explosive sound and fierce vibration shook the village. What's more they happened consecutively.



「Wha wha wha wha, what!? Just what in the world is going on!?」



The bewildered Kaori put her emergency break and immediately took distance from the church.



Right after that, everywhere on the building's walls was blown away one after another, the church that lost its supporting pillars tilted violently. Without pause the building helplessly creaked *gigigigi-* while tilting even more drastically, like that the building collapsed as though it was toppled sideways.



Dust clouds rose up grandly.



Ahead of the gaze of Kaori who was looking at the church's destruction in astonishment, human silhouette swayed inside the dust cloud. The silhouette had small stature. And then, it gave a presence that Kaori was familiar with.



「Yue!」



「……Nn. Kaori, I'm glad you are fine.」



Yue who said that while showing her figure by using wind to sweep away the veil of cloud dust――was a sister-san.



She was wearing a black loose one-piece that reached until her ankle and a wimple covering her head. Different from a pretend sister, her hair was covered properly that it couldn't be seen, so instead Yue's beautiful face became emphasized, matched with her expressionless face, a solemn atmosphere could be felt from her.



She was truly looking like a pious servant of god……



If there was no destroyed church behind her.



Kaori wanted to ask various thing including confirming their present situation, but first thing first,



「Why is the church turned like this?」



「……I flew into rage when I was said that my brain has a screw loose. I have no regret. I can boast that I have done a good work.」



「I, I see.」



Behind Yue, a priest with gentle looking expression was standing in the middle of the wreckage and he spoke with his sooty appearance.



「With heart of valor and kindness, now, go forth. Sister with a screw loose Yue.」



The wind of the sister with a screw loose burst. The priest-san flew to the sky. It was as though he was a leaf that was toyed by the wind.



「This is your home. I will wait for your return at all times.」



The home was gone already. Or rather, that place was a sky.



While the gentle voice of the priest-san that was flying in the sky was resounding, Kaori thought about Yue who was fully exposing her displeasure and about the matter from here on, and she let out a de~~ep sigh.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The beginning seems long, but this is a short story.



It's a bit of scene of Yue and Kaori's everyday.



When this is over, I'm thinking that perhaps I should write a long arc of After.





Chapter 252




AN: For Hakumei, three chapters are "short story".



「Welcome! This is the church of "AAAAAAA" village. Will you carry out a confession? Or else will you carry out a confession? I also won't mind if you want to carry out a confession you know?」



Yue finally calmed down, and while Kaori was talking with Yue in order to grasp their current situation, the priest-san was smilingly inviting a confession standing in the middle of the wreckage of the collapsed church. As expected perhaps he was holding a grudge.



Kaori was making confirmation to Yue while her cheeks were twitching at the priest-san who was earnestly throwing words confession, confession at them.



「As I thought, this place is really inside that game device isn't it?」



「……Nn. Based on the situation there is no doubt. Furthermore, there is a big possibility that it's broken somewhere.」



「Broken?」



「……Nn. It's indeed true that the first position we appeared at is set randomly, but the speech of the NPC shouldn't be this strange. I was taught a bit about the content and the system so there is no doubt about that.」



「I, I see, indeed. There is no way Hajime-kun will make the default setting to be "regrettable" or "screw loose" even though this is a game created for Myuu-chan's sake.」(TN: Sorry, I changed the deplorable into regrettable)



Kaori nodded in comprehension. At the same time she let out a sigh that sounded a bit uneasy. She imagined something a little bit unpleasant, that perhaps by any chance Hajime was thinking that she was regrettable.



「……Anyway, we should logout but……」



「……That function doesn't broke right?」



Kaori was feeling something ominous from Yue's voice with her gaze turning toward Yue, while Yue called out the individual information screen using a game gesture just like what she was taught before. She was whispering「Open」while her hand was waved as though stroking the empty air in front of her.



As the result a blue shining window materialized in front of Yue's eyes. A unique sound *von* resounded, and then window fragments gathered from up, down, right, and left as though it was a block game, and in the blink of eye a screen the size of a 24 inch television was completed. It was Hajime's fixation that took all night to finish.



Anyway, Yue let out a sigh of relieve that the individual information screen was opened normally, next she clicked on the button "return to home" at the right bottom of the screen while feeling a bit nervous.



――Why are you giving up here! Do your best, do your best! You can do it, you can do it!



A voice of heaven descended. It seemed they couldn't go home. It appeared that more passion and guts were necessary.



「……」



「……」



Yue clicked the button wordlessly once more.



――If you give up, that will be the end of your adventure! Now, dash toward that sunset!



As expected, it seemed the voice of heaven wouldn't allow returning to home. And then, what should be rising right now was the morning sun, telling them to dash toward the sunset was just…



「I, I'll give it a try.」



While Kaori's cheeks were twitching seeing Yue throwing a dreadfully scornful gaze at empty air with her usual stare having advanced until the third stage, Kaori imitated Yue and called out her individual information screen, and she clicked the button "return to home".



――You shitty maggot-. What are you doing trying to go home as you damn please-. The destination of you bastard is only to hell or to hell-. If you don't want me to "pii―* you then return to your squad! That's your one and only home you bastard!



「Hiih!?」



Having suddenly poured with the angry yell of Hajime, Kaori spontaneously held her head with both hands and she became unable to stand up from surprise.



「……Come to think of it, it seems that the program for Hauria use was also included separately.」



「The, the training for mass producing those berserk rabbits? Hajime-kun, how far she is planning to evolve those people?」



Yue shrugged toward Kaori who was trembling all over.



In the end their bad premonition hit the bull's eye and they couldn't logout from the game. It was unclear why when it was Yue, Hajime's voice had the tone of Matsuoka ○zo, while when it was Kaori, Hajime's voice had a tone like Sergeant Hartma○, but surely this too was the adverse effect from the broken device. (TN: Matsuoka Shuzo is a retired tennis player who is currently hosting a TV show. He is known for his energetic and passionate character)



「What will we do, Yue. How are we going home……ah, that's right! Yue, use soul magic!」



「Mu, there is that method.」



This game device was created by applying soul magic. The highly precise sensation where there was almost no difference with reality was because of that. In that case, it could be thought that for an expert of soul magic it should be possible to logout even without relying on the system.



Yue wasted no time trying to use soul magic.



――Insufficient level



「Mu? ……Mumuh」



「Yue?」



Each time Yue persisted with something while mumbling「Mumuh」, the heavenly voice "insufficient level" descended down. At the end a hypocritically courteous words "let's understand your standing" descended.



Kaori who somehow guessed the situation asked.



「It looks no good isn't it?」



「Muu. Even though it absorbed us because it's broken, but I cannot accept it at all that only this system is perfectly working.」



According to Yue, Yue herself was also participating at the creation of this bodily sensation system that applied soul magic. And then, the "binding" of the game system that was directly affecting the soul was operating effectively even at Yue herself who was a cooperator in the artifact's creation.



If this effect was purely due to Yue's own magic, then she would only need to break that restriction, but if Hajime's artifact was involved there then it would be next to impossible for Yue to cancel it.



Yue who was unable to release her "binding" no matter how many times she tried dropped her shoulders dejectedly.



「……As expected from Hajime's artifact. And then my magic. We have done a good work.」



「This is not the time for singing your own praise, Yue……what to do. Is there no other way to logout?」



「……Nn. It's not that there is none. If I remember correctly, there is a safe point at each village, we should be able to logout from there too. Myuu can go home anytime she want, but Hajime said that he won't let Hauria to escape as they please, and he said that he picked base logout method for them.」



「Hajime-kun, he is merciless to the people of Hauria isn't he……」



They couldn't stop even if they wanted to stop. If they wanted to stop then they could only progress inside the game. And what's more that too surely would be a game scenario with an extraordinarily lovely hard mode, no, hell mode in Hajime style.



Thinking about the people of Hauria who someday would be thrown in here, Kaori quietly prayed for their happiness in the next world.



「And Yue. If there is save point in each village, then what about this village? Let's quickly try out that save point.」



「……………………………………There is none in this village.」



「Eh? Why? You said just now that each village has one.」



「……Be, because this is the village of beginning. So it's not needed.」



「………………Yue?」



Kaori quickly asked Yue about the save point of this village, but for some reason Yue was answering with her gaze subtly looking away. It felt like her tone was also subtly strange.



Kaori turned a suspicious gaze at Yue, but Yue was muttering to herself「……Well then, we have to go to the next village now that we have decided」with a subtly strange tone as expected.



Kaori turned her gaze. Toward the direction of the priest-san who was still eloquently urging for confession in the middle of the wreckage.



「Excuse me Father. Can you please tell me where is the save point of this village?」



「……Kaori! You doubt me? That's crue――」



「Village chief's regrettable daughter-san. You are regrettable as usual. You know don't you? It's right here in this church!」



The church, was no more.



Kaori turned her face calmly toward Yue still with a smiling face. Yue calmly turned toward the direction of the far beyond.



A time of silence flowed for a while. The gaze was also flowing from Kaori=>Yue=>brilliantly shining sun.



A beat later.



「YUE YOU IDIOOOOOOOOT!!」



「……Ka, KAORI YOU STUPIID――mugyuh!?」



Kaori's yell resounded.



Yue talked back in reflex, but her words sounded unusually frailer. In addition, her cheeks were swiftly stretched out *mugyuuuu* and her words were cut off.



「Idiot idiot idiot idiot-, Yue you idiot! Why was the first thing you do after the game started was destroying the save point!? This screw loose sister-saN-!!」



「Re, rerause――」



「Don't say because!」



「Fho, fhovefer――」



「Don't say however! Geez-, you are really-! The way of thinking of blowing away everything the first thing if there is something that you cannot stomach, I think that's completely no good! I think, that's really no good!」



Kaori preached while inflicting *mugyuuuuu* at Yue's cheeks. Perhaps she was using a lot of strength, Yue's soft cheeks were stretching and stretching and her eyes turned delicately teary.



As expected it seemed Yue recognized that she had been rash, at first she was obediently letting herself treated like that and listened meekly, but right after Yue heard「In the first place Yue is~」and she felt the atmosphere that the preaching would become long, first thing first she counterattacked. Her index fingers poked *dosu-* at both sides of Kaori's stomach.



「Hehyah!?」



Kaori-san's body bent stra――ight backward stiffly. Seeing such Kaori, Yue-san laughed「You said 'hehyah'. It was 'hehyah'. Puh, giggle giggle」.



The outcome was obvious.



――Nyah―nyaah! Mui muih, fushaa――――!!



The gong of the usual cat fight rang. Both of them scuffled with each other while rolling around on the church that was transformed into a mountain of rubble and in front of the priest whose suggestion of sin confession was becoming forceful.



But, there several villagers were passing by.



「Okaa-san, those people……」



「Shih. You must not stare at the screw loose sister and village chief's regrettable daughter!」



When a young child pointed his finger, his mother hurriedly covered her child's eyes and they quickly left as though they had just witnessed something terrifying.



「Those two did that to the church……the hell with them.」



「I thought that someday they would actually do it. After all, they are the village chief's regrettable daughter-san and the sister-san with a screw loose.」



A young man shouldering farming tool was looking at the destroyed church and said that pitifully, while the uncle beside him sighed while saying that.



「A really good person, has left us.」



「How sad this incident is.」



An uncle pushing a cart looked at the church with an anguished expression, and another uncle who was similarly carrying a baggage faced the church and offered words of prayer. The priest was still alive despite the destruction of the church though……



The air of the surrounding villagers felt somewhat strange, or rather their atmosphere was dark. Yue and Kaori who were covered with dust from rolling around finally noticed. Both of them stood up feeling unable to stay there longer from being surrounded at a distance while being seen with a gaze as though they were dangerous character.



「……Err, Yue. For now there is nothing that can be done for what is broken, about what should we do from here on……」



「……Nn. I am Yue. A woman who won't look back to the past.」



「How about you look back? The next time you do another destructive activity irresponsibly, I'll seriously make you eat disintegration bombardment okay?」



Yue averted her gaze from Kaori whose blood vein was emerging on her forehead still with a smiling face, and she called out her individual information screen once more.



「……Cough-. Just like I said before, if it's save point, the next village also has it. And so, for now we should aim to go there.」



「I guess. Our body might be in the real world I think, and when Hajime-kun go home he will surely do something somehow, but if there is anything we can do then it's better to give it a try.」



「……Nn. But, look here.」



The two easily progressed their talk so smoothly to the degree that would make anyone wonder just what was with the quarrel just now.



Yue pointed at her status screen, so Kaori got close to Yue's shoulder and peered in with her body glued close on Yue. The content that was projected there was,



========================================



Name : Yue-pon



Rank : 1 / 50 remaining until the next liberation



Job : Apprentice Sister



Title : Sister With a Screw Loose



Skill : No Chant Imagination Configuration



Magic : Flame Magic [Fireball]



Equipment : A set of apprentice sister outfit



Special mention : Has criminal record



Money : 1,000



========================================



Other than those there were also items at hand and also playing time recorded, but there was no list for specs that were quantified into number like in Tortus's status plate. It was made like this with the reason so the player wouldn't misunderstand the number as their own strength in real battle and so that the player couldn't overwhelm the enemy using the difference in status amount.



HP gauge that was common for RPG also didn't exist with similar reasons. Conforming to reality, no matter how strong someone was they would get instant game over if their head was cut off, but in reverse no matter what kind of strong enemy could possibly be defeated depending on the method.



Kaori who saw Yue's status nodded and said「I see」.



「As expected you have a criminal record.」



「……Oi, Kaori. What do you mean by as expected? I am always obeying law――」



「Nn」



Kaori replied just like Yue while her finger was pointing toward the destroyed church. A beat after Yue turned her gaze there.



「……I'm generally obeying law in the real world.」



「You nonchalantly ranked down "always" into "generally" even in the real world there.」



Yue-sama wouldn't look back to the past! She also wouldn't accept Kaori's straight-man retort!



「……Rather than that, the problem is this "rank" and "money".」



「Before that, let me ask a little bit more, Yue-pon. See here, about my individual information screen, Yue-pon. In my special mention the word 'accomplice' is written. Yue-pon, why is this I wonder? I didn't really do anything but now I have criminal record, Yue-pon. Tell me Yue-pon. Heey, heey, Yue-pon. Yue-pon, sheesh Yue-pon-」



Very unusually Yue was covering her face with both hands and her ears were bright red for some reason while she crouched down on the spot. She whispered with a small voice「……uu, because of a passing fancy I unconsciously」while trembling in shame.



The expression of Kaori who was crouching down beside such Yue was truly a really wide grin. She was showing her friendly smile that always charmed the surrounding while poking Yue's cheek with her index finger. Kaori was enjoying the squishy sensation that might became a habit while intently speaking piercing words.



「Well, it doesn't matter now, Yue-pon. I still cannot accept it but, we won't finish anything like this Yue-pon. And? What is this "rank" and "money" about, Yue-pon?」



「……Kaori, what nerve. This sister with a screw loose Yue-pon will turn the village girl into cinder for the peaceful life of the village.」



「Wawawah, calm down Yue! I'm sorry! I won't say it anymore!」



A ball of flame lit up on Yue's fingertip. Its appearance was shabby but the pressure that it gave off was a bad news. It seemed that even the most basic of elementary magic could be filled with high class power by the way one controlled the amount of magic power and the compression rate.



The sister with a screw loose Yue-pon pointed finger gun gesture at Kaori and mercilessly shot a lot of that. That magic that was shot wildly like the sweeping of a gatling gun was somehow evaded by Kaori even while her face was going pale.



In exchange, from behind Kaori countless explosions and screams were……



「Aah!? The shoemaker Rodriguez is blown away!」



「What!? What is happening!? My house is gone!?」



「Kuu! Everyone-, I'll hold them back here! Run while you all still can!」



「Village chief! That's reckless! Your opponent is that sister-san with a screw loose you know!? Even for you that's rash!」



「Hah, don't worry about me. Even like this when I was young I did quite much as an adventurer. I'll just take her on a bit and then I'll catch up to you later.」



「Chief, someone like you is……」



For some reason Kaori's father was becoming the hero of the village, but seeing that the daughter of that hero was involved with the turmoil, in a sense this was like a family scandal, or even like stirring up trouble to get credit from solving it.



After that, Yue who mercilessly turned the village chief into something like a ragged cloth and destroyed Rodriguez and the shoe shop mistaken the remaining amount of her magic power that was restrained more than she imagined by the system, and she collapsed face first from her magic power running dry. Similarly, Kaori whose physical ability was restrained and now not only she couldn't transform into apostle, she couldn't even use magic was also ran out of stamina and collapsed face first.



「Ju, just what are, we doing, in this time of emergency……zee, zee」



「……Haa haa. Uu, certainly」



While feeling the intense gazes of the villagers who were surrounding the two from a distance, Yue and Kaori got up somehow and they sat down side by side.



「Le, let's return to our talk. And, what is this "rank" and "money" about?」



「……Nn. About this "rank", this is the restriction level that is put on us. I cannot use anything other than fireball, and Kaori's physical ability is low with apostle transformation and magic unusable are also because of that. By leveling up, we will get closer to our ability in the real world.」



「Is that so. Even when in not perfect state, manage it somehow with what you can do……this concept is really like Hajime-kun.」



By the way, Kaori's individual information screen was something like this.



========================================



Name : Kaori



Rank : 1 / 50 remaining until the next liberation



Job : Villager Girl



Title : Village Chief's Regrettable Daughter



Skill : Villager girl-style Twin Large Sword Art



Magic :



Equipment : A set of villager girl outfit



Special mention : Yue-pon's accomplice



Money : 1,000



========================================



「……Nn. Our ability is given limitation, but our individual technique is not given any limitation at all. It was because it's me that kind of elementary level magic could show such power and rapid fire. A mere villager girl could dodge all those is also the same.」



「I see. Err, is there any problem with that?」



Kaori nodded in understanding at Yue's explanation. It seemed that Kaori's father was revived at the corner of their sight. The mournful villagers applauded their village chief.



「……Normally, we will raise our level at the surrounding area of the village of beginning while gathering money at the same time, we then will head to the next village after putting our equipment in order to a certain degree. The concrete scenario haven't been established yet, but if the enemy characters that were inserted for their behavior checking are without change, then they should be really strong.」



「Aah, I see. In other words, there is a chance we won't be able to reach the next village with our current level isn't it? Also we don't even have money to put our equipment in order.」



「……Nn. I think that it will be fine if it's me and Kaori but……in the case we received damage in this game that is in the verge of breaking, I don't know what kind of effect it will have to us. Based on how there is the prospect of Hajime definitely rescuing us, it's also an option to not move from here.」



「Fufufu, you aren't thinking of that at all aren't you, Yue. There is no way we will choose avoiding risk and not doing anything.」



Help would come sooner or later and so let's not do anything. In a sense it was a solid method. However, the people who got close to Hajime wouldn't choose that option.



「……Exactly. Besides, we also don't understand how long the current circumstance will continue. By any chance, perhaps before Hajime come home a fatal breakdown will occur and it will became a situation that cannot be recovered from.」



「You're right. Like that we also cannot leisurely level up and gather money around the village then.」



「……Nn. We need to put our equipment in order as much as possible with the current money at our hand.」



Yue understood their problems. They needed to reach the neighboring village by struggling through quite strong enemies using only the minimum equipment while trying to not get hit even once as much as possible.



Indeed, it was a very severe situation.



But,



「Yep, I don't see any problem. Yue is here after all.」



「……Nn. There is no problem. Kaori is here.」



That was how it was.



Yue and Kaori stood up and dusted off the dirt attached on their respective fluttering sister and villager girl clothes. The gazes of the villagers were as usual as though they were looking at dangerous characters. It was the truth that they were guilty so they couldn't bear at all to be there for longer. Even though it was a game world, wasn't the speech and conduct of the mob characters too free?



Even though it was fine even if it wasn't this realistic at this aspect……Yue and Kaori were modestly venting their anger at Hajime's obsession while heading toward the equipment shop of the village.



Yue had magic job, so even in the worst case she wouldn't mind buying just several items for recovering magic power, but Kaori who seemed to be a user of villager girl-style twin large swords art needed weapon. If possible, she also wanted pants and tunic that were easy to move in, not her current loose one piece clothes for villager girl.



Midway they were also exposed to intense violence of gazes.



Kaori thought, 'This is, like that'. Yes, the stares were like the stares that were directed at a lion that escaped from its cage in a zoo. She saw it some time ago, the news of multiple wild beasts including lion escaping their cage and then moved freely inside the zoo.



At that time the gazes of the people that were running away filled with trepidation were truly the same like the gazes of the villagers toward them right now.



Am I a lion……?



Kaori was feeling complicated and she looked at Yue who was walking beside her.



Luxuriant golden hair. Flexible limbs. Unmistakably a carnivore (hidden meaning). And then, her status as the strongest.



(Yep, it fit. Here is Yue lion. Yep.



Kaori imagined Yue wearing a lion cosplay while roaring 'gaoo~~' on all fours and she strangely comprehended it.



By the way, the lion commotion of that time was the revenge of the zoo's former worker who got fired where he was also going to steal the zoo's proceeds at the same time, he released the animals was also for diversion, but the escaping lion and other animals were then taken care by a certain couple.



Actually, it had also become a hot topic how one of the couple, a small girl easily tamed the lion and then used that lion to catch the criminal. Then, it was also a hot topic how the boyfriend knocked down with his bare arm a bear that was escaping together and then returned it into its cage.



Kaori was imagining the news of that time and Yue lion half to escape the reality while chasing away the gazes of the villagers from inside her mind, and then her gaze caught sight of the equipment shop they were searching ahead.



「Both of us combined has 2,000 yen……can we buy anything?」



「……I don't know the prize so I cannot say anything. In the worst case, I want to at least secure Kaori's sword.」



Kaori had inherited the combat skill of god's apostle, so she had also learned martial art to a high level. However, as expected her greatest offense was the apostle's characteristic ability and the twin large swords art. As expected there would be a large difference in Kaori's combat skill from whether she had sword or not.



Yue opened the shop's door. And right away,



「Go home! Go back home! There ain't anyone here that will sell to you two criminals! Go home right away!」



「「……」」



The equipment shop owner with thick moustache looking very obstinate suddenly gave the two a present of angry yell. Yue and Kaori reflexively stiffened.



The two understood what the owner was saying. Kaori timidly opened her mouth with twitching expression.



「E, excuse me, I, want to buy――」



「Shut up, this damned accomplice of Yue-pon! Just get out now!」



Kaori's expression stiffened. This was the first time in her life she was treated like this by a person that she met for the first time. Kaori who was always polite and bright was often favored especially by the elders. Naturally, her endurance was low against something like this.



「Yu, Yuee~」



「……Nn. Leave it to me. Cough-. ――Owner-san, please listen to my story. We――」



「Shut your mouth, this great sinner, priest killer! How dare you did that to a kind person like that-」



「Ah, no, that, that person is still ali――」



「Good grief, even though you are a sister but to do something so terrifying! Listen here, this shop will only deal with honest customer! Someone criminal like you with a screw loose can just get out, now-」



A super condensed fireball materialized on the fingertip of Yue-sama. Its radiance, its heat, it was truly just like a sun!



「Don't be hasty Yueee-! Calm down! This is you reaping what you sow!」



「……Kaori, don't worry. Not even ash will be left behind. The owner of the equipment shop just disappeared. He only left behind a farewell letter that mentioned the property of the shop is handed over to the sister.」



「That's murder! What's more it's robbery murder! Just where is this mind of obeying law you said before!?」



「……The sister with screw loose, doesn't understa~~~nd.」



「A child!? Are you a child!? Geez-, it doesn't matter so just toss away that fireball! Quickly toss it away!」



「……You wish to set fire here?」



「Aaah!? As I thought don't toss it away! Extinguish it quickly! Come on, quickly!」



In deference to Kaori who was persuading with a desperate look, Yue erased the sun on her fingertip.



It seemed that a situation that often appeared in game, where they earned the hate of the villagers too much and now they got hit with the demerit had been generated.



Not only the destruction of the church, the destruction of the shoe store and the private houses surely also added to their crime. When they tried looking at the individual information screen, at Yue's special mention part, the "has criminal record" had changed into "wanted criminal (Destroyer Yue-pon)".



Kaori thought that if they were denied to use the shop by the game's system, then it couldn't be helped anymore, they should give up, and so she pulled at Yue's clothes to get out of the shop, but Yue didn't move and stood firmly in place.



「……Kaori. It's too fast to give up.」



「Eh, but, this is the game's system isn't it? There is nothing more that we can…..」



「……You're wrong. Just like I said before, this game's characteristic is that you can overturn the difference in strength depending on your method. It's too fast to conclude that it's impossible because it's the system. I'll proof it to you. Watch.」



「Geez, I have nothing but bad premonition here.」



Ahead of Kaori's disheartened gaze, Yue talked toward the shop owner. It seemed she was planning to find a path by negotiating……



「No matter what you are going to say, there is nothing that I will sell to――」



「……I beg you. Please choose, will your shop be burned, or will you hand over your goods quietly.」



It wasn't a negotiation, but a threat. With a gesture that was like a sister, both her hands clasped in front of her chest, and an expression like a pious lamb praying wholeheartedly to the god, she spoke something that would make even gang members to have cold sweat.



「……I have faith, that you will surely understand our plight! That our heart can communicate with each other if we just talk it out! Now, let's not be stubborn and be obedient.」



'He is not being stubborn but making the justified reaction though……'. That was what Kaori-san thought but she didn't butt in.



「……The god hath spoken. Child, choose equipment for the sister in front of your eyes within the range of 2,000 yen, he said. Rather, give her a discount, a lot of it! He said. If you do that, then your sin too shall be forgiven.」



Who would believe a god haggling? Or rather, the shop owner-san didn't commit any sin. Rather, the sinner here was Yue. Kaori-san just barely endured from saying those retorts.



The sun-like flame materialized once more in front of Yue.



「……Owner-san. I really don't want to see you receiving the judgment of god. I beg you, please obediently sell to us a gre~~~atly discounted merchandises!」



That wasn't god's judgment, but a punishment from Yue personally wasn't it? What's more it was exceedingly malicious. No matter how and where one looked at it, this person was really a splendid sister with a screw loose. Kaori couldn't endure and those straight-man retorts leaked out from her mouth. Yue-sama ignored it like nothing.



The shop owner's state was strange. His gaze was turning round and round, and his head was moving up and down. Perhaps his program was bustlingly performing data processing because he encountered this unexpected situation.



Inside the shop that was wrapped in silence except the roar of the blazing flame, the shop owner's gaze finally settled down.



「Welcome to the equipment shop of "AAAAAAA" village! Today we are in a middle of a special promotion sale!」



It seemed the sister-san's sincere prayer reached the shop owner and the system.



「……nn. Kaori, which item do you want?」



「If possible, a cheap one that can suppress my guilt even just for a little I think.」



Seeing Yue who turned toward her with a triumphant look, Kaori resolved that when they returned to reality she would train her once more about the meaning of obeying the law.



In the end, they couldn't buy anything in the equipment shop except for a single "Iron Long Sword". In the first place, the starting price for equipment was around several tens of thousands yen, a few thousand yen could only buy things like wooden sword or stone sword. By the time "Iron Long Sword" that had a price of 70,000 yen reduced to 1,500 yen, it could be easily guessed just what had happened between the shop owner and Yue, must be.



With feeling of guilt gouging out inside the chest grindingly, after that the same thing was also done in the general store and several potions for Yue's magic power recovery were bought, and the two then headed toward the village's entrance.



But, not even ten seconds after they exited the shop……*kon-*, a light impact assaulted Kaori's shoulder. When Kaori turned her gaze in wonder of what happened, she saw among the villagers who were staring at them from a distance that had increased relatively much, there were two children sticking out a bit from the crowd preparing to throw small rock.



Kaori's expression convulsed greatly.



「These criminals! Get out from the village!」



「Get out! Get out!」



The pure anger from the pure children smashed the pure (?) heart of Kaori-san. Kaori screamed「Hauh」and she pressed on her chest while falling on all fours!



Furthermore, the children of the village were gathering bustlingly and they were throwing rocks while hurling abuse with their lisping speech. And then perhaps that became the trigger, even the adults started to join in. They were yelling things like「Get out you sister with a screw loose!」or「I have thought from long ago that the village chief's regrettable daughter will someday become criminal!」while a chorus of「Get out from the village!」was arising.



「……They are looking for war. Very well, I'll accept the challenge. I am Yue. A woman who will buy the fight sold to me until they run out of stock!」(TN: In Japan, selling a fight is how they said picking a fight)



「Stoopp! Just be obedient already, Yueee! If the village is obliterated with this, then I have the confidence I'll be annihilated along with my soul from guilt!」



Seeing the sister-san with a screw loose lifting the corner of her lips like a demon king with the tips of her spread out hands materializing flame, Kaori pleaded at her to not act rashly while holding her down by pinioning her from behind.



No matter how one thought about it, this was the just dessert of the overbearing Yue. The hate that had been piling up and up had reached the critical point, they weren't just ostracized anymore, a campaign to exile them from the village had started.



Yue who even in this situation was far from reflecting, she even announced her intention really naturally to counter attack was truly the wife of the demon king. She was the avatar of being overbearing and unreasonable.



Regret? Restrain? Never heard about that! Come at me from anywhere you li~~ke!



Kaori caught the scruff of the neck of Yue who was getting spirited like that and without pause she ran toward the exit of the village while apologizing「I'm sorry! I'm really sorry for our Yue!」with one hand deflecting all the rocks flying at them using the long sword that she had unsheathed.



Seen from the side, the picture of the villager girl running around while swinging around a long sword with one hand, and the other hand dragging away a sister who was smiling fearlessly――it was truly the very picture of a village chief's regrettable daughter.



When the two got out of the village, the villagers' yell suddenly stopped completely. It seemed the commotion calmed down if they went out of the village. Kaori who was filled with trepidation that perhaps they would be kept getting chased even outside the village let out a sigh of relief and she sat down on the spot.



「……Kaori, are you okay?」



「My guilt is not okay at all, Yue you idiot.」



For Kaori who didn't have experience of being the target of the whole village's hostility and anger, it seemed she received substantial amount of mental damage. Her atmosphere felt somehow like she was sobbing.



「Geez, how can you be that calm? Even if this is a world of game, but I believe that normally anyone will get shocked if they got rock thrown at them by children that small……I never even dreamed that you would actually try to counter attack.」



Kaori turned an expression that looked like she was speechless, like she was blaming her, like she was in admiration at that mental of steel or rather that shameless mental, and like she was in exasperation toward Yue. Yue's expression suddenly turned gentle and she answered.



「……Because I had experienced it already.」



「? Experience? ……aa」



For a moment Kaori didn't understand what Yue was talking about, but she guessed it after thinking for a bit. And then, her expression turned very much like「Oh no!」and she attempted to change the topic in panic but……the time was already late.



「……Compared to getting beaten up to near death by my trusted vassals and my uncle who was like father, having rock thrown at me by children who I don't know, what's more by something that's nothing more than a program is really nothing at all.」



「Tha, that, Yue? It's, I'm sorry.」



「…..What are you apologizing for, Kaori? I just want to say that compared to the experience of getting ganged up by people who were like family, this is only trivial. Fufu, that time really hurt. Inside that storm of magic until my automatic regeneration ran out. Fufufuh, my heart hurt that timee~~」



「Sorry Yue! I asked you something stupid! That's why return backkk!」



Seeing and hearing the empty laugh of Yue who was staring at the faraway past with eyes that looked like dead fish, Kaori embraced her with teary eyes while apologizing. She should have become unbound by the past after knowing the true motive of her uncle Denreed, but no matter the fact it still didn't change that it was an event that was hard to forget.



Yue gently patted Kaori who was clinging on her with teary eyes while she turned at her and spoke with eyes that had recovered their light.



「……I'm fine. I who had met Hajime, traveled, knew the truth about Oji-sama, and opened my eyes to the truth, has no more blind spot now.」



「Tru, truth?」



Yue nodded shortly and she puffed up her chest with an extremely triumphant look while replying full of confidence.



「Setting aside the reason, just slaughter everyone for the time being. If there is something that bothers you, then resurrect them again at opportune time.」



「……Everyone all liberators. Everyone's magic is completed by perhaps the person who must not have it the most. I'm sorry.」



This is the first wife of the demon king! In front of her, life was just too light. No, surely, she was a bit more prudent in the real world, should be, Kaori was half praying while she lowered her head toward the protectors of the other world.



Kaori was crestfallen thinking that her strength had suddenly faded off even before departing to their journey, but right after that, they were visited by a situation that made them lost such composure.



*flap-*, such sound of flapping wings resounded once, twice……it resounded inside the two's ears one after another.



When the two went 'hah' and they lifted up their face, over there were multiple beings descending down from the sky.



The beings were flapping beautiful white wings on their back, they were clad in impressive dress armor that looked beautiful, while their hand was each holding spear or sword or weapon that looked famous. The forms of the women who were emitting abnormal pressure were beautiful in contrast with that threatening atmosphere. Their beautiful look that ought to be said as god's creation was completed with dreamy silver hair that looked flowing.



Kaori couldn't even say anything. The existence and strength of these women were obviously boss class where in a game they would come out at the middle stage, no, at the latter stage.



'Aah, I see, this is an event!' Right after Kaori almost convinced herself like that, a ruthless voice of heaven descended.



――Wild Valkyries appeared!!



The women who were greatly popular even among the Norse myth carelessly appeared as though they were goblin level enemy, *jakin-* their weapons were readied with such sound. They were brimming with hostility. They were fully motivated.



Kaori briefly said.



「This kind of world, is just mistakeenn……」



Kaori doubted her beloved person's sanity just for a bit.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Things like the setting, the information screen, or the content, currently it is still a prototype and on top of that its behaving baggily, that's the setting so please forgive the vagueness.



I plan to someday make it into the stage of a long After arc, so at that time I'll think up the detailed content.



PS



The comic version of Arifureta is updated in the homepage of Overlap-sama.



As always the illustration has impact, Yue is also cute.



Please try to have a look if you like.





Chapter 253




AN: Regarding the case where everyone of Narou people has better understanding of Shirakome then Shirakome himself.



……I have no more excuse.



The first attack was a swept of a splendorous sword. The speed of the eye focus couldn't follow it. One Valkyrie charged with a speed that even produced afterimages, lunging toward Yue and Kaori who was still embracing Yue.



Perhaps it was trying to bisect the two simultaneously. The sword line that drew a trajectory that almost looked like a flash was rapidly approaching at Yue's neck as though it was absorbed to there. If the target was an ordinary person, they wouldn't even have time to scream, when they noticed there was no doubt that their death would be already a certainty.



「FUWAaAAA!?」



「Nngih」



Of course, the village chief's regrettable daughter, regardless of being a villager girl she was a regrettable girl that boasted a physical ability that was far removed from ordinary person. The sweeping attack that approached like the scythe of death god was evaded by falling backward while her arm wasted no time to circle on Yue's neck and she pulled Yue with her.



Death was passing through along with a violent wind just a millimeter above Yue and Kaori's face who were falling backward like in a limbo dance.



Although Kaori's posture broke down with her falling backward, she somehow succeeded in evading. But a shadow appeared above her without even any time to sigh in relieve.



「WAAAA!?」



「Higyo!?」



Kaori put strength into the arm that she circled around Yue's neck and without pause she rolled on the ground, taking Yue with her. That appearance could be seen as a brave figure desperately trying to protect a friend.



A hair's breadth.



A spear that also looked splendorous raised a really unpleasant impact sound *zudon-* when it pierced the spot where the two collapsed at just now. A small crater was even created from the impact. It was a terrifying strength.



The Valkyries made their entrance like a common goblin, but as expected their strength wasn't in a level that should appear around the village of the beginning.



From Yue's individual information screen just now, "Automatic Regeneration" wasn't listed there. It was unclear how much the system that was an effect of soul magic was suppressing that skill which was a characteristic ability.



In such state, furthermore inside this buggy world, if they got hit with that attack that was unmistakably a one-hit kill, even if it was Yue but there was a high possibility that she wouldn't come out of it safely.



And Kaori who was separated from her apostle body was also the same.



It wasn't clear what kind of effect a damage they got in this game world would inflict at their soul, because of that they absolutely must not get hit.



Cold sweat trickled from Kaori's forehead seeing the enemy's strength and the merciless one-hit kill attacks launched toward them.



Kaori made use of her rolling momentum to somehow straighten herself while she obeyed the warning that her combat experience informed her and leaped back from that spot. Right away, the vertical slashes of the Valkyries that launched pincer attack passed through before her eyes.



「Nngigih, gi, give-. I give!」it felt like some kind of strange voice could be heard, but right now there was no leeway to be bothered with that.



Kaori had to grasp the limitation of her lowered physical ability while during that time she had to evade the countless death approaching them!



Even if, there was the sensation of repeated tapping that felt relatively desperate on her hand that was circled around Yue's neck, but there wasn't any time to worry about that!



「It's fine! I swear I'll absolutely protect you Yue!」



「Tha, that's not-. My neeck! It's completely――」



Countless flame bullets rushed from middle range! Kaori strengthened her grip so that her friend absolutely wouldn't get separated from her while dancing the dance of death with determination!



Kaori stepped toward the swarm of flame bullets while still holding Yue. Rather than waiting for the bullets to converge at herself, she would move forward and slip through before the gaps were tightened.



Just like she planned, she slipped through the gaps in the barrage and passed through several shots, then with a rotation she evaded an attack that approached from the front. So that Yue's body wouldn't be separated from her because of the centrifugal force, she put even more strength to her arm that was holding Yue!



「Kafuu!? ……Ka, Kaori, I'll, I'll apologize, so, your arm, armmm~」



「It's fine! Because I'll absolutely protect you!」



「……You, you bastardd~, you're planninggg――」



Yue tried to say something, but at the corner of the sight a Valkyrie archer could be seen nocking an arrow that was enveloped with some abnormal light. It caused Kaori's heart to jump.



「Look ouu~~~tt-」



「Kyupeh!?」



Kaori immediately jumped forward to get down on the ground. Flame bullets passed through overhead, further behind the sounds of explosion resounded. The impact that came assaulting within an instant caused Kaori and Yue's bodies to dance in the air like a leaf.



Kaori somehow kept her hold on Yue and she performed ukemi on the ground. There she noticed that the attacks stopped and she let out a faint exhale of relieve.



It seemed they managed to endure just barely the first wave of the attack.



The Valkyries were moving slowly. They were trying to surround Kaori and Yue. Kaori scowled at that while she talked to Yue.



「Yue. What should we do? Perhaps this is just as expected. These people are strong just as we thought. We have to break through this encirclement somehow……Yue?」



「……」



Just try to look. The white of her eyes is exposed and her mouth is half opened but, that's a beautiful face right? She is fainting y'know?



Such words crossed Kaori's mind. The friend in her arm, even now when the white of her eyes were exposed and her mouth was half opened, but she was still beautiful as usual.



「Who, who did something like this!? Yue! Get a hold of yourself! Just what in the world happened!?」



Kaori shook Yue's body back and forth, but Yue was only staying limp like an octopus and she didn't react even with how rough she was shaken. 'Rather, perhaps this is because of enemy's sleep magic I wonder!?' Thinking that Kaori glared at the enemies. While her mouth was twitching as though she was enduring something.



And then, while staying vigilant against the surrounding, she straddled Yue and lifted up her hand.



Yue had to be wakened up no matter what. Even if she had to use a heartless method, but in the battlefield it wasn't the place to say naïve things!



――*PAN-, PAN-, PAN-, BISHII-!*



Such sounds resounded in the battlefield. Kaori-san's double slap that was thinking about her friend burst on Yue's cheeks!



「Yue! Wake up! You are going to die if you sleep here! Quickly wake up! Come on quickly!」



Kaori's palm was swung with a display of accurate consecutive hits that drew artistic trajectory and hit spot. Yue's cheeks were painted with beautiful slap sound while moving to left and to right. Kaori-san's double slap also followed vaguely rhythmically.



「Qu-ick-ly! Wake-up!」



For some reason her voice sounded lively……



The Valkyries were looking at each other. They might be feeling bewildered.



One of the enemy they were assaulting fainted by herself when they noticed, and then the other enemy for some reason was dealing additional blows to that enemy……perhaps that was how it looked like to them. Objectively looking. In that case, it was also natural for them to be bewildered.



But, the next moment, the wrist of Kaori who was dealing out rhythmical slaps was caught *GRAB-!!* forcefully.



「……Good morning, Kaori. Sayonara, Kaori.」



「Eh?」



At Yue-sama's awakening *buppa*. A flame sphere the size of a pinball materialized in front of Kaori, and the next instant, it exploded grandly. It seemed that the "fireball" magic was super compressed before it was set free which produced directional shockwave.



'FUWAAAA' Kaori who was raising such scream while rolling around backward somehow stopped rolling in the posture of all fours. She then lifted up her face and began to let out a lot of cold sweats.



「……Even though even Hajime has never slapped me. Kaori, is your resolve okay?」



Yue-sama's anger was in the state of piercing the heaven. She was getting so angry that behind her back it felt like there was the illusion of sound effect letters *GOGOGOGO-*.



「I, I don't understand what are you saying here, Yue. Anyway, calm down? Surely we can understand each other if we talk about it.」



「……Hou. You are saying that you constricting my neck while wretchedly swinging me around, and in the end slapping my face on and on happily, aren't something that you did purposefully?」



「Such thing! That's misunderstanding! I was only trying to protect Yue! And yet, how can you be so cruel saying such――」



「……If you speak honestly, Yue's best selection. Ten sexy photo of Hajime, I'll prese――」



「Being able to payback for the daily prank, it makes my feeling really refreshed. You even made noise 'higyoh', or 'kyupeh', pupuh」



A blood vein jutted out on Yue's forehead with a snap.



And then,



「……Today is your death anniversary!」



「Wawah, don't do that! If that flame bullet hit me, I'll totally die!」



「……Don't worry. I'll absolutely kill you!」



Countless flame bullets were fired from Yue. Every single one was hiding a power that could make anyone comprehended how it could destroy a church.



Kaori who got a bit carried away and got surprised jumped away from that spot and tried to apologize in panic but,



「……Perish, you eternal stalker woman!」



「Who are you calling a stalker I wonder!? I wonder!?」



Kaori spontaneously talked back hearing the extremely disgracing statement. When she avoided the flame bullets while glaring at Yue, Yue snorted「Fuhn」.



「……Just notice it already. Of your own true nature. And then, of Hajime's self-sacrificing spirit!」



「Self-sacrificing? What are you say――」



「……Aa, Kaori who is a stalker, a yandere, and a hidden pervert is really troubling. But if I leave her alone I don't know what she might do, can't be helped, perhaps I should look after her a bit, notice already that true feeling of Hajime!」



「There is no way Hajime-kun is thinking anything like that! Yue is just saying irresponsible thing!」



「……If that's what you think, then that's must be it. Inside Kaori that is.」



「……Fufu, Yue. Those words are too much you know? If you apologize now, then I'll forgive you. Come now, apologize. Quickly apologize.」



「……Eh? Why should I, yandere hidden pervert stalker-san. It's a bit scary, so can you not get nearer than that?」



*snap-* A blood vein emerged on Kaori's forehead. Even though she was showing a wide smile, but an illusion of sound effect *GOGOGOGO-* could be seen behind her.



「Right, I won't get near you at all. Who want to get near a hopeless vampire who is eternally horny. Ninety percent of the inside of your head is crammed with perverted things right? I wonder if perhaps Hajime-kun will notice it sooner or later? That this vampire princess (lol), is just a pervert. Ah, can you not get nearer to me than that? The legal wife (lol) can infect me.」



Toward Kaori who affixed (lol) even until two times at Yue's identity, Yue also smiled widely.



For some reason the Valkyries were flustered. 'What to do, it's a carnage, a carnage you know? Should we stop those two? Who will? You, go stop them already. Eh, no way, if you say that then you go there, you are a Valkyrie right? You are also a Valkyrie.' ――Perhaps they were making conversation like that.



But, the next moment their movement stopped still.



Because an extremely cold blizzard was blowing violently.



Because a dark cloud that was scattering flashes of lightning materialized.



And then,



――SHAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!



――GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!



Because behind Kaori who was smiling while sporting pulsing blood vein, a hannya-san tapping a large war sword on her shoulder materialized!



Because behind Yue who was smiling while sporting pulsing blood vein, a coiling lightning dragon raising a thunderous roar materialized!



The unthinkable supernatural phenomenon that shouldn't exist in this game system caused the Valkyries who were modeled after supernatural existence to tremble while backing away.



What reached the ears of those women was,



「……KAORI YOU STUPIIIIID-」



「……YUE YOU UIDIOTTTTT-」



In contrast with such delicate insult and intensity, they uncouthly grappled, clawed, and pulled at each other in a delicate scuffle――rather, it was their usual cat fight.



「Fushaah――!」When Yue Punch was unleashed, Kaori growled「Muiiiih」even while receiving it with her cheek and her hand pinched on Yue's cheek and pulled. When Yue pulled on Kaori's hair, Kaori would grind her finger on Yue's side, when Yue pulled Kaori's cheek in return, Kaori would throw away Yue's wimple and pulled her hair in return.



Kaori struck cat punches *poka poka* on Yue who was pushed down by the difference in body height. Yue tightly grasped on the butt of such Kaori and when she flinched from that, Yue used the opening to overturn their position and then she launched a double slap on Kaori's relatively large breast as though to say that it was payback for before.



The rolled round and round, grappled on each other, then rolled round and round again and hit each other *poka poka* repeatedly, even though the two were beautiful girl, but they were covered all over with dust with their hair all ruffled. Both Yue and Kaori were wearing one piece type of clothing, so they were in a state where their panty was fully exposed, but they didn't even bother with that.



Just how long they were planning to do that?



The Valkyries who were somewhat dumbfounded suddenly returned back to their senses. They readied their respective weapon, making metallic sound rang to pull themselves together and galred at the two who were still entangled themselves in a quarrel. They glared……but, as expected the two were still going 'nyaa―nyaa―'.



The Valkyries looked at each other. They had no expression, but somehow they vaguely looked like they were speaking 'like this we don't even need to surround them to fight isn't it?'.



The women nodded at each other. One woman among them quietly walked forward. It was the Valkyrie carrying a divine spear. Perhaps she was being conscious of the blind spot of the rampaging Kaori and Yue, because sometimes she would circle around in her advance.



And then, she entered the range. The next moment, she stepped forward all of a sudden. She must be trying to skewer the two simultaneously. The sure-kill thrust was unleashed at Yue's back with a terrific speed.



Kaori who was looking up because her chin was pushed from below by Yue's hand couldn't see behind Yue. Yue too, her nose was pinched by Kaori so she couldn't look behind.



Killed.
